_	It broke the story that sexual allegations against applicant Derek Walcott were being created by persons linked to applicant and eventual winner Ruth Padel.
_	Meanwhile, the story that Puja wrote became very popular that Seema's boss wanted to make a film out of it.
_	At the theater, Elaine doesn't want to sit near Braun, so she invents the story that she has to sit with Jerry close to the screen because he supposedly forgot his glasses.
_	In 1980, Hollinger broke the story that the jury at the Cannes Film Festival, chaired that year by Kirk Douglas, had been surprised that a French film, "My American Uncle", had been awarded the Grand Prix by Cannes' organizers, despite the fact that the jury had rejected the film as the winner.
_	It is eventually revealed at the end of the story that the "station wagon" is not a station wagon at all, but a sentient, extra-terrestrial entity that only assumed the form of an earthly vehicle in order to lure in unsuspecting victims.
_	(He was one of the most intelligent and supportive advocates in Russia for the music of Igor Stravinsky, though the story that Stravinsky dedicated "The Rite of Spring" to Myaskovsky is untrue.)
_	He represented Lincolnshire in the Parliament of 1555 and 1559, and Northamptonshire in that of 1563, and he took an active part in the proceedings of the House of Commons until his elevation to the peerage; but there seems no good evidence for the story that he was proposed as Speaker in 1563.
_	The theme developed for the manga serialized in "Febri" had to do with bonus aspects to the story that she was unable to draw in the main serialization, as well as events that occurred between chapters in the main story.
_	This character "tells the part of the story that is about rage when they’re not allowed to, or fear when they’re not allowed to, or mourning when they’re not allowed to," according to Khan.
_	Glimfeather's friend in the Parliament of Owls tells the children the story of how Prince Rilian was lost 10 years ago, and the children gather from the story that the serpent who killed the Queen and the mysterious lady that Rilian had pointed out to Lord Drinian on his return to the forest were probably one and the same.
_	The oldest explanation appears to be the story that Native Americans used a well-known cave in the gorge (Smoke Hole Cave) for smoking meat; this cave has a room shaped like an inverted funnel with a hole at the apex through which smoke could escape and be seen from some distance.
_	In March 2015, Schmidt broke the story that Hillary Rodham Clinton had exclusively used a personal email account when she was secretary of state.
_	Although PWD would go on to work on burning floating oil, a plan was hatched to spread the story that such a weapon already existed even before the first trials were performed.
_	Explaining her motivation, she said she would often connect images, childhood memories, emotions and fantasies to songs she was in the midst of composing, and that she "wanted people to hear the songs with the story that's in my head as that's what makes it mine".
_	Reynardo finds out that the book is magic and provides him a narrative guidance as he makes choices along the story that provides a path that ends with a result that may or may not be to his benefits.
_	Phaedo tells the story that following the discussion, he and the others were there to witness the death of Socrates.
_	Soon, however, the media-savvy Ruth was going along with the story that he had called his shot, and his subsequent versions over the years became more dramatic.
_	In February 2011, the Durham Student newspaper Palatinate broke the story that a WikiLeaks cable revealed that a series of Iranian seminars at Durham had been funded by the US State Department as "political cover" for contacts with Iran.
_	It is implied during the story that Boo is a very lonely man who attempts to reach out to Jem and Scout for love and friendship, such as leaving them small gifts and figures in a tree knothole.
_	During the present regime the people treated this as the story that on 6 June 1954 Sir Syed Ahmed Khan suggested in dream to Raheel Begum Sharwani for establishment of Women Education institution.
_	She finally finds a husband in the story that follows, "De Zwarte Voeten" ("The Black Feet") (1950), where she meets the mayor of Moerbeke-Waas, who also owns a sugar factory.
_	A report released later that day said that a second device had been found in a locker near the one in which the first bomb was placed, and a third announcement at 4:45 pm again issued the story that no second bomb had been found.
_	In the English language adaptation of the series by former licensee DIC Entertainment (now DHX Media), the season was cut down to 40 episodes and also added an ending segment, "Sailor Says," to teach a moral based on the story that had just been shown.
_	Johnson told a different version of the story that, in contrast to Haku being asked if he was a "fake wrestler" on his way out of the bar, involved a seated Haku being approached by the man, who accused him of being "not so tough".
_	(Snow White: Fairy Tale or True Story?), claiming he had uncovered an account that may have inspired the story that first appeared in Grimm’s Fairy Tales.
_	But the story that was published more times in different countries ( Argentina, Canada]], United States and Spain) is "In Between".
_	The Cubs said in a statement, "We hope this provides closure on an unfortunate chapter of the story that has perpetuated throughout our quest to win a long-awaited World Series.
_	In June 2011, Breitbart's websites broke the story that congressman Anthony Weiner was sending women revealing photographs of himself.
_	To explain away the cell phone, Duncan wrote in the story that Nore's cell phone died when Gabe tried to drown Nore in the river.
_	It is an ending to the story that we started so long ago, but it's a very fast-paced ending to the story."
_	Thorpe and Davis (both doing some of their earliest professional comics work) created Mad Jim Jaspers and wrote the story that would lead into the Jaspers' Warp storyline.
_	The husband and wife team of Amole Gupte and Deepa Bhatia developed the story that would eventually become "Taare Zameen Par" as a way of understanding why some children cannot conform to a conventional educational system.
_	Dance in much of Southeast Asia includes movement of the hands as well as the feet, to express the dance's emotion and meaning of the story that the ballerina is going to tell the audience.
_	Many are ex-votos ("from a vow") that depict the story that led to their commission, usually dangerous or threatening events that actually occurred, and which the person survived, thanks to the intercession of a sacred person - God,
_	There was likely an earlier version of the story that did not have section divisions and functioned more explicitly as a sermon, which in the surviving text was converted to be more ""jōruri"-like".
_	George Douglas was also the source of the story that James V died in a feverish delirium at Falkland Palace still lamenting the loss of his standard and the capture of his favourite Oliver at Solway.
_	The time of his subjects is never defined, but is eternally present and cyclical, the theme of repetition linked to oral tradition is the story that is often repeated with slight variations; he uses them to express religious or moral needs and encodes a belief.
_	Winterbotham later responded that he had simply passed on the story that he had been given at the time.
_	the most important fact about the Report was (and remains) that it tells the story that Hamilton and the Court wanted told.
_	The narrator, meanwhile, occupies her mind with many questions, plans, mental rough drafts and reminiscences as her journey unfolds, including the "zipless fuck," a major motif in the story that haunts the narrator throughout.
_	The second half of issue #138 was included in the "Jaka's Story" collection as the epilogue, but the story that made up the rest of the two issues ("Like-a-Looks", see below) was not included in the "Jaka's Story" collection.
_	On the evening of the 22nd, the media broke the story that Democratic nominee Adlai Stevenson had a similar fund, as Chotiner had predicted.
_	Parry was a finalist for the 1985 Pulitzer Prize for National Reporting and received the George Polk Award for National Reporting in 1984 for his work with the Associated Press on Iran-Contra, where he broke the story that the Central Intelligence Agency had provided an assassination manual to the Nicaraguan Contras (Psychological Operations in Guerrilla Warfare).
_	She puts a slant on the story that makes it sound like a Puritan spiritual biography.
_	Then, about a year into the development, Jeffrey Katzenberg decided that the story that we'd come up with was the right way for Shrek's journey to end, which was incredibly flattering."
_	It is said in the story that Erendis finally longed for Aldarion enough to overcome her bitterness, and she travelled to a haven where he was expected to return.
_	They soon realise that if Durga Devi ever finds out that they are having a girl then she will once again treat Priya poorly so they decide to play along with the story that she is having a boy.
_	Subtext is, according to my definition, the part of the story that none of the players ever mentions.
_	Its importance we may judge from the story that claims many of Irelands Kings are buried in the ancient graveyards adjoining the Abbey.
_	Little by little, the story that each of them tells changes.
_	Kyle reveals later that Basil requested him from an escort service...Raymond and Nicole reconcile through a promise of an AIDS test...the story ends in a letter from the beginning of the story that never reveals who it is being sent to.
_	The Prologue (often omitted) points to the story that is portrayed as occurring in the imagination of the audience.
_	The 3rd century writer Tertullian, for example, blames him (incorrectly—see history of anti-Semitism) for originating the story that the Jews worshipped a donkey's head in the Holy of Holies and calls him ""ille mendaciorum loquacissimus"", 'the most loquacious of liars'.
_	Rumors about supposed escapades have since become legend, for example the story that Mary Weiss attracted the attention of the FBI for transporting a firearm across state lines.
_	The new adaptation is more faithful to the original story; according to DC's Tim Beedle, the film is "much less condensed and will include many of the fan-favorite moments from the story that were left out of "Doomsday"."
_	On the outbreak of the Second World War Kaye tried to join up but was turned down due to his short stature, later telling the story that the medical officer had said, "When we declare war on pygmies - we'll send for you."
_	He is known for disputing the story that Zephaniah Swift Moore - in his attempt to move the campus of Williams College closer to Boston - pilfered its library.
_	Mayall tells the story that his wife believed it was just his silly joking and she initially left him for a few minutes.
_	But one of the main themes in the novel is the story that Agnes wants the narrator to write.
_	According to Graham Seaman, ""The Roots of the Mountains" seems to be the story that inspired the subplot of the Dunedain, wanderers of a fading heroic past defending the frontiers of the Shire against the Orcs, and the loves of Aragorn, Eowyn, Faramir, and Arwen in Tolkien's "Lord of the Rings"."
_	It would conclude the story that was started in "The Midnight Charter", presumably following the characters Mark and Lily.
_	Variants differ in the story that is included under its own title.
_	However, though this is true, there is no evidence to support the story that Eleanor later quipped, "I once had a rose named after me and I was very flattered.
_	The family had preserved the story that when Shelley's body had been burned, his friend Edward Trelawny had snatched the whole heart from the pyre.
_	it is said by many of the characters in the story that he possesses dangerous abilities and should not be left alive.
_	The question was once again raised in Parliament, and Sir Laming Worthington-Evans said that the story that the Germans had set up a factory for the conversion of dead bodies first appeared on 10 April 1917, in the ', and in the Belgian newspapers ' and "".
_	Further recognition of Starkman's journalistic talents came in 2010 from Sports Media Canada, the Canadian branch of the Association Internationale de la Presse Sportive, for breaking the story that South Korean figure skater Yuna Kim had fired her coach Brian Orser.
_	The song was written on a day McBryde calls "the worst day ever," a sentiment shared by the other two songwriters when they met up for a writing session, which led to Rice sharing the story that would lead to the creation of the song.
_	He was not there for long – he appears to have left in the middle of 1852 – but the story that he was expelled from Cheltenham is without foundation.
_	She further recorded the story that after draining blood from a victim, the shtriga would generally go off into the woods and regurgitate it.
_	The broad outlines remain the same in the story that appears in the "Gesta Romanorum" a century later.
_	From his naval service arose the story that he was a member of a shore party that destroyed a salt works near Fort Fisher.
_	A 1789 history of Halifax embellished it with the story that Morton "carried a model of it to his own country, where it remained so long unused, that it acquired the name of the Maiden."
_	Reporting on Emin's widely covered five-week exhibition of gouache nudes, bronze sculptures, and textile and neon pieces in October–November 2014 (at the White Cube gallery in Bermondsey, South London), Sooke broke the story that Emin, artist and professor of drawing at the Royal Academy since 2011, had composed the nudes during "life-drawing classes [that] she has been attending in New York," and that the "sculptures are the results of lessons in how to cast bronze over the past three years."
_	So much public attention was given to the story that postcards depicting the crime were made, which were bought by many.
_	It was alleged in the story that ImClone was arbitrary in who received the drug and had no written criteria for compassionate use.
_	They both would tell the story that they were sitting around the kitchen table after dinner in their home in the Wykagyl Park section of New Rochelle, New York.
_	This fictitious document being the germ of the story that Hawthorne writes, as follows.
_	In this connection Herodotus tells the story that Darius, having seen at Sardis a beautiful Paeonian woman carrying a pitcher on her head, leading a horse to drink, and spinning flax, all at the same time, inquired who she was.
_	Zaphod is played by Sam Rockwell in the film version of the story that was released in April 2005.
_	And so I made a beginning—and that beginning was the story that became "Odd Girl Out"."
_	He reluctantly tells her the version of the story that he has heard, about a man called Williams living there some thirty years ago with his young son.
_	"London Match" concludes the story that began with "Berlin Game", where Bernard Samson's wife Fiona was unmasked as a KGB double agent and was forced into defecting, and that was continued in "Mexico Set", where Bernard Samson assisted the defection of Erich Stinnes, his KGB opposite number.
_	Some news outlets carried the story that Mother Teresa had undergone an exorcism, but the Archbishop later explained that although Father Stroscio used a prayer found in the rite of exorcism, "I did not think she was possessed by an evil spirit," and so no formal exorcism took place.
_	Rather, the story that carries players along, the chances for players to connect and collaborate with others, the immediate feedback, the increasing challenges, and the powerful choices given to players about how to proceed throughout the game, are immensely significant factors in sustained engagement.
_	"Erythranthe moschata" was widely grown and sold commercially in Victorian times for its fragrance, and is well-known for the story that all cultivated and known wild specimens simultaneously lost their previous strong musk scent around the year 1913.
_	Garm’s beautiful distorted vocals act as outcries of a desperate man hidden, pushed in the background of the story that the instrumentation tells."
_	The museum also bought another 44 objects and received a description of the story that the totem pole was intended to tell.
_	Pausanias 8.12.5 records the story that Penelope had in fact been unfaithful to her husband, who banished her to Mantineia upon his return.
_	When interviewed for the film, Rankin declared that he would add nothing to the story that wasn't in the original.
_	We learn from the story that it would be easier to adapt to zero gravity than to send the entire city to a new planet.
_	Reed returns to headquarters to discover that a reporter (Dan Riss) is threatening to break the story that a pathogenic bacteria is endangering the city.
_	Hitler was later warned by Olympic officials that heads of states were not permitted to conduct such congratulations, which was what Willi Daume said in 1984 said prevented Hitler from congratulating gold medallist Jesse Owens, causing the story that the Nazi leader refused to shake his hand.
_	On the eve of Reagan's re-election, the S/LPD spread the story that Soviet MiG fighter jets were arriving in Nicaragua.
_	Pierce first created the story that would become Birth of the Firebringer as a child.
_	So Padre tells the story that happened many miles from where they live in El Camino Del Notre Old Mexico.
_	She tells the story that one night she was awoken by a hard blow to her body.
_	In the final sequence, it is revealed that the story that Kint had told Kujan is a fabrication, made up of strung-together details culled from a crowded bulletin board in a messy office.
_	Information about the character first surfaced to the public on 2 June 1966, when the Heywood Advertiser ran the story that Coronation Street was going through 'a little facelift' and the character of Bet Lynch was to be introduced.
_	While narrating the story that pre-dates his birth, he remarks, "Of course, a narrator in my position (prefetal at the time) can't be entirely sure about any of this."
_	Whether they engaged in "dangerous" sex beyond such temptations is a fact known only to them; existing evidence, Lothane argues, does not confirm the story that they engaged in a sexual relationship.
_	There is a scene in "Taras Bulba" where Jews are thrown into a river, a scene where Taras Bulba visits the Jews and seeks their aid, and reference by the narrator of the story that Jews are treated inhumanely.
_	This is recorded in several variant forms in the 17th and 18th centuries, usually with the story that Shakespeare composed it extempore at a party with Combe present.
_	Upon his arrest, Maher initially fabricated the story that two intruders had penetrated the apartment and that he had fought them off, receiving stab wounds.
_	The two survivors concocted the story that after running for six days they left Hutchison and Coventry behind after the men couldn't swim across a river.
_	Es Heopner tells the story that this room allowed for the boys to quickly slip down to the river for a swim just before dinner time in the hope that their mother wouldn't notice their absence.
_	Defying media censorship, Chávez's supporters disseminate the story that the president did not resign.
_	There are portions of the story that, as written by Feng, are "devoted to a world without her, in fact, takes on an impetus and logic all of its own."
_	"That was the story that hit me and really affected me.
_	The Hollywood film "El Cid" largely follows the narrative of the Chronicle and the poetic epics, adding to the character of the Infanta a spurned woman role scheming against the Cid, once she seems rejected by him; however it omits the story that Urraca and Rodrigo grew up as close companions in Zamora and there may be other omissions.
_	The public media (in US parlance "free media" or "earned media") may run the story that someone is trying to get elected or to do something about certain aspects regarding their specific country.
_	For instance, there is no proof to the story that they chopped the heads off calves, dogs, goats, and sheep, whereafter they were said to have thrown the carcasses through the palace windows.
_	He probably used the pseudonym of Arthur Ellis after the famous English executioner, John Ellis: there is no truth in the story that John Ellis was his uncle, as John Ellis only had one brother, James Preston who was born in 1887, and therefore would have been only 25 when Arthur Ellis started his career.
_	Every paper in the city runs the story that Superman has gone bad, but Lois Lane does not believe it to be true.
_	Anchorage blogger Andrew Halcro broke the story that Monegan was fired due to his refusal to fire the governor's ex-brother-in-law a week later.
_	For example, Moses ben Mordecai Bassola, while noting the story that the person here was buried standing up, stated explicitly that it was a Rabbi Meir different than the "tanna".
_	It was in this catalogue that a faulty interpretation of the text of Francisco Rojas lead to the story that the book was in honour of Isabella’s support for the expedition of Christopher Columbus.
_	Ozzie Simmons is probably best known as the central figure in the story that spawned the Floyd of Rosedale trophy.
_	A new hardcover collection () features a new story by Jim Shooter, "Origin of Harada", which presumably fleshes out the story that appeared on the coupons.
_	To that end, the story that emerged was simpler, not one in which the world was at risk, but returning the series to that of a Cold War thriller; Bond would also rely more on his wits than gadgets to survive.
_	In 1995, the "Orange County Register" broke the story that Asch—then Chief of the University of California, Irvine's Center for Reproductive Health—and his two partners were accused of taking women's eggs without their permission for use by other patients.
_	However, the story that some Jews were given military ID tags during the Gulf War with the designation "Protestant-B" as a code name for Jewish (a story included in one civilian writer's anthology of military stories she had been told by others, and then that one story was reprinted or quoted in many other in-print or online locations including Hadassah Magazine) has been the subject of much debate as to its veracity, with some military personnel stating that the story is "absolutely false."
_	"The Telephone" was dismissed as being "less satisfying", specifying that it potentially American International Pictures attempt at re-writing the story that caused the stories problems.
_	The film's title refers to the story that Eric Harris and Dylan Klebold—the two students responsible for the Columbine High School massacre—attended a school bowling class at 6:00 AM on the day they committed the attacks at school, which started at 11:17 AM.
_	The firefights are intense, the pacing will keep you on the edge of your seat and quite a few scenes prove absolutely breathtaking, but the game's chief strength is the story that binds it all together, and the multiplayer modes that should keep us amused for quite some time."
_	Up to three people can be in a party, these three party members are changed around depending on the part of the story that is being played.
_	The production gained a sort of notoriety when Dustin Hoffman spread the story that Heston, who was bald, was so vain that he wore a wig over his hairpiece, rather than let the public view his actual bald pate.
_	And once again, for as many little threads that were sewn up, there were as many brand-new threads of the story that I can't wait to explore."
_	Pheidippides () or Philippides (Φιλιππίδης) is the central figure in the story that inspired a modern sporting event, the marathon race.
_	Many were also critical of the child villain Hob; David Nusair of Reel Film Reviews stated, "That the film asks us to swallow a moment late in the story that features Robo taking pity on an injured Hob is heavy-handed and ridiculous (we should probably be thankful the screenwriters didn't have RoboCop say something like, 'Look at what these vile drugs have done to this innocent boy')."
_	How much truth there is in the story that Marian and her mother were forced to flee from their home in fear of their lives after her father's death uncertain, but violence was endemic in fifteenth century Ireland, as it was in England, so the story may have some basis.
_	The name "Pimple" was commonly used from about the year 1915 onwards, and the story that the hill was a Saxon burial ground appeared around 1935, when the spread of dwellings from Washwood Heath began to appear over Hodge Hill.
_	That's the story that all of us have to tell."
_	The character of Darcy has no singing role but is portrayed by a dancer, and draws on the story that he played the violin to prepare himself for fights.
_	Frederick's pride in his mastery of the art is illustrated by the story that, when he was ordered to become a subject of the Great Khan (Batu) and receive an office at the Khan's court, he remarked that he would make a good falconer, for he understood birds very well.
_	He does, however, very subtly foreshadow the secret when he notes, with dry humor, near the beginning of the story that the gorilla's contract grants him a salary of 750 dollars per week, and "billing guaranteed in letters not smaller than those of ... the stars" of the movie.
_	Some modern historians consider that this person really was Bardiya, whereas the story that he was an impostor was spread by Darius I after he became monarch.
_	Golo and Van der Prout come on the scene and after despatching the men-at-arms to hunt down Geneviève (Golo having put about the story that Sifroid has been killed in the crusades) he calls up the hermit of the ravine.
_	It is also known for the story that after WWII the military disposed of a large quantity of guns and other war materials down the biggest mine in the area.
_	As a journalist in the 1970s, Gardner helped break the story that the US government was funding the spraying of paraquat by helicopter to defoliate Mexican marijuana fields.
_	Zik claimed that the assassination of Yitzhak Rabin was a conspiracy and broke the story that Avishai Raviv was a member of the Israeli Shin Bet.
_	However original sources point to this narrative not being the case and indicate Smith was used by John Farey Sr., another ‘practical man’(i.e. mineral surveyor), to prosecute Farey’s own grievances against the Geological Society in an article in The Philosophical Magazine by which he both started and fuelled the story that Smith was disrespected and there was ill-feeling towards him by the Geological Society men and Greenough in particular..
_	At the beginning of the story, the character of the White Witch appears in a sleigh drawn by two white reindeer, but there is nothing in the story that suggests they are connected to the White Stag, which is referred to by name in its chapter.
_	It is stated in the story that Ronnie takes the bus to Fordham Road, a well known street in the Bronx, hometown of Goldstein.
_	In Wilber's first proposal for the story that became "Space Seed", dated August 29, 1966—shortly before the first episode of "Star Trek" aired—the villain was Harold Erickson, an ordinary criminal exiled into space.
_	"TV Overmind" had reservations about this episode, noting that "this week's Once Upon a Time finally revealed Dr. Whale's true identity, but that discovery - and the story that played out in Storybrooke - made for a bit of a strange episode.
_	Editor Robert Greenberger wrote in his introduction to the story that "As the fourth year of the "Fantastic Four" came to a close, Stan Lee and Jack Kirby seemed to be only warming up.
_	He released a statement saying "suffice it to say now, that the story that has appeared in the press is factually incorrect and the charges are ridiculous".
_	As Joseph Nye commented, "in an information age, it is often the side which has the better side of the story that wins," this has resulted in a shift from old style diplomacy to encompass brand building and reputation management.
_	Equally untrustworthy is the story that the duke, suspecting an attachment between his niece Elizabeth Farnese and Astorga, dismissed the musician.
_	Although she denies having feelings for Negi, it has been hinted throughout the story that she harbors some form of love towards him, though it may just be brotherly, it has not been explicitly expressed.
_	Frank Valentini later released a statement stating "We are concluding the story that we set out to tell with Kyle and Fish.
_	He also said they "were very capable of telling the story that we wanted to tell independent of any of the other Marvel stories that are out there."
_	Plutarch cites Myrtis as the source for the story that explained why women were forbidden to set foot in a sacred grove dedicated to a local hero, Eunostos, in the Boeotian town of Tanagra.
_	Jaymes's screenplay "Unconditional" based on Joe Hoagland and the story that inspired the inception of Island Dolphin Care was recognized as a 2016 Semi-Finalist in the Academy of Motion Picture Arts & Sciences Nicholl Fellowship.
_	This was also the story that introduced Scrooge's private airplane.
_	He calls the presentation, artistry, animation and sound design masterful, in contrast to the story that didn't always deliver satisfying answers to the questions introduced early in the season, despite being more mature and sophisticated than the original show.
_	Some of the characters, and a lot of the story works quite well, but there are a couple of characters and bits of the story that either fall flat or just don’t work at all."
_	A biography of Benjamin “Scatman” Crothers seems to be the source of the story that Capone stayed in Terre Haute, but this can neither be confirmed nor denied.
_	The heart of the story that the Emperor tells is Aesop's fable, but it has now been adapted to end with the lesson not to count one's eggs before they are hatched.
_	At the end she told Alan Lomax about the parts of the story that she had not sung.
_	Scipio argues in the story that Sempronius' men needed the winter to train, suggesting that on the way to north Italy Sempronius may have raised two more legions of recruits, throwing them into battle under difficult physical circumstances against expert advice without training.
_	McClure was so moved by the story that he wrote a letter to the editor, which was published on the front page, denying personal responsibility for the billboard, blaming the incident on a campaign worker who had a personal grudge against deFuria.
_	Susan Bower said that as the "Neighbours" team was developing the storyline, they decided to add to the story that Paul's financial situation leads to him embezzling, which in turn leads to Diana arriving.
_	The series begins with the cities of Central and Keystone celebrating the return of, "Central City's Flash", Wonder Woman having used her government contacts to create the story that Barry was in witness protection to account for his resurrection.
_	There are forty six characters encountered through the story that can be recruited, each offering their own contribution to the story.
_	It's even STATED in print during the course of the story that Ulysses didn't 'get it.'"
_	"They would like to keep up the story that Fellini made me famous, that Fellini discovered me," she said in a 1999 interview with "The New York Times".
_	James Blish commented that while Clarke's narrative provided essential elements of the story that Kubrick ignored or glossed over, "The novel has very little of the poetry of the picture" and "lacks most of the picture's strengths", but that "it has to be read before one can understand the picture".
_	In his 2003 book, "Dusty in Memphis", critic Warren Zanes describes the idiosyncratic songwriting of Newman as "reinforcing the backbone of the story that gives [the album] its special shape".
_	Sir Henry Savile has sometimes been confounded with another Henry Savile, called Long Harry (1570–1617), who gave currency to the forged addition to the "Chronicle" of Asser which contains the story that King Alfred founded the University of Oxford.
_	The historian Phan Huy Lê, a renowned researcher of History of Vietnam also expressed his doubt about the real motive of the Lê Văn Thịnh's trial, reckoning that the traditional idea of accusing Lê Văn Thịnh was not really appropriate since the story that Lê Văn Thịnh changed into a tiger to kill the emperor could not happen.
_	Well, there is no one who does not believe the story that said that the three Virgins were found in a cave to which a young shepherd was mysteriously attracted.
_	Susan Rook says, "My proudest professional achievement remains uncovering the story that doesn't bear my name.
_	Promoting it as the story that would "out-"Quatermass" "Quatermass"", the book was published by Souvenir in February 1962.
_	After Richardson started the work on 10 November 1739, his wife and her friends became so interested in the story that he finished it on 10 January 1740.
_	Character wise, it was made to show Snake's experiences throughout the story that make him accept the title of Big Boss, further resembling his antagonist persona from the first "Metal Gear" game.
_	Thurlbeck also broke the story that Jeffrey Archer had committed perjury during his 1987 libel case against the "Daily Star".
_	Tale 7, "Of that which happened to a King and three Impostors" tells the story that Hans Christian Andersen made popular as "The Emperor's New Clothes".
_	Scott was the better wordsmith of the two, and the story that spread throughout the world was largely that told by him, with Amundsen's victory reduced in the eyes of many to an unsporting stratagem.
_	Well substantiated is the story that once after bathing Mahipati was performing the worship of his household gods when a messenger from the Muhammadan came to summon him to court on business, Mahipati sent word in return that he would be at his service after he was through his daily devotion.
_	Greenland was so impressed with the story that, without Clarke's knowledge, he sent an excerpt to his friend, the fantasy writer Neil Gaiman.
_	More likely is the story that Bob Carroll and his wife brought the story of the Beardsley family to Ball's attention after reading it in a local newspaper.
_	Editor Robert Greenberger wrote in his introduction to the story that, "As the fourth year of the Fantastic Four came to a close, Stan Lee and Jack Kirby seemed to be only warming up.
_	The notes on the back cover of the original 1959 LP are in the exaggerated style that was common at the time and present the story that the recording was live:
_	Responding to the band's concerns, Guggenheim said, "I tell the story that's in front of me, warts and all.
_	Dean Norris said in an interview with Zap2it regarding the dome "there's a lot more understanding of what it is, and that's part of the story that also starts really picking up in [episode 5], and really accelerates through to the end of the season, where the dome becomes a real character and the kids actually start to understand it."
_	The bonus material for "Dungeon Crawlin' Fools", for example, includes a nine-page opening to the story that Burlew felt introduced the characters in a more organic way than the online comic's cast page.
_	When Crasswell realizes Bolt is honoring the bet fair and square, Crasswell bribes Bolt's lawyers into fabricating the story that Bolt had lost his mind and has his property seized.
_	Hamill dropped his suit after folklorists working for Levine and Brown turned up archival versions of the story that had been collected before "Going Home" had been written.
_	However, he praised the second story, "Sleeping Lion", as making the volume worth the purchase and containing "the type of context in the story that got me to love "MARS" in the first place."
_	When Ruth finally asks her mother why she keeps talking about the chicken, her mother explodes with the story that Ruby strangled and hung the chicken in the coup for May to find.
_	This stone has disappeared, but among the Kers, who are now a Muslim clan, the story that their forefathers built the temple still remains.
_	It coincides roughly with the story that Dostoevsky described in his letter to Katkov, and written in a form of a diary or journal, corresponds to what eventually became part II.
_	During the filming of "Escapade in Florence", McGowan brought him the story that had been written by Tom Rowe, an American writer who was living in Paris.
_	The duo had broken the story that day, sold the pilot, and then sat down to write.
_	Thoughts of riding down the stairs in his bed, philosophical observations, and conjectures constitute large blocks of text and are written as tangential to the story that Malone is set on telling.
_	He tells the story that a student of Moses Sofer, Lazar Horowitz, Chief Rabbi of Vienna at the time and author of the responsa "Yad Elazer", needed the ruling because of a governmental attempt to ban circumcision completely if it included "metztitzah b'peh."
_	The film will return to this scene at this very point after the presentation of all the events of the story that precede it (1506–1525).
_	Paula Weinstein was impressed by Leavitt's "Blood Diamond" draft, but hired writers Ed Zwick and Marshall Herskovitz to rewrite the script again; by the time he had completed the script, Zwick had become so interested in the story that he agreed to direct the film as well.
_	It becomes obvious later in the story that Holden is desperate to find a way to experience pain again, risking his life for the chance to remove the alien artifact embedded in his nervous system and falling in love with a dominatrix female character.
_	Local legends enhance the importance of dogs to Sree Muthappan, such as the story that follows:
_	It relates the story that a mohel (who was suspected of transmitting herpes via metzizah to infants) was checked several times and never found to have signs of the disease and that a ban was requested because of the "possibility of future infections".
_	The government often possesses the power of the army and the secret police, to enforce the compliance of journalists with the will of the authorities to spread the story that the ruling authorities want people to believe.
_	After the success of "The Awful Truth" McCarey could have become, like Frank Capra , a Columbia contract director with a certain independence, but went his own way, selling the story that would become "The Cowboy And The Lady" to Sam Goldwyn and moving to RKO for three films.
_	"Mexico Set" continues the story that began with "Berlin Game", where Bernard Samson's wife Fiona was unmasked as a KGB double agent.
_	At one point he considered making the story that involved the Daleks, but felt the Weeping Angels were a "better fit".
_	Potvin subsequently told the press, "If you read the story that I wrote, you'll notice that I'm talking about it on a symbolic level . . .
_	Fuentes y Guzmán told the story that, when the church was being built, the workers found a thick silver lining, but they rushed to hide it from the Spaniards, so the latter could not use it.
_	She played Mainda in the story that tells the importance of parent-child communication in protecting youth as they navigate through the difficult period of adolescence.
_	Groff Conklin of "Galaxy Science Fiction" praised the novel as "Leinster at his exciting, skilled best," declaring "there is almost nothing in the story that is not first-rate."
_	AdventureClassicGaming said that the lackluster ending " leaves the player puzzling as to the whole point of the story that has been so elaborately created."
_	Troast suffered his roundest wallop early in October, when newspapers broke the story that Troast had asked New York's Tom Dewey to commute the sentence of Labor Extortionist Joey Fay."
_	Robert E. Howard's "Red Shadows", the story that introduced Solomon Kane, was the cover story.
_	Malathi Rangarajan from "The Hindu" claimed that "the intermission leaves you wondering at the frivolousness and facileness of the story that's very much unlike Bala.
_	In fact, the chronicler John of Worcester relates the story that it was Ælfric himself who accused Lyfing of being involved in Alfred's murder, although whether to curry favor with the new king Harthacnut or in order to acquire Worcester is unclear.
_	(Snow White: Fairy Tale or Truth?), claiming he had uncovered an account that may have inspired the story that first appeared in Grimm’s Fairy Tales.
_	Israeli officials at first were silent when enquiries were made, then issued a denial of all aspects of the story that related to Israel.
_	"Best Year" is about the story that brought me here and a hope and belief that the best is yet to come.
_	Osbert Lancaster tells the story that a tutor came by train twice a week (first class) from Aberystwyth to teach Betjeman.
_	Having visited together the archive of the local library, they steal an old book there, which contains a description of the story that Polina sees in her dreams.
_	Martin also said that "the series ends abruptly with some loose ends to the story that could leave viewers unsatisfied", but also said that it is "a horror series of exceptional merit".
_	Also the story that Aditya Varma was poisoned to death is positively disproved, for the temple records clearly state that Aditya Varma died at Padmanabhapuram in the Darpakulangara Palace and was cremated at Thiruvattar.
_	Dr. Nessel states specifically about the story that "a talking chicken creates anxiety and disorder in a community until people realize that just because a bird can speak, marvelous though that may be, it doesn't mean the bird knows what it's talking about.
_	The episode continues the story that began in the finale of the sixth season, "." Benjamin Sisko has taken extended leave on Earth; Kira Nerys, who has been promoted to the rank of Colonel, is in charge of Deep Space Nine; and Worf is still grieving for Jadzia.
_	In the 1980s, the "Bay Area Reporter" became a leading source of updated developments about the AIDS crisis; in 1983, the paper broke the story that up to 40 percent of people with AIDS in the United States were from racial and ethnic minorities, shattering a widely held stereotype that AIDS was a "white gay man's disease."
_	There is no evidence to support the story that they were made from ships' masts.
_	Starr discovers the meeting and he and his loyal henchmen shoot the both of them; spreading the story that the two killed each other in a gunfight.
_	Shatu makes a promise at the end of the story that she does not want to grow old or die in Long Island.
_	Davey C. Jones of Active Anime praised the anime, stating that, "Like "Pulp Fiction" changed the way we saw movies, "Baccano" will be the story that will change the way we see anime," concluding that "this all over the map anime is one unique and crazy ride from start to its never ending finale" and that ""Baccano" offers something truly unique in anime."
_	In a 2011 interview, Jones denied the story that she asked the press to be quiet so as not to wake her son.
_	In his memoir, Jerry Kramer, who played guard next to Ringo from 1958-1963, recounted the story that, following the 1963 season, Ringo showed up in Lombardi's office with an agent in tow, looking to negotiate a raise.
_	As mentioned above, both Cicero and Quintilian are sources for the story that Scopas, the Thassalian nobleman, refused to pay Simonides in full for a victory ode that featured too many decorative references to the mythical twins, Castor and Pollux.
_	The next day "Entertainment Weekly" broke the story that despite The CW "aggressively pursuing" her, Locklear had passed on the "Melrose Place" update, purportedly because "There wasn't a way to bring her back that made sense."
_	The next day, the newspapers follow up with the story that a protective spirit presides over the bridge.
_	Later she broke the story that she also claims sparked the resignation of Liberal Party leader Alexander Downer, allowing John Howard to regain the post and later become prime minister.
_	In fact, at the end of the movie, the story that took place is actually being told to another new couple stranded in their town.
_	On 13 November 2005, "The Sunday Times" broke the story that the African National Congress (ANC) leader Jacob Zuma was being investigated on rape charges.
_	It was during this August that he began working on the story that would become "The Shadow Kingdom", one of the most important works of his career.
_	Nonetheless, the webtoon continued resisting the flow of the story that Seong-moo wants, this time urging him to kill Kang Chul, thinking that he is a monster.
_	He tells the story that "She was wearing a pink corduroy pantsuit with a white scarf and matching patent leather platform shoes.
_	In March 2006, the newspaper broke the story that the "Mail on Sunday" newspaper had offered student reporters money to infiltrate and record meetings of student Islamic societies in the wake of the London bombings of 7 July 2005.
_	On its release, the film received negative reviews focusing on the story that some reviewers found was too similar to the 1984 film "The Karate Kid".
_	The length, size, and detail of the codex are of such extraordinary magnitude that legend surrounds its origin, specifically the story that it was written by one scribe in one night with help from the devil.
_	"Girls With Guns" gave the film a poor review, writing "Lesseos makes for a decent fighter and a tolerable actress, though the subplot which has her as a showgirl in Vegas is irrelevant, inane and positively wince-inducing...", "...it's the story that really kills this", and "...having a female lead is a nice idea, but much more effort is needed, rather than thinking this is sufficient in and of itself.
_	Meanwhile, Sammy arrives at Wright-Patterson AFB, and it is revealed over the course of the story that they are recruiting (truly, abducting) children into an army, telling them they are the last hope for fighting back against the Others.
_	According to Barbalho, Mônica told her family that she had decided to leave Ferreira, and to force the separation she invented the story that he was a homosexual, claiming that she had caught him in flagrante in bed with Edilson Carlos do Nascimento.
_	He tells his version of the story that led to his conviction.
_	Besson started writing the story that became "The Fifth Element" when he was 16 years old; he was 38 when the film opened in cinemas.
_	His first name is supposedly based on the story that Pennell was once told his large nose looked like the beak of an eagle.
_	Mike concocts several lies to get the good dates, fabricating the story that he is a wealthy shipping tycoon.
_	In 1939, in response to a question from the Oxford English Dictionary, the Admiralty made up the story that it stood for "Allied Submarine Detection Investigation Committee", and this is still widely believed, though no committee bearing this name has been found in the Admiralty archives.
_	Through the construction and ordering of the non-linear story Morris presents, he reveals an easy-to-follow narrative implicating Harris instead of Adams, not unlike the story that implicated Adams in the first place, because it presents an easy-to-believe retelling of history.
_	And new idols from the school, the "perfect idol" Elza Forte and Kirara Hanazono join the story that will feature the highest class dress type "Star Premium Rare Coord".
_	Before starting, Kofi Annan shared the story that when the first Secretary-General Trygve Lie left office, he told his successor, Dag Hammarskjöld, "You are about to take over the most impossible job on earth".
_	In 2009, inspired by an idea from his son Tom Hardy, Chips Hardy and Tom created the story that was to become the 2017 eight-part series" Taboo".
_	Orphans of Apollo is a documentary film directed and produced by Michael Potter, co-directed by Becky Neiman and edited by Todd Jones, which describes how a band of entrepreneurs tried to privatize the space station Mir and tells the story that led to the development of MirCorp.
_	Greenland was so impressed with the story that, without Clarke's knowledge, he sent an excerpt to his friend, the fantasy writer Neil Gaiman.
_	"The Insider" begins with an account of the story that ultimately resulted his dismissal from "Daily Mirror", namely the publication, in 2004, of several photographs purporting to show the abuse of Iraqi prisoners by British troops but which were subsequently found to have been faked.
_	In 2013, The Chicago Tribune collected its photos from those days, to tell the story that way.
_	It tells the story that in 1807 the canton Loma Lisa or Santiago belonged to the party of Chalatenango.
_	On November 9, 2012, Kessler broke the story that an FBI investigation led to the resignation of David H. Petraeus as CIA director.
_	Reporters, many far from the battle, spread the story that Grant had been drunk, falsely alleging that this had resulted in many of his men being bayoneted in their tents because of a lack of defensive preparedness.
_	According to Yokoyama and Satou, elements of the story that exhibited strong elements of Japanese culture included the watermelon eating scene, the part where Gin hits young Hotaru over the head with a stick, and the scene where young Hotaru gets scared at night when she sees the face of a "yōkai" in the patterns of the wood panels on the ceiling.
_	"You look at the story that happened in reality, and Judy Miller gets some sort of permission to speak and then speaks.
_	At that point Wolverine introduces into the story that Roughouse was descended from Rock Trolls.
_	On April 5, 2009, "The Hollywood Reporter" broke the story that Laura Leighton would be joining the series as her original "Melrose Place" character Sydney Andrews.
_	Garm’s beautiful distorted vocals act as outcries of a desperate man hidden, pushed in the background of the story that the instrumentation tells.
_	Hamill dropped his suit after folklorists working for Levine and Brown turned up archival versions of the story that had been collected before "Going Home" had been written.
_	Stevenson himself said in designing the idea of the story that, "It was to be a story for boys; no need of psychology or fine writing; and I had a boy at hand to be a touchstone.
_	However, after Toba pointed out one of the other two, Maeda made it clear that he wanted to do the story that would become "Charlotte".
_	One week after British newspaper "The Independent" broke the story that one of the three men ranking the boxers, Gordon Volkman, still had not heard that Morris was dead.
_	Schmitt is notable for breaking the story that the Obama administration was planning to reverse the Bush policy of holding captives in extrajudicial detention in American internment facilities in Afghanistan, without allowing them to learn why they were being held.
_	The hospital is empty, so it feels like a very ghostly place and that really feeds into the story that we're telling.
_	Sayer became so intrigued with the story that, 30 years later, he decided to launch his own private investigation.
_	In this version "Razumov", the story that would become Under Western Eyes, over the next two years, was intended to extend and rework ideas in the plot of "The Secret Agent".
_	Perhaps the story that William Provost was warned by a Colonel in the army and fled is correct ... only that it occurred in Antwerp prior to the Spanish Fury.
_	The name is derived from the story that giant Celtic warrior Fionn mac Cumhaill lost a hand in battle.
_	A major aspect of Celtic literature within “Lanval” is the theme itself, the story that a fairy mistress falls in love with a mortal.
_	Kuburas noted that the characters are "unreliable narrators" of the story that includes moments of magical realism.
_	On July 3, 2009, "The Politico" website uncovered the story that Weymouth had planned a series of exclusive dinner parties or "salons" at her private residence, to which she had invited prominent lobbyists, trade group members, politicians and business people.
_	One reviewer praised the presentation "from the warmly familiar world to the story that has a tendency to wrap you up in it".
_	A connection between Genius and Jupiter seems apparent in Plautus' comedy "Amphitryon", in which Jupiter takes up the looks of Alcmena's husband in order to seduce her: J. Hubeaux sees there a reflection of the story that Scipio Africanus' mother conceived him with a snake that was in fact Jupiter transformed.
_	In 1970, as a writer for the "Boston Phoenix", Steve broke the story that Polaroid's instant photo system was key to the apartheid pass system in South Africa.
_	It is based on the story that Nowra heard from an academic about ""a strange group of people in the wilds of South-West Tasmania just before World War II"".
_	Nature plays the underlying role of opposition to Silence’s lifestyle because she is trying to become entirely male but we see in the story that gender is tied very closely to biological sex.
_	It is also notable for being the story that Kafka first showed to his friend Max Brod and which convinced Brod that Kafka should further pursue his writing.
_	We learn at the end of the story that after the final shot, Silvio returned to the military and was killed in battle.
_	G. S. Kumar of "The Times of India" reviewed the film and gave it a 3.5/5 rating, and wrote, "With a good script and narration, director Guruprasad has done a good job by weaving the story that has comedy, sentiment, attachment and detachment in life."
_	Despite the name it was based on "The Lord of the Rings" rather than "The Hobbit"; but it included only the parts of the story that the hobbits had witnessed themselves (hence the title).
_	The studio was also concerned with the horror aspect of the plot, and assured exhibitors: “Don’t by any chance infer from the story that the picture has a gruesome touch.
_	James Frenkel has written, "When I first read Peter Orullian's early draft of The Unremembered, I was attracted by the characters, and then by mysteries in the story that made me feel I absolutely had to find out what was going on.
_	Author Pullman publicly supported these changes, saying that "every film has to make changes to the story that the original book tells—not to change the outcome, but to make it fit the dimensions and the medium of film".
_	On 22 November, German newspapers were filled with the story that the assassin, Georg Elser, had been funded by the British Intelligence Service, while the organiser of the crime was Otto Strasser.
_	Among the last of his labors was the defense of the orthodoxy of his former pupil, Thomas Aquinas, whose death in 1274 grieved Albert (the story that he travelled to Paris in person to defend the teachings of Aquinas can not be confirmed).
_	The process of writing the story is meant to parallel the events in the story itself; Borges writes in an afterword to the story that his attempt to understand Averroës was as doomed as Averroës's attempt to understand drama.
_	The short series end with Mater leaving the scene, often followed by characters or references to the story that was being told, putting up a possibility that the story might have been real.
_	Heidi explains it as: ""The Puzzle" is a concept album and it continues the story that started on the debut album called "Behind the Black Veil".
_	She was so touched with the story that later, she could repeat the entire text by heart.
_	"Blender" describes the song's sonic texture as, "so icy and desolate it should come with a pair of snowshoes" while PopMatters commented that "... it's the tone of the story that leaves the impression, not the stories themselves.
_	Dil Se Diya Vachan is an Indian television series based on the story that showcases a powerful true life story about the deep love, trust, bonding and attachment between a mother-in-law and a daughter-in-law.
_	Dr. Luke stated in an interview for the story that it was the latter track that caught his attention, saying "when you're listening to 100 CDs, that kind of and chutzpah stand out."
_	In "The Four Men: A Farrago" (1912), Hilaire Belloc recounts the story that at Halloween the fairies come out into the woods to dance in 'fairy rings'.
_	In November 2007, Norwegian newspapers published the story that a Facebook group had been set up, dedicated to collecting money which would eventually go to an assassin, should one be located.
_	"Ego the Loving Planet", the story that ran in "" #12, featured Ego, and was praised by Ray Tate of ComicsBulletin for its simultaneous inventiveness and logical sense.
_	She hears the story that if one truly loves the deep sea, then a mermaid will appear at the depths of the sea, and will lead a diver to an enchanted place.
_	On February 24, 2009, TMZ was the first to break the story that, out of the 1.6 billion Chicago's Northern Trust Bank received in federal bailout money, recipients of the money subsequently spent non-TARP dollars entertaining clients in Los Angeles at the House of Blues venue that featured performances by Chicago, Earth Wind and Fire, and Sheryl Crow and gift bags from Tiffany & Co.
_	The pressure placed on producing an heir is illustrated by the story that when an astrologer suggested Charles' sterility was due to his failure to say goodbye to his father, Mariana had Philip IV's body disinterred to allow him to do so.
_	I came across the story that he claimed to be similar to that of "Adaminte Makan Abu".
_	In March, German magazine "GameStar" broke the story that "Settlers III" would be the first game in the series to feature online multiplayer.
_	Initial reports claimed that Kristi Myst somehow touched Francine and that prompted the incident, but Francine herself has since gone on record as saying that she was never grabbed or in any other way touched by any of the XPW crew, and other eyewitnesses support the story that Francine never had a hand laid on her.
_	I remember having read in the paper the story that Steve was leaving.
_	On his album "Solo Acoustic, Vol. 1," Browne relays the story that the song was written "having spent some time with some people who were planning to sail away...
_	Symeon of Durham relates the story that Edmund was a monk of Durham Cathedral, and that he was chosen as bishop because a strange voice that came from the tomb of Saint Cuthbert insisted that Edmund be selected as the next bishop.
_	It is purported in the story that sightings of the ship tend to happen on cold and windy winter nights, with the ship, fully engulfed in flames, appearing on the river near the same locations where the disaster occurred.
_	In a 15-minute talk to what was termed The Heartland Institute's Fourth International Conference on Climate Change, Delingpole humorously quipped in 2010 that the Climategate was "the story that would change my life and, quite possibly, save Western civilisation from the greatest threat it has ever known."
_	Des Maizeaux mentions the story that Hales assisted Laud in the second edition (1639) of his "Conference" with John Percy.
_	One of them is the story that in 1896 the authorities proclaimed a ban on publication of any newspaper without executive authorization, which led to an uprising of the citizens.
_	Yukino claims at the end of the story that she will get revenge on them in perfectly legal ways.
_	The head of the Temerian special forces, Vernon Roche, interrogates Geralt and learns the story that led from Geralt being Foltest's right-hand man to a prisoner.
_	All of the lines that Rinaldi draws between the story that she has created and the actual world are whimsy and nothing else.
_	Bribing porters with the story that there was treasure on the mountain, he approached Aconcagua via the Rio Volcan, making two attempts on the peak by the north-west ridge and reaching an altitude of 6,500 metres.
_	Chiajna Monastery is the name of a ruined church situated on the outskirts of Bucharest, Romania, which is the subject of many legends, including the story that it is cursed.
_	A secret agent arrives in America from Moscow with the story that robots identical to humans in appearance and behaviour have been developed by Them and that ten have already been infiltrated into America.
_	Adherents of meme theory see the similarity as more fundamental: each story advocates a certain power structure, which has led people in power to support the story that favors them, often oppressively and often using violence.
_	He recreated the role of Joe Bullitt in Orson Welles's "Mercury Theatre on the Air" adaptation of the story that aired October 16, 1938.
_	In 2000, the "Cardinal" broke the story that university officials had digitally inserted a black student’s face into a photograph of white Badger football fans.
_	They first gained national exposure in 1949 when the news wires carried the story that Fountain members had been among the first to offer aid to the victims of Standard Air Lines Flight 897R, which crashed into the Simi Hills, killing 35 of the 48 people on board.
_	It is one thing to worship a picture, it is another by means of pictures to learn thoroughly the story that should be venerated.
_	Marabou provides a brief introduction to the story that is about to unfold, which begins with a historically significant event: the birth of Babar the elephant.
_	Mirages collects, for the first time, the story that was cut from all of Nin’s other published diaries, particularly volumes 3 and 4 of "The Diary of Anaïs Nin", which cover the same time period.
_	The Rabbis told the story that God, Daniel, and Nebuchadnezzar conspired to keep Daniel out of the fiery furnace.
_	In April 2009, Stein, writing for CQ Politics, broke the story that Representative Jane Harman had been wiretapped discussing aid for AIPAC defendants.
_	Bette and Dot (Sarah Paulson) confirm to Elsa (Jessica Lange) the story that their mother's killer matches the description of the others.
_	In 1847 Alphonse de Lamartine even invented the story that Renaudin had been killed heroically, cut in half by a cannon shot like Dupetit-Thouars.
_	Vitaris praised the episode's balance of humor and horror, noting "Although 'Leonard Betts' is not a comedy, the three writers take such pleasure in the story that you buy the situation.
_	Most sources ascribe the rebuilding of the house to Godwin, whose crest dated 1609 is over the main entrance, although Davies states that "the story that it was built by [Godwin] is without foundation."
_	Scott Goddard published a contemporary commentary that discussed the changes to the story that Fokine made to prepare a workable ballet scenario.
_	At "60 Minutes Wednesday", Mapes produced the story that announced the US military's investigation of the Abu Ghraib prison scandal, and the story that exposed Strom Thurmond's unacknowledged bi-racial daughter, Essie Mae Washington, winning a Peabody Award in 2005 for the former.
_	W.R. Burnett, who wrote the story that "The Whole Town's Talking" was based on, also wrote "Little Caesar", which was the film that catapulted Robinson to stardom, and "High Sierra", the film of which was a significant step for Humphrey Bogart in moving from playing gangsters to romantic lead.
_	Alexander had stated that "Our job is foreign intelligence" and that "those who would want to weave the story that we have millions or hundreds of millions of dossiers on people, is absolutely false...
_	By the 1890s Dorzhiev had begun to spread the story that Russia was the mythical land of Shambhala to the north; that its Czar might be the one to save Buddhism and that the White Tsar was an emanation of White Tara, raising hopes that he would support Tibet and its religion.
_	On July 16, 2012, BetOnHockey.com broke the story that Leeb signed on to play hockey in the regulated UK gambling market with the Coventry Blaze of the EIHL.
_	When the story that the mother had read before was heard, the sucking of the pacifier was modified.
_	This did not occur during the story that the infant had not heard before.
_	Another reviewer described that "the messy screenplay in the second half ruins the story that admittedly has enough potential for romance, laughs, sentiments and action".
_	So I’m fascinated by what happens when you take a person in a very ordinary, textured world and the story that surfaces actually mimics the process of awareness that is right at the heart of that world…
_	Sell of PAL Gaming Network stated that the voice acting is "up there with the best" in comparison to other games, and that the cut scenes are "superbly voiced, but it’s the narrator of the story that is the most professionally convincing throughout."
_	Bede mentions the story that Oswald "ended his life in prayer": he prayed for the souls of his soldiers when he saw that he was about to die.
_	Bridging the story of the fourth album "Seediq Bale", which took place in 1930, and the story of the fifth album "Mirror Of Retribution", which took place in 1947, the latest album "Takasago Army", which recounts the story that occurred from 1940 to 1945, was actually the last puzzle of Chthonic's trilogy."
_	Canby expressed in a review for "The New York Times" how he would like to know more about which parts of the story that were derived directly from Andrée's journal and which were speculation.
_	According to the story that he had then told, he had traveled down to Hell as a wolf, where the farmer, who was a practicing Satanic witch, had beat him on the nose with a broomstick decorated with horses' tails.
_	Original author Masami Kurumada left him free to write the story that would act as a prequel to the original manga.
_	Pythagoras's name led him to be associated with Pythian Apollo; Aristippus of Cyrene explained his name by saying, "He spoke (, ) the truth no less than did the (, )", and Iamblichus tells the story that the Pythia prophesied that his pregnant mother would give birth to a man supremely beautiful, wise, and beneficial to humankind.
_	From 1715 comes the story that accountant Lorenz Tautphäus was taking in “cloth money” ("Tuchgeld").
_	Francisca keeps the story that Manel told and refuses to present a complaint against her nephew.
_	While having mixed feelings at first, Janice slowly reveals throughout the story that she is more and more willing to join her husband on Mars while still lamenting about leaving behind all that is on Earth.
_	Any part of the story that the interrogator disputes is challenged; the player is executed after a number of these "challenges".
_	The subsequent episodes begin with a recap of the story that has gone before.
_	With the same spirit that made her create Kindred, in 2015, Ushkowitz executive produced the documentary "Twinsters", a film showing the story that connected Samantha and Anaïs, identical twin sisters separated at birth.
_	It is very pronounced throughout the story that Simon will not live for another year.
_	Newton himself often told the story that he was inspired to formulate his theory of gravitation by watching the fall of an apple from a tree.
_	The nun spills the story that Maya was looking for.
_	Before the Carolingian period there is no trace of the story that St. Martial was sent to Gaul by St. Peter.
_	The idea of a motif has become used more broadly in discussing literature and other narrative arts for an element in the story that represents a theme.
_	In addition to major sporting events, Hirshey covered soccer, and in 1975 broke the story that Pelé was coming to New York to play for the New York Cosmos.
_	It is hinted in the story that submission to the unnatural structure is a natural process, and that, as is made particularly evident in the metaphor presented in "To Build a Fire," the natural is always capable of deconstructing the unnatural, requiring reconstruction and further development of the "I."
_	Torey realizes through the course of the story that truth changes with each person's perception.
_	Referring to the story that Christopher Marlowe may have faked his death and then written under the pseudonym of William Shakespeare, Marlow tells Eve that Adam would have been the perfect inspiration for his "Hamlet".
_	Taff's Well is the original location of the story that inspired the film "The Englishman Who Went Up a Hill But Came Down a Mountain", by Ivor Monger and Christopher Monger.
_	On April 17 the "Defense News" broke the story that the "Carl Vinson" and its escorts were 3,500 miles from Korea engaged in scheduled joint Royal Australian Navy exercises in the Indian Ocean.
_	The Danish National Council released a detailed explanation of the real Olaf's death in 1387 to contradict the story that had spread around the Baltic.
_	According to an interview with Enders on Episode 17 of the Voice & Verse Podcast, there were multiple versions of the story that were recorded and considered.
_	The part of the story that is rarely told is that they were married not long after she composed the song.
_	Had Canadians known this in December of 2008, more of us may have questioned the story that Ms. Erickson had conspired with a Liberal MP against a former Conservative prime minister."
_	Once the story is introduced, the network or local station may, if possible, choose to continue to show a live shot of the anchor or may cut away to video or images of the story that is being followed during the broadcast.
_	"The Bell" broke the story that the government was considering serf emancipation in July 1857, adding that the government lacked the ability to resolve the issue.
_	Film critic Roger Ebert said, "Some people have fallen in love with the story that Herman Mankiewicz…happened to know that 'Rosebud' was William Randolph Hearst's pet name for an intimate part of Marion Davies' anatomy."
_	Brock was displeased, however, at the treatment she received from the filmmakers: she earned almost nothing from her promotional work and learned that Arthur Penn, the film's director and co-writer, inserted fictional material into the story that she felt reflected poorly on her.
_	It is revealed later in the story that the artifact found in the sea is actually a cradle that contains seeds with altered superhumans, which were extracted from earth millions of years ago and were altered so they could live with other species (including the submarine snakes) on earth.
_	It is mentioned in the story that the eating of the semi-intelligent natives is forbidden, although some humans of the settlement of Nivia ignore this rule and eat this prohibited meat in secret.
_	He later performed the song with a big band arrangement, which he admitted was "a desecration to people who love the tenseness of the original recording", but explained that "the story that's going on, and the musical allusions in the original arrangements, relate very much to the realization of this song as an orchestral piece using the film music feeling and the swing rhythms of '50s detective shows."
_	The history of the Paradise Lost window and the story that is told by it is given in the book "Paradise Lost Windows: A Story in Lead and Light" by Shirley J. Kilpatrick and M. Howard Mattsson-Bozé, two Geneva professors.
_	This represents the story that his hand remained incorrupt after his death because he had used it to give food to a starving man.
_	These include the story that Orson Welles began work on a Batman movie in the 1940s, which was to feature James Cagney as the Riddler and Marlene Dietrich as Catwoman; the persistent rumour that the rock singer Courtney Love is the granddaughter of Marlon Brando; and the idea that in a famous 1970s poster of Farrah Fawcett, there is a subliminal sexual message concealed in the actress' hair.
_	Running parallel to Taylor's story is the story that Hannah writes, about the five kids in the 1980s.
_	The characters of Fred (Scrooge's nephew) and Elizabeth, his fianceé (his wife in the novelette), were greatly expanded in order to work in a romantic angle to the story that Dickens did not intend.
_	With a minimal budget of US$300,000, a virtue was made of necessity and the story that developed staged the action within the span of a day within the confines of a radio station.
_	The name was first used in 1805, and almost certainly seems associated with the story that a rock on the plateau above the headland resembled the Duke of Portland.
_	It is even described at one point during the story that the Devil (who is referred as the Evil One in most adaptions) has gone into her mind before her villainous breakdown.
_	The other will continue the story that comes after, leading up to Tex's last ride into the sunset".
_	It was published by Marvel Comics, and is notable for being the story that introduced the characters Galactus and the Silver Surfer.
_	Smith records the story that a few years after his death, some of Macrae's friends assembled at Orangefield and decided to remove his bones from the Monkton churchyard and to place them in the mausoleum.
_	First was the story that tied the origin of Ekiti to Ife.
_	In June 2007 Simon Lederman was interviewed and credited on the Jeremy Vine programme on BBC Radio 2 and also in the BBC's internal staff magazine "Ariel" for breaking the story that the London 2012 animated Olympics logo caused epileptic attacks in some individuals.
_	I think we’ve telegraphed so much that the New Gods are coming upon a rebirth, and the story that we’re telling with them now is a continuation of the story that was established when Kirby first conceived the concept.
_	Described as "clubfoot" for having one leg shorter than the other, and called separately, "young lord" and simply "Byron", it is not till late in the story that he's revealed to be paying penalty for some kind of crime involving a woman named, "Ogusta".
_	He gives more credence to the story that Corbet committed suicide to avoid the shame of defeat, that he "cut the bandages from his amputated limb, and suffered himself to bleed to death."
_	Waddell, as a friend, warns Carter about the investigation to keep her out of trouble, but she breaks the story that the office of the district attorney (D.A.) is investigating Gallagher's attempt to bribe the D.A.
_	In August 1824, the aging Carpani marshaled his efforts in defense of the composer Antonio Salieri, at a time when the story that Salieri had poisoned Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart was circulating broadly.
_	If the Lord truly has foresight (which He does), and if He planned the story that would unfold on earth (which He did), then wouldn’t it make sense that He would create the continents to oblige?"
_	Its attested provenance begins with him, since the story that it was owned by Emperor Rudolf II rests on a single piece of unsubstantiated hearsay, related at second hand in a letter to Athanasius Kircher.
_	A bully kicked sand into Siciliano's face at a beach when he was a youth, according to the story that he always told.
_	A well-known story surrounding one of Loudermilk's songs is that, when he was asked by the "Viva! NashVegas" radio show about the origins of the Raiders' hit song "Indian Reservation", he fabricated the story that he wrote the song after his car was snowed in by a blizzard and he was taken in by Cherokee Indians.
_	It was directed by Victor Schertzinger, who also wrote the music and lyrics of the original songs, as well as the story that Austin Parker's screenplay is based on.
_	Harris began working on the sequel due to feeling "that it wasn't finished as a story, that there was one chapter in the story that might continue".
_	Cosmonauts took Reinette Simirenko into space, lending popularity to the story that this variety originated in the garden of Ukrainian Leo Simirenko
_	It is thought that he may have given the building the name, and started the story that its timber frame was constructed in Holland and then brought over and assembled in England.
_	Bryson also debunks several well-known baseball legends, including Babe Ruth's called shot and the story that Abner Doubleday invented baseball.
_	They view Lily both as a cash prize and, possibly, as a parallel for Eva (the Cheyenne-tattooed prostitute at Hell on Wheels), because Durant has circulated the story that Lily was "sullied" by her attackers.
_	On October 21, 2008, BTTF.com broke the story that Universal will be releasing each of the "Back to the Future" films individually.
_	Having convinced Florenz Ziegfeld, the producer of "Whoopee!", that it is the story that counts, Felix set about to devise dances that unfolded gradually and consisted of plot development and climax as if they were dramatic units themselves instead of "a mere pounding of the feet and kicking to music."
_	Precautions are rightly taken when gathering hellebore, and men cannot dig it up for long; whereas the story that the peony must be dug up at night for fear that a woodpecker will watch and cause the man a rectal prolapse is a mere superstition.
_	As late as 1951, the painting was used in advertising for Wyeth pharmaceuticals, which repeated the story that Queen Victoria commissioned it, adding: "the pictured child recovered despite the inadequacies of her humble home–a tribute to her doctor's genius and to the progress of medical science".
_	In 2006, neurologist Malcolm Shaner, assisted by Kent Vliet, a researcher at the University of Florida, decided to test the story that crocodiles or their close relatives alligators and caimans were likely to "weep" while feeding.
_	This reading is based on the story that the students learned in step two - sometimes it can be the same story, and sometimes it uses the same language structures but with different content.
_	The writer Mark Twain spent 88 seminal days in the county, during which time he heard the story that became "The Celebrated Jumping Frog of Calaveras County" in the Angel Hotel in 1865.
_	In the former film, nature becomes fantastic; in this film it is the story that resides beneath the surface that has a life of its own as it is so aptly represented using animation."
_	The earliest use of this device as a twist ending in a murder mystery was in "The Three Apples", a medieval "Arabian Nights" tale, where the protagonist Ja'far ibn Yahya discovers by chance a key item towards the end of the story that reveals the culprit behind the murder to be his own slave all along.
_	With Father Gomez (Victor Jory) by his side, the story that he's being pursued by the police for another killing is told in a flashback.
_	Gray tells the story that at one poorly attended meeting Nelson Mandela turned up.
_	He is the only character in the story that possesses actual superpowers.
_	Wineblum wrote the story that surrounds this discovery in his first book titled “Tatarî Oğuz Effendi in Basel – Reminiscences of a Journalist”.
_	Whilst it was working in partnership with Channel 4 news, Exaro also, in July 2013, broke the story that Murdoch was aware for years that his journalists were bribing public officials.
_	In contrast to these comments, Biblical scholars Joel Baden of Yale Divinity School and Candida Moss of University of Birmingham, who wrote the book "Bible Nation: The United States of Hobby Lobby", expressed concerns about the museum's mission saying, "They have misled the public at large by promoting a curriculum and a museum that tell only the story that the Greens want to tell, without acknowledging that scholars and experts have spent decades, indeed centuries, laboring to provide very different accounts of the Bible and its history."
_	The Hollywood Reporter Maggie Brown of the Guardian broke the story that Rosencrantz had decided to leave post-integration of the channels as she felt there was no suitable role for her in the new structure at Sky.
_	Kinukitty, writing for The Comics Journal-hosted blog Hooded Utilitarian, praised the artwork, and said of the story that " if you like your yaoi touchy, ill-tempered, and cross, with a twist of twisty, I think you’ll be into it".
_	The story of Cardinal Ammanati that he meant to take the name "Formosus II" ("handsome"), but was persuaded not to, is more often repeated than the story that he was dissuaded from "Marcus", being Venetian and the Cardinal of San Marco, because it was also the war-cry of Venice.
_	In the event, the story that Vickers was building submarines was leaked by a Glasgow newspaper in February, and confirmed by the Admiralty in March.
_	Markham suggests the princes were executed under Henry's orders between 16 June and 16 July 1486, claiming that it was only after this date that orders went out to circulate the story that Richard had killed the princes, and that the princes' mother, Elizabeth Woodville, knew that this story was false, and so Henry had to have her silenced.
_	For several weeks, news stations carried the story that the Michael Dunahee case had been re-opened after several strong leads, perhaps bringing a conclusion to what happened to him.
_	Almodóvar says of the story that "it is precisely about death...
_	Chalkokondyles retells the story that, before making his attack, Vlad went freely into the Turkish camp disguised as a Turk, and wandered around to find the location of the Sultan's tent and learn about his organization.
_	Over Ted's various visits, the Once-ler recounts the story that when he was a young man, he departed his family to find good material for his Thneed invention and make a business.
_	The classical story is only a thread in the story that Altman is telling…
_	Her relationship with Maya is strained at first, reminiscent to that of Shawn and Chet Hunter from "Boy Meets World", but they become much closer after Shawn reveals to Maya in "Girl Meets Master Plan" that Maya's father deserting her family was not Katy's fault; Katy maintained the story that she drove him away believing that a girl should think well of her father.
_	The DVD release contains unused footage and cuts from the story that are packaged with the original title sequence – naming the story as "The Vampire from Space".
_	He also bemoans such a state of society as was suggested in the story that would foster degraded forms of writing and, more hauntingly, nurture extreme willingness to conform to orders without concern for consequences.
_	Shaw is the author of "Light of Other Days" (August 1966), the story that introduced the concept of slow glass, through which the past can be seen.
_	In "The Fall of Gondolin", Tolkien has him slay three Balrogs before his final duel, but lose the use of his shield arm in the process; however, this is one of the elements in the story that are at odds with Tolkien's later ideas.
_	Alternatively, a Midrash tells the story that between King Agag's capture by Saul and his killing by Samuel, Agag fathered a child, from whom Haman in turn descended.
_	Of particular interest is a mention in the story that "integration" of communities was a failure and the technology could be used to allow people to dwell "among their own kind".
_	Writing toward the end of the third century BC, Quintus Fabius Pictor, the father of Roman history, related the story that the Romans were descended from Aeneas, via his son Ascanius, the founder of Alba Longa.
_	DeDapper helped break the story that their confessions were coerced after the true killer (who was connected with the Temple) was identified as the result of a random traffic stop.
_	Although it's considered not to do anything with original franchise, the game tells the story that happened before the original "Imperium Galactica" title as was planned from the beginning.
_	According to Irenaeus, his teacher Polycarp (a disciple of the Apostle John) told the story that John the Apostle rushed out of a bathhouse at Ephesus without bathing when he found out Cerinthus was inside, exclaiming, "Let us fly, last even the bath-house fall down, because Cerinthus, the enemy of the truth, is inside!"
_	Nic Baisley of "Film Snobbery" wrote "The fairly wide variety of locations used in the movie also add that sense of realism to the story that is generally left out in some films.
_	The short story “Ed Signs the Pledge” in "Argosy", June 1944 was reportedly the story that Arthur Lubin used to sell the concept for the Mister Ed comedy series to TV executives.
_	In 1982, told the story that he in Sting fashion had cheated mob by using telephone to get early race
_	The Russian scientist Stepan Krasheninnikov was told the story that it was once a mountain in Kamchatka, but the neighbouring mountains became jealous of its beauty and exiled it to the sea, leaving behind Kurile Lake in southern Kamchatka.
_	Other reports say he died on 25 February near Clear Lake, California of poor health and the hardships of his journey, while another casts doubt on the story that his companions buried him, instead suggesting he survived at least briefly at an Indian village.
_	The local sheriff (Walker) spreads the story that there is a lone savage bear on the loose.
_	("The One and Only" in "Moon" is used ironically and is related to the story that unwinds.
_	Ludwig von Pastor rejected the story that he was of Jewish descent, and had been baptised at an early age, taking the name of Johannes Pauli from his godfather.
_	Yolanda suspects Adriana, whom she does not remember, and completes to Rogelio the story that Sergio briefly told him: Don Alberto always suspected about Adrian's sexuality.
_	The President believed that the blunder of our first statement...[assumed] the plane was destroyed, Accordingly, we thought the story that a NASA weather reconnaissance plane was missing was a good cover story.
_	In writing his commentaries, Jin firmly believed that the story that was written should be read on its own terms, apart from reality.
_	In other words, it is the story that is written that matters, rather than how well that story emulates reality.
_	S. Reinach suggests that the story that Salmoneus was struck by lightning was due to the misinterpretation of a picture, in which a Thessalian magician appeared bringing down lightning and rain from heaven.
_	Urasuke Ayano is writing and drawing the story that takes place several years before Tarō Diffendorfer's scenario.
_	D'Arcy in turn threatened to horsewhip Aston, who is said to have gone in fear of him for some time after, although the story that he fled to England and stayed there until after D'Arcy's death is not borne out by the evidence.
_	Puck greatly enjoys the play and repeats the theme of the story that while the play does not directly reflect history or even some of the personalities of the characters it is still considered a true reflection of "reality"; toward the end of the play, he disables the actor representing himself, and represents himself on stage.
_	Supporters of Ferdinand spread the story that prime minister Godoy had betrayed Spain to Napoleon.
_	In the story that follows, the Bear Clan assumes the foundation role for the whole nation, and when they land they find the nation's friendship tribe, the Menominee.
_	Among the essayists, some were positive about the relationship; for example, Amy A. Kass wrote about the story that "it is wise and it is true about giving and about motherhood," and her husband Leon R. Kass encourages people to read the book because the tree "is an emblem of the sacred memory of our own mother's love."
_	The choice of the nine most significant dates in Yugoslav history, the plot of the story that unfolds amongst these dates, as well as the genres of each of the chapters in "Kingdom" form a unique literary experiment.
_	Mac (McDaniel), the city editor, assigns Alma (Brunette), a woman reporter, the task of securing Yvonne's confession to verify the story that was given to the newspaper.
_	Vaughn tells the story that the first time he fought professionally in Mexico, the fans cheered enthusiastically but he couldn't make out what they were saying and he thought they were cheering him on.
_	The producers of the 2005 film hoped to tap into the large religious audience revealed by the success of Mel Gibson's film "The Passion of the Christ", and at the same time hoped to produce an adventure film that would appeal to secular audiences; but they (and the reviewers as well) worried about aspects of the story that could variously alienate both groups.
_	However, the story that the amphitheatre was spoliated for the construction of the Royal Palace of Caserta is false.
_	Early on in "History of Armenia", Movses had stated that Satenik had fallen in love with Argavan, a descendant of a race of dragons ("vishaps", in Armenian), but the remainder of the story that was sung by the minstrels is missing and believed to be lost.
_	The part of the story that deals with the "satanic verses" was based on accounts from the historians al-Waqidi and al-Tabari.
_	It is also improper to dance in church, as the story that the narrator is about to tell demonstrates.
_	In another controversy, he aided Democratic nominee Al Smith in the 1928 presidential election by spreading the story that Republican nominee Herbert Hoover had socialized with a black woman; Mississippi voters, considering whether to maintain their allegiance to the Democratic Party in light of Smith's Catholicism and support for the repeal of Prohibition largely remained with Smith after Bilbo's appeal to racism.
_	Tommaso Campanella, in a work published in Lyons in 1629, tells the story that Naboth was living in Padua, Italy, when he deduced from his own horoscope that he was about to enter a period of personal danger, so he stockpiled an adequate supply of food and drink, closed his blinds, and locked his doors and windows, intending to stay in hiding until the period of danger had passed.
_	Firishta tells the story that, when he was a young man in campaign against Gawulgur, "there was taken among the captives a young lady of exquisite beauty, who was presented as an acceptable gift to him by one of his officers."
_	The celebration takes a different form in Capena from that observed in most parts of Italy as it is based on a symbolic re-enactment of the story that Mary lost her Son and searched for him for three days before the pair were emotionally reunited.
_	Here ends the "Short Narration", the story that Barbara told Scheuner about her early years.
_	"The Holy Blood and the Holy Grail" (1982) seems to be the source of the story that the Holy Grail was found by the Order and taken to Scotland during the suppression of the order in 1307, where it remains buried beneath Rosslyn Chapel.
_	The abstract is the summary of the story that usually comes at the very beginning of a story.
_	For example, the Shabbat is said to testify to the story that Hashem created the world in six days and rested on the seventh day and declared it holy.
_	His father once told him the story that once as a child he came home from school to discover that his parents had moved house!
_	The series has been compared to "Fifty Shades of Grey" because both originated as "Twilight" fan fiction, with the International Business Times reporting that "Gabriel's Inferno" differs in that it bears "few similarities to the story that inspired it".
_	However original sources point to this narrative not being the case and indicate Smith was used by John Farey Sr., another ‘practical man’(i.e. mineral surveyor), to prosecute Farey’s own grievances against the Geological Society in an article in The Philosophical Magazine by which he both started and fuelled the story that Smith was disrespected and there was ill-feeling towards him by the Geological Society men and Greenough in particular.
_	On the other hand, there is practically nothing in the rest of the story that is inconsistent with an Arabian or Middle Eastern setting.
_	Believing that the memoir evaded discussion about intersex individuals' anatomy and emotions, Eugenides concluded that he would "write the story that I wasn't getting from the memoir".
_	According to Herodotus, Dicaeus an Athenian exile told the story that, he and the former Spartan king Demaratus, who had become an advisor to the Persian king Xerxes I, witnessed a miraculous event which Dicaeus interpreted as predicting the defeat of the Persian fleet at the Battle of Salamis (480 BC), during the Greco-Persian Wars:
_	Steven Tyler of Aerosmith relates the story that in the 1950s the two students practiced in the home of his grandmother Constance Neidhart Tallarico.
_	John W. Campbell of "Astounding Science Fiction" so disliked the story that he rejected it with the chemical formula for butyl mercaptan, which Campbell knew the chemistry graduate student author knew.
_	Silver pointed out hints in the story that the governess might have gained previous knowledge of Quint's appearance in non-supernatural ways.
_	The first of these was William of Norwich (d.1144), whose death and cult were probably an influence on the story that grew up around the death of Robert.
_	In December 2011, "Nursing in Practice" broke the story that legal costs for negligence cases against nurses have trebled in the past five years.
_	Mask, playing off the story that the two were friends in season one, before Dragon Lee took over the "Místico" character.
_	Burns was researching the origin of the song 'The Lass of Peaty's Mill' and during a visit to Robertland Sir William Cunninghame of Robertland told the story that the Earl of Loudoun was out walking with his son and the poet Allan Ramsay, at a place called 'Patie's Mill', when they were all taken by the beauty of a young country girl who was working the hay.
_	It becomes clear towards the end of the story that the narrator, who plays no part in the events, is an acquaintance of Mr. Wace.
_	Phillips told a "BBC Online" reporter that the crew faced multiple challenges with the episode, including making sure that the script "really held water and did justice to the story that we really want to tell."
_	After rifling through his possessions, Sage also finds the story that her grandmother wrote in Auschwitz on the back of photos of dead Jews which kept her alive through the Holocaust, which had been taken by Reiner's brother Franz, who had made up his own ending to the story as he was desperate for closure.
_	"Diegetic", in the cinema, typically refers to the internal world created by the story that the characters themselves experience and encounter: the narrative "space" that includes all the parts of the story, both those that are and those that are not actually shown on the screen (such as events that have led up to the present action; people who are being talked about; or events that are presumed to have happened elsewhere or at a different time).
_	Blake sees this as the story that will help him break into the bigtime - "The story of a young woman, doing the right thing under impossible circumstances."
_	Avisa's story appears to be a variation of the story that is described in Shakespeare's sonnets: both involve a triangle of love interests.
_	In September 1987, the publication broke the story that van Gogh's painting "Irises" was about to be auctioned.
_	The art critic and historian Robert Hughes contrasted Sigismondo's patronage of art with the story that his excommunication was "a distinction he earned by trussing up a Papal emissary, the fifteen-year-old Bishop of Fano, and publicly sodomising him before his applauding army in the main square of Rimini".
_	This is the story that we are going to tell.
_	In the end, he drowned himself in the Seine after his wife, a former pupil, Anne-Marie Krumpholtz (1755–1824), also a virtuoso harpist, eloped to London, although the story that this was with pianist Jan Ladislav Dussek is apocryphal.
_	He also explained that he "felt in his gut" that this was the story that he needed to tell once Singer left the franchise, and that his vision for the film was "so clear in my head, emotionally and visually, that it would have killed me to hand this to somebody else to direct".
_	While the character of Vera may seem a bit too good to be true, the story that players get to investigate is quite intriguing, especially since your choices effect what kind of ending and result you’ll find."
_	He had already published the story that he gave as its main title "The Champagne Ship" back in January 1912 in New York in one of Frank Munsey's so-called "pulp magazines", "The Cavalier and the Scrap Book".
_	The name of Ford's project, and the serial numbers dispel the story that "GT40" was "only a nickname."
_	On February 28, 1992, the "Toronto Sun" broke the story that the Heritage Front had infiltrated the Reform Party.
_	This story is set at a far later date than the others, however, so he may only have given the presidential seal of approval to a longstanding tradition; the story that his physical problems forced him to stand up contradict this, but he might have just been waiting for the proper accepted time to relieve his pain; either way, he gave national publicity to the practice.
_	Doctorow says of the story that it is "fervently American".
_	Red Sox star Ted Williams, as a guest on the Bill Stern's Sports Newsreel radio program in 1950, told the story that Wood was posing as a girl on a girls' team when The Red Sox signed him.
_	Pausanias 8.12.5 records the story that Penelope had in fact been unfaithful to her husband, who banished her to Mantineia upon his return.
_	Daphne is totally insulted by his attempt, in which he assumes that she is gullible, and would believe the story that Rebecca forced herself on him.
_	Most versions of the story that continue after Orion's death tell of the gods raising Orion and the Scorpion to the stars, but even here a variant exists:
_	Art Lee created the story that the folkloric figure Paul Bunyan came from the Northwoods which then led to the creation of the statues of Paul Bunyan and Babe the Blue Ox.
_	Neville Cardus relates the story that Green said to himself ""It's not likely that Lancashire ever again will score 500 against Yorkshire, so I'm going to get this single run if it kills me.""
_	Versions of the story that were common at the time had Duncan being killed in an ambush at Inverness, not in a castle.
_	This was disputed by Davies who declared that the story that Richard publicly proclaimed Mortimer as heir presumptive in Parliament in October 1385 is baseless, although even Davies admitted the claim was openly discussed at the time.
_	Detective Lorenzo Council meets with her, and through her tears gets the story that her four-year-old son Cody was in the backseat of the car.
_	I could have made a great "Thor" if I could have done the story that I was wanting to do.
_	Millington tells the story that he heard from Donald's mother.
_	Asimov notes in his comments on the story that Moore picking up the device had been a throwaway line he included in the original "Marooned Off Vesta".
_	The film tells the story that an alien is sent to Earth to investigate whether humans believe the probability of the arrival of Aliens on the planet.
_	He felt "the English subtitles access adult dimensions of the story that were never apparent in the old television prints".
_	Elizabeth Thomas would later often repeat the story that she was watching union soldiers with a baby in her arms weeping as they destroyed her house when "a tall, slender man dressed in black approached her and said, 'It is hard, but you shall reap a great reward.'"
_	The film is in black and white as most films made at the time; however the story that is shown is vibrant with life and even considered to be made later on.
_	That investigation supported the story that the army had been battling partisans.
_	On the same day, the IPCC briefed other journalists that there was nothing in the story that Tomlinson might have been assaulted by police.
_	Tom McCarthy identified elements within the story that he believed reflected recurring themes within "The Adventures of Tintin".
_	Many of the legends surrounding Eliza's early life, including the story that Eliza had been a child prostitute with her mother in a Providence brothel, where she gave birth to an illegitimate son, as well as the story that she had murdered Stephen Jumel, first appear in questionable depositions from these trials.
_	The album's booklet contains the songs lyrics plus a part of the story that each song narrates.
_	In 1986, while the paper was under the guidance of Editor-in-Chief William Diepenbrock, News Editor Steve Elzer broke the story that UCSB Chancellor Robert Huttenback was under investigation for misappropriating university funds.
_	Similarly, the story that a shield was used as a heliograph at the Battle of Marathon is a modern myth, originating in the 1800s.
_	The legend of Kasi Viswanath Temple in Varanasi is associated with the story that Siva built the temple there in her honour.
_	Cesaro and Zayn's match "wasn't the same as their previous encounters, and they actually built on it" and that "they actually told the story that they knew each other well in the ring, and used it to put on a fantastic 20-minute match".
_	Although Steiff's records show that the bears were produced, they are not recorded as arriving in the U.S., and no example of the type, "55 PB", has ever been seen, leading to the story that the bears were shipwrecked.
_	In November 2010, it was reported that Pandian and Vishal would make another film under the Vishal's home banner, GK Films Corporation, in a venture titled "Pattathu Yaanai" and that it would feature the story that Pandian had planned for Vikram in his project "Vedi".
_	Frank Zarnowski does not regard the 1904 event as part of the Olympic competition, and doubts the story that Kiely had refused offers by both the English Amateur Athletic Association (AAA) and the New York Athletic Club to pay his fare so he could compete for them.
_	Symphony No. 96 has been called the Miracle symphony due to the story that, during its premiere, a chandelier fell from the ceiling of the concert hall in which it was performed.
_	Dock Walloper is the story that takes place in the roaring 20's of New York City.
_	This "confusing mythology" included the "dopey reasons" for the story's essential characters dying and parts of the story that "got lost inside all manner of interstellar/medieval malarkey."
_	They described Mr Bolt as being both a "Godot-like character" and as being akin to Basil Fawlty from the British sitcom "Fawlty Towers", while adding that the broken step acts "like a Greek God's curse" in the story that affects everyone except Castafiore.
_	Cosimo then supposedly put out the story that she had died of a spotted fever and threw her young lover in prison.
_	Britain at the turn of the 19th century is shown to be much like it was in reality; historical attitudes towards women are strong enough in the story that the existence of female officers and captains is kept secret from the public.
_	Viciana does not mention the story that The Hidden was as a secret Jew in his account, as his description contrasts with the normal stereotype of a Sephardic Jew.
_	Some errors may be just amusing, such as the story that the heads of the Ottoman religious-cum-legal hierarchy, the seyhulislams, if executed, were ground to death in a gigantic mortar and pestle...
_	And when the men returned to Pittsburg, the students were so amused by the story that they decided university administrators and faculty who had missed work and class in order to lobby in Topeka should have to pay the same fine.
_	Legendary Laker broadcaster Chick Hearn often told the story that after the game, he asked Baylor if it bothered him that Chamberlain had an extra 15 minutes to break the record.
_	They contradict the story that Scudder first told to him, and mention an enemy group called the "Black Stone" and the mysterious "Thirty-nine Steps".
_	When this tramp arrives in the hobo jungle to spread the word, A-No.-1 is there, and is confronted with the story that the young braggart Cigaret is taking credit for his deed.
_	DiCostanza relates the story that a customer came into the family deli and through an exchange matching the customer's requests and the deli's offerings, the hoagie was created.
_	Melick didn't see Richard Long again until Melick's arrival in Hollywood in the late 1950s, but he began to tell the story that Richard Long saved his life by getting him an assignment in Yokohama instead of Korea.
_	She often told stories to media outlets designed to gain interest based on her weight; among them were the story that she required three airline seats in order to fly and that she once had a piano bench break underneath her during a performance.
_	"Bliss", the story that lent its name to her second collection of stories in 1920, was also published in 1918.
_	In the "Divine Comedy", Dante places Constance in Paradise (though he subscribed to the story that Constance had been a nun):
_	In an interview about his book The First Americans, Adovasio comments on his role as an archaeologist in the modern age: “I think in a sense the story that we’re trying to tell…
_	I thought I should tell the story that will bring this bridge, this gap to the west.
_	Editor Robert Greenberger wrote in his introduction to the story that "These first five pages are a modern-day equivalent to Shakespeare as Parker's soliloquy sets the stage for his next action.
_	In 2010, Ian Levine funded an unofficial project to complete the original "Shada" story using animation and the original voice actors, minus Tom Baker and David Brierley, to complete the parts of the story that were never filmed.
_	Barnum told the story that Tom Thumb, a young circus elephant, was walking on the railroad tracks and Jumbo was attempting to lead him to safety.
_	Popov and Motsak had championed the story that the accident had been caused by a collision with a NATO submarine.
_	Generations later there was the story that a divine vision led Constantine to this spot, and an angel no one else could see, led him on a circuit of the new walls.
_	Roger Sherman Loomis believed that the short version, which was added to an existing "Perceval" manuscript ten or twenty years later, represents a version of the story that was originally independent of Chrétien's.
_	The screenwriter read the book and wanted to turn it into a film because it added another layer to the story that Gaghan wanted to tell.
_	In court he maintains the story that John Paul abused him; with the defence attempting to portray John Paul as a sexual predator and Nancy as a liar.
_	Harrison commented years later, "Now, historically, there's the story that something went on that shouldn't have done – but nothing did."
_	Newman later said that he had wanted the character to appear, but that none of the attempts to include him fit well into the story that was being written.
_	Ed Hannigan, Mantlo's artist collaborator on "Peter Parker, the Spectacular Spider-Man", recalled that he and Mantlo jointly came up with the characters' visual design: "Bill had a short page or two synopsis of the story that he showed me, and we discussed what the characters would look like.
_	"Avataars: Covenant of the Shield" was initially intended as a twelve-issue project featuring the established Marvel characters in a fantasy setting, but the story that was originally planned was never published.
_	It is revealed over the course of the story that Kitty, worried of the Destiny Diaries' safety, devised a plan with Cyclops and Emma Frost to hide them and have Emma wipe the location from her mind.
_	In that case, the story that Waraka tried to help his co-religionist is likely to be true.
_	This story certainly have a similarity with the story that Dražeta family of Muslim faith lived in western Bosnia.
_	He attended high school in The Hague, excelling at mathematics and science, and he also told the story that this was where he met a Scoutmaster who introduced him to the night sky while on camping trips away from the city lights.
_	In 2010, the Associated Press released the story that toxic levels of the metal cadmium.
_	In 1983, he returned to "Star Slammers" with another version of the story that Marvel published in "Marvel Graphic Novel" No. 6.
_	The Ordnance Survey may contradict the fine detail of the story that Mary Queen of Scots watered her horses here once by stating that the 'Queen's Syke ""..is a Small Stream or marsh forming a Junction with the Stra Burn about 13 chains N [North] east of Coplar.
_	Also, as much of the story that takes place in the United States occurs in offices, practical sets were built, including Alec Station and the FBI office in New York.
_	He is notorious for the story that he actually carried out transmutation of lead into gold.
_	In 2007, he broke the story that new UK Prime Minister Gordon Brown was returning early from holiday to deal with an outbreak of foot-and-mouth disease in Surrey.
_	Suetonius also gives the story that a crowd shouted to him "rex" ("king"), to which Caesar replied, "I am Caesar, not Rex" (""Ego caesar, non rex."").
_	The version in "Heimskringla" is the most elaborate, but also the latest, and introduces elements to the story that are not found in earlier sources.
_	On 10 June, he was again interviewed by police at Mornington but he maintained the story that Anna had left voluntarily on 23 March.
_	The museum can be a theater where the audience surrounds themselves in the story that involves a historical figure.
_	"The Champion of the World" is a condensed version of the story that would become Dahl's 1977 children's book, "Danny the Champion of the World".
_	Robert Barron, an American Catholic priest, writes in an article: "Hypatia was indeed a philosopher and she was indeed killed by a mob in 415, but practically everything else about the story that Gibbon and Sagan and Amenábar tell is false".
_	Similarly, the atheist historian Tim O'Neil remarks: "Over and over again, elements are added to the story that are not in the source material: the destruction of the library, the stoning of the Jews in the theatre, Cyril condemning Hypatia's teaching because she is a woman, the heliocentric "breakthrough" and Hypatia's supposed irreligiosity."
_	As a result of refraining to interpret the story that he presents, Woodward has been described as being both opposed to the Bush administration by some, as well as an apologist of the administration by others.
_	Sutton was the first to break the story that Kim Kardashian was held at gunpoint in her Paris hotel where millions of dollars in jewelry was stolen.
_	But the story that produced a firestorm of publicity and was immediately picked up by Time and Newsweek dealt with the Helga paintings by Andrew Wyeth, which became a huge news story both because of the scandalous implication that the subject might be the artist's mistress and also because of the general belief that Wyeth had been producing over the course of many years a large body of as-yet-unknown masterpieces.
_	GNP Crescendo president Neil Norman explained that the decision to include the tracks was controversial, but said that "Frakes did the most amazing job of integrating those songs into the story that we had to use them".
_	There she broke the story that featured the Sandusky scandal and the Second Mile charity.
_	In his memoir, "A Soldier First", General Rick Hillier, retired Chief of Defence Staff of the Canadian Forces, recalls borrowing books from David Elliott while a boy growing up in Campbellton, and recounts the story that Elliott served in military intelligence during the Second World War.
_	[This was the story that appeared in Action Comics #1, June, 1938, the first published appearance of Superman.]
_	Due to the story that was taken out of context, the artist backed off from the deal and stated he is and always will be "Ruthless Records For Life" Due to poor management from his A&R and management team, and being shelved by the labels he was signed to because of it, Lil Eazy E announced in the summer of 2012 that he would be releasing all ties with his past management team and the Kings of L.A. label he had been in a partnership with.
_	One fifteenth- century or sixteenth-century owner so strongly identified with the protagonist of the story that he wrote "his iaset Tomas Showall" on the bed in the miniature on fol.
_	But the origin was already forgotten, and the findings created the story that the coins was from the Spanish Armada of the 16th century.
_	The Dark Horse mini-comics finished off the story that was supposed to have been the direction of the original action figure line, before it was cancelled.
_	Ibn al-Faqih relays the story that during the construction of the mosque, workers found a cave-chapel which had a box containing the head of St. John the Baptist, or Yaḥyā ibn Zakarīyā in Islam.
_	Jun Planning retired Namu in 2005 under the story that he and Pullip had "broken up."
_	It was also claimed in the story that Velupillai Prabhakaran's 13-year-old son Balachandran was interrogated by the Sri Lankan military before being shot.
_	She was part of the team that won the 2005 Walkely Award for Investigative Journalism for the story that discovered Vivian Solon in the Philippines.
_	In the same introduction Jacob speaks of Galen, repeating the story that that celebrated physician was a Jew named "Gamaliel."
_	There is some warrant for the story that Hayes surrounded his property with turf from Ireland to keep out the snakes.
_	This was another very delicate matter since Henry VIII was not noted for tolerating opposition to his wishes, while the Cowley family were busily spreading the story that Barnewall had challenged the King's authority to dissolve any religious house.
_	Hector Boece in his 1527 "History of Scotland" called it the "wall of Abercorn", repeating the story that it had been destroyed by Graham.
_	On February 10, 2016, "The Washington Post" and radio station WTOP-FM first broke the story that Monumental Sports & Entertainment (Ted Leonsis, chairman), which also owns the NHL's Washington Capitals, NBA's Washington Wizards, and WNBA's Washington Mystics, were "close to a deal" in bring a new expansion franchise to the Verizon Center.
_	Simon continues to go with the story that he tried to save his life by using CPR, hence the marks on Flosso's chest.
_	When writing the story, Uchikoshi made use of what he calls the "inductive composition method", where a setting is created first, after which one thinks about a core to the story that can be used to make the setting work.
_	After Lex Luthor was defeated, Lois and Jimmy felt disappointed when Clark scored the story that revealed Lex Luthor's part in what Superman did under the Red Kryptonite's control, until they accepted Superman's apologies and Lois asks him out to dinner as they both smile.
_	However, post- Union-Pacific, “since it is hard to imagine that Sam could have used up all of his gold before he started train robbing again, it lends credence to the story that Sam robbed for sport more than for profit” (“City of Round Rock”).
_	He confirmed the story that he had fallen asleep while awaiting the Apollo 8 launch.
_	It detracts from the story that we're trying to tell".
_	The American public relations firm Hill & Knowlton resorted to atrocity propaganda during the 1990/91 Gulf War when it spread the story that the Iraqi soldiers who had invaded Kuwait were ripping helpless Kuwaiti babies from hospital incubators.
_	Sori told Oricon he has a deep affection for the story that tells the "truth of living," and said, "It is my dearest wish to turn this wonderful story into a film, and it is not an exaggeration to say that I am living for this reason."
_	This is partly due to the story that when Queen Louise of Prussia was fleeing Berlin and pursued by Napoleon's forces, she hid her children in a field of cornflowers and kept them quiet by weaving wreaths for them from the flowers.
_	She had apparently told him that she had written a pamphlet of her own, giving her side of the story that Hamilton had told in his Reynolds Pamphlet.
_	The feud continued after WrestleMania XXX based on the story that Wyatt was capturing Cena's fanbase, which was exemplified by Wyatt leading a children's choir to the ring on the April 28 episode of "Raw", with the children later putting on sheep masks.
_	Breaking him out of Sona became Michael Scofield's primary mission during season three, though Whistler and his mysterious background causes tension between both men as various aspects of Whistler's background (most notably the story that he is needed to be freed in order to deliver vaguely explained "coordinates" recorded within a bird watcher guidebook Whistler carries with him at all times) cause Michael to question whether or not he is helping an innocent man caught in the vast web of conspiracies of The Company, as Whistler claims to be.
_	In early November 2001, the Washington Post broke the story that conflict diamonds helped finance Al Qaeda, the group responsible for the September 11 attacks on the World Trade Center and the Pentagon in 2001.
_	After many different ideas, Selznick settled with the story that Hugo's father had a connection with the automaton and died before the automaton was found in a burned up building.
_	Fox had not yet written a sample screenplay, but Bendinger was so impressed with her ideas for the story that Fox was hired to write the script.
_	An account similar to the Sonoy torture appears in the 1899 Octave Mirbeau novel "The Torture Garden", and psychologist Leonard Shengold has identified this as the possible source of the story that the Rat Man told Freud.
_	Raised solely by his mother, Elan discovers early in the story that his absent warlord father raised his twin brother, Nale, to be an evil mastermind.
_	First broadcast February 3, 1966, and repeated on May 19, 1966, it continues and concludes the story that began in "Instant Freeze."
_	As the three spin-off films all take place within the time period of the original film, the plot of the "Beauty and the Beast" franchise is encompassed in the original 1991 film, which the other films serving to give added insight to certain parts of the story that were skimmed over (such as when Belle is living in the castle with Beast).
_	This painting illustrates the story that Joost van den Vondel wrote about Iempsar, wife of Joseph's patron Potiphar, attempting to seduce the pious Joseph.
_	However, according to R. R. Davies, the story that Richard publicly proclaimed Mortimer as heir presumptive in Parliament in October 1385 is baseless, although contemporary records indicate that his claim was openly discussed at the time.
_	was the monologist that evening and noted while telling the story that he generally hates when other monologists tell "these kinds of stories".
_	He also called the game's premise its only real flaw, as it was too unoriginal, but added that "the story that unfolds as you actually play the game is flawlessly interwoven and quite entertaining".
_	By making 'Standard' more specific and more interesting, we found that it made the story that more compelling.
_	While Tokubei is recovering from his beating and returning dejectedly to Ohatsu's place of employment, the Temma House, Kuheiji is headed there to boast of his new wealth and successful scam, after having been busy spreading the story that Tokubei had tried to extort money from Kuheiji.
_	A well-known story told by Loudermilk is that, when he was asked by the "Viva! NashVegas" radio show about the origins of the song "Indian Reservation", he fabricated the story that he wrote the song after his car was snowed in by a blizzard and he was taken in by a small group of Cherokee Indians.
_	Also, a girl from Cuers spread the story that Eric had told her about his relationship with his half-sister Caroline, who was supposed to be his pregnant girlfriend.
_	In February 1980, "Riverside Press-Enterprise" reporter Dick Lyneis achieved a journalistic coup when he broke the story that L. Ron Hubbard was living in Hemet and working at Gilman Hot Springs.
_	The "Times of India" panned the film, giving it 1 1/2 stars and stating "There is no emotional conflict in the story that provokes you to think or get inspired.
_	As much as it remains a visual delight, the mysteries that it offers do not much thrill, and the story that it tells seldom excites".
_	It was in Monkton church that Blind Harry's poem "The Actes and Deidis of the Illustre and Vallyeant Campioun Schir William Wallace" bases the story that William Wallace went to pray, fell asleep and had an inspirational dream which revived his flagging resolve to rescue Scotland from Edward I.
_	It was on one such expedition on 4 July 1862 that Dodgson invented the outline of the story that eventually became his first and greatest commercial success.
_	A story game is a type of role-playing game experience with a lesser focus on "My Character" and a greater focus on "Our Story" (meaning the story that all the players at the table want to make).
_	The "Bestiaire" is one of two works from medieval England that relates the story that a crocodile cries when it eats a human.
_	The most notable change is the removal of the Fantastic Four from The Galactus Trilogy, the story that serves as the foundation for the first three episodes of the series.
_	His past tenure at DNAinfo in Chicago, where one editor tweeted in response to the story that she could have seen it coming, was also edited out.
_	Supporters of Ferdinand (who had for some time been considering a "coup d'état" against his father) spread the story that Godoy had sold Spain to Napoleon.
_	In November 2000, Nelson broke the story that Katherine Harris, then-State Attorney General in Florida, was not a neutral participant in the Florida ballot controversy, but that she had been significantly involved in George W. Bush’s presidential campaign.
_	There is no truth in the story that Walker chose the name as he was a family friend of the recently deposed Icelandic Prime Minister Hermann Jónasson.
_	Geoffrey told the story that Arthur's father, King Uther Pendragon, was disguised by Merlin's sorcery to look like Gorlois, Duke of Cornwall, the husband of Igraine, Arthur's mother.
_	Stevens is credited with telling the story that at the home opener of the New York Giants on a cold April day in 1901 there was limited demand for ice cream.
_	It's the story that gives this game the feeling that it's an adventure, like "Indiana Jones" or even "Max Payne".
_	It was actually a blessing, because in the 'Starblast' crossover I was able to provide closure to the story that had introduced her 20 years earlier."
_	The Last Dark is a fantasy novel by American writer Stephen R. Donaldson, the final book of "The Last Chronicles of Thomas Covenant", ending the story that Donaldson began in 1977 with "Lord Foul's Bane".
_	It's not simply the story that's exciting, although Brunger's book opens up the thin narrative to create a host of sharp ideas and characters.
_	Spending the night sleeping on a haystack in a forest, she returned to Paris where she concluded that only in disguise could she get the story that she wanted to write:
_	Newsarama gave the fourth and final issue a score of 6/10, feeling like while the story did what it was supposed to do, the writers focused too much on Cyclops and thus alienated other aspects of the story that could have been fleshed out.
_	Books released the ebook "", a prequel to the story that the Doctor was reading in the episode.
_	This continues the story that began with "State of Flux" and this story is continued in the season finale and bridge (Two-part episode bridging season 2 and 3)
_	But from that point, the users have to explore the components of the story that interest them the most.
_	In one of the fragments, Obadiah tells the story that was widely discussed when he was still Johannes, young son of minor nobility, living with his parents in the small Italian town of Oppido Lucano:
_	So , wanting to make Destiney to feel bad for her and feel like she's weak, makes up the story that she has an eating disorder and begins to cry.
_	Alix Spiegel states in the beginning of the story that, "...I know this story not because I read it in a book or learned it in any class, but because it's one of those stories that my family uses to explain itself."
_	This explanation focuses on Pushkin’s quote in the story that “Two fixed ideas can no more exist together in the moral world than two bodies can occupy one and the same place in the physical world.”
_	The A.V. Club reviewer Todd VanDerWerff gave "The Cold Lands" a B- rating, stating, "There are the bones of the stereotypical “loser has his life turned around by a kid” story here, but Gilroy takes all of this to a more realistic, more interesting place, and he manages to find an ending for the story that offers a touch of optimism but doesn’t feel like a cheat."
_	Hatem and Greenwalt wrote the script based on a pitch by two other staff writers, who initially pitched the story that a plane that had flown out of Tel Aviv five years ago had suddenly reappeared on radar and in the airspace.
_	The show lasted over 3 and 1/2 hours, but he was unable to finish the story that night.
_	Diogenes Laertius reports the story that he was prosecuted by Cleon for impiety, but Plutarch says that Pericles sent his former tutor, Anaxagoras, to Lampsacus for his own safety after the Athenians began to blame him for the Peloponnesian war.
_	It has been marked as the story that represents the start of the Golden Age of Science Fiction.
_	His election took place in a brief period when Kent was free of Mercian dominance between 756 and 764, so the story that he owed his election to Æthelbert does fit with the time frame.
_	Hamm's schedule was too tight and the role ultimately went to Tim Blake Nelson, but in spite of this the story that Hamm was in the movie persisted.
_	This is the story that is often credited with inspiring Blair's concept of New Labour, and the "Mondeo man" superseded the "Essex man", as the target of the 1997 general election campaign for the Labour Party.
_	Later reviews by Sakura Eries criticises the manga, which was published in 1996, for its "futuristic anachronism" of the story that is set in 2021.
_	Hussain completed the story that was left unfinished in his earlier book by including the story of the "local lads" of the infamous mobster Dawood Ibrahim.
_	In Romain Gary's original novel, this was not the story that was told—the dog started to attack white people because a black man embittered by white racism deliberately retrained him to do so.
_	Local recensions of the "Passion" of St. Symphorianus of Autun tell the story that, on the eve of the persecution of Septimius Severus, St. Polycarp assigned to Irenaeus two priests and a deacon (Benignus, Andochius and Thyrsus), all three of whom departed for Autun.
_	Journalist Jeff Jarvis acknowledged the film was "well-crafted" but called it "the anti-social movie", objecting to Sorkin's decision to change various events and characters for dramatic effect, and dismissing it as "the story that those who resist the change society is undergoing want to see."
_	It is explained that before the present time in the story that those who could use Ninku were targeted by an evil empire and the Ninku corps were formed to combat the menace.
_	She explains to Shiina late in the story that they possess the same shadow dragon, Sheol (シェオル "Sheoru"), and it is the earth itself.
_	At the same time, there are details in the story that seem to undermine his association with fascist ideology.
_	Le Guin said in her introduction to the story that she was unable to start "Paradises Lost" until she worked in the religious theme, which in her words "began to entwine itself with the idea of the sealed ship in the dead vacuum of space, like a cocoon, full of transformation, transmutation, invisible life: the pupa body, the winged soul".
_	One advantage of this type of journalism is that the parachuter is an outsider who can look at the news event from a fresh perspective and notice things or provide an angle to the story that a stringer may have missed.
_	Al-Mubarrad's writings are considered to be the first source recounting the story that Shahrbanu or Shahr Banu — eldest daughter of Yazdegerd III, the last Emperor of the Sassanid dynasty of Persia/Iran — had married Hussain ibn Ali, the Prophet Muhammad's grandson and the third Shia Imam and that she gave birth to Ali Zayn al Abidin (the fourth Shia Imam).
_	In 2011 British pop act Pet Shop Boys wrote the music for a ballet based on the story that opened in March 2011 at Sadler's Wells in London.
_	For readers of Len Deighton's three trilogies about the MI6 operative Bernard Samson ("Berlin Game", "Mexico Set" and "London Match"; "Spy Hook", "Spy Line," and "Spy Sinker"; and "Faith", "Hope" and "Charity"), this is the story that started it all.
_	Potter was so taken with the story that he could not put it down except for eating and sleeping.
_	In an interview for "The Independent", Moyle noted that Bowker's adaptation of her source material required a "chronological sleight of hand" turning "the story that plays out in the book over 12 years into something that feels as if it's taking place over a couple of years – to keep up the pace, to make it feel modern."
_	Yu forged a pair of sabres using iron ore he harvested from Wudushan mountain (武都山) himself, which may have inspired the story that Guan Yu invented his weapon.
_	The film explores the theme of dreamchasing; having the ambition to chase your dreams, Scott and Sid aims to encourage people to get moving and chase their dreams, with a strong moral to the story that if you believe in yourself, you can do anything.
_	The primary interest in Christianity for many, was the story that Jesus had healed the sick and survived death, so the practice of Christianity became interwoven with the care of the sick.
_	A March 2, 2015 "New York Times" article broke the story that the Benghazi panel had discovered that Clinton exclusively used her own private email server rather than a government-issued one throughout her time as Secretary of State, and that her aides took no action to preserve emails sent or received from her personal accounts as required by law.
_	Vuh tells the story that one day Zipacna was basking on the beach when he was disturbed by the Four Hundred Boys (possibly patron deities of alcohol), who were attempting to construct a hut.
_	Around the time of the second meeting, during a lengthy conference call with Bloomberg reporters and editors, Doctoroff insisted on changes in the story that softened its impact by revising the language used to describe the Xi family's assets.
_	Inspired by both Nicholas Roerich stories and the Kingdom of Bhutan, Shambhala is named and themed around the story that within the Himalayas there is a lost world (Shambhala) that is impossible to access and is the source of happiness.
_	More obvious folk etymologies include the story that the coffin of St Cuthbert was dropped near Pity Me on the way to Durham, at which point the saint implored the monks carrying him to take pity on him and be more careful; or that coming to the location during a flight from a Viking raid, a group of monks sang the 51st Psalm, the Latin version of which includes the words ""Miserere mei, Deus"", which may be rendered in English as "Pity me, O God".
_	The effort was met with immediate acclaim, and according to Salinger biographer Paul Alexander, it was "the story that would permanently change his standing in the literary community."
_	Charges were brought against Gladys based on her allegedly fabricating the story that the young singer concocted the kidnapping for publicity reasons.
_	They may also reveal significant parts of the story that have not yet occurred, but soon will in greater detail.
_	By 2:30 in the afternoon, he was taking his 50-strong aerial formation through a series of wild stunts over the alarmed Prince's head, and later told the story that he flew so close to the marching soldiers that their bayonets almost pierced his undercarriage.
_	His "muruwwa" (virtue) is highlighted in the story that he vowed to feed people whenever the east wind began to blow, and to continue so doing until it stopped.
_	Basil fabricated the story that Sybil was in bed, suffering horrendous symptoms: losing her voice, severe swelling up around her eyes and also swollen thighs.
_	Further establishing the apostolic nature of Lazarus' appointment was the story that the bishop's omophorion was presented to Lazarus by the Virgin Mary, who had woven it herself.
_	The chair wrote "We regret any harm that may have been caused by such anti-Semitic statements", but later told journalists covering the story that his letter was not an apology, and that it was deliberately vague because he was unsure exactly which comments could be considered anti-Semitic.
_	Pierre Gaveaux (9 October 1761 – 5 February 1825) was a French operatic tenor and composer, notable for creating the role of Jason in Cherubini's "Médée" and for composing "Leonore ou l'amour conjugal", the first operatic version of the story that later found fame as "Fidelio".
_	In October 2013, the paper broke the story that departing UCL Provost Malcolm Grant's leaving party cost the college over £17,000.
_	C5 "The Bane of Llywelyn" continues the story that started in C4 "To Find a King".
_	The CPI fed newspapers the story that ships escorting the First Division to Europe sank several German submarines, a story discredited when newsmen interviewed the ships' officers in England.
_	This would also suggest the story that Störtebeker was sentenced to death with 70 other privateers is at least misleading; at minimum, he certainly was buried with 30 other men.
_	He has written on topics from South America, including the thesis that the border conflict between Peru and Ecuador could be based on pre-Columbian Inca roots, and was the first to break the story that the U.S. government was guilty of using illegal poison to eradicate coca crops in the Amazon jungle, contributing to a reversal of U.S. policy in this area.
_	Blair Erickson, a writer of a treatment for "Alone in the Dark", has written a critical account of his experience working with Boll, in which Erickson alleges that Boll stole ideas from prior movies and wanted to add elements to the story that were not true to the tone of the source material.
_	Fischer spread the story that upon his death in 1875, Hofzinser's wife destroyed many of his manuscripts to honor her husband's instructions though there is some dispute about this.
_	The student asks Xuan whether merpeople are real and if the story that he fell in love with a mermaid is true, but Xuan denies it.
_	The medieval chronicler Matthew Paris retold the story that when King John heard of Walter's death, the king exclaimed "Now for the first time I am king of England".
_	More secure is the story that another chronicler, Roger of Wendover, relates about Walter's Christmas celebrations in 1200.
_	The Center for the Study of Carbon Dioxide and Global Change, a skeptic group, when confronted about the funding of a video they put together ($250,000 for "The Greening of Planet Earth" from an oil company) stated, "We applaud Western Fuels for their willingness to publicize a side of the story that we believe to be far more correct than what at one time was 'generally accepted'.
_	The game takes two different perspectives in the story that shows the different views and opinions of many different characters.
_	C.L. Moore's story "Shambleau", her first sale, appeared in "Weird Tales" in November 1933; Price visited the "Weird Tales" offices shortly after Wright read the manuscript for it, and recalls that Wright was so enthusiastic about the story that he closed the office, declaring it "C.L. Moore day".
_	He reports the story that Licinius Crassus took ship for Syria despite the ominous call of a fig-seller – ""Cauneas!""
_	Peter Christen Asbjørnsen, writer and gatherer of Norwegian folk tales in the mid-19th century, collected many stories connected with Rondane, including Peer Gynt, the story that inspired Ibsen.
_	Vince joined the band in the Spring of 1982 and in June the local press carried the story that the band had changed its name.
_	On December 18, 2013, Krebs broke the story that Target Corporation had been breached of 40 million credit cards.
_	The short novel will tell the story that the band's three concept albums are based around and a special edition of Confessions with new artwork and two extra songs.
_	Sebestyen maintained that Ludvík Zifčák, a junior StB agent who had infiltrated the student movement, fell down and played dead during the November 17 demonstrations in Wenceslas Square and that Dražská, whom Sebestyen also believed to be an StB agent, then passed on to Uhl the story that "Šmíd" had been killed.
_	The culture of the POWs held at the infamous Hanoi Hilton prison was on full display with the story that would come to be known as the "Kissinger Twenty".
_	Adams originally began telling the story that would become "Watership Down" to his two daughters on a car trip.
_	And I would change details to protect the innocent (or guilty), to streamline the story that I could hear emerging, and to make it all more...musical, I suppose."
_	In the background is the story that identifies Karna as the son of Kunti, born of Surya () at the time when she was still unmarried.
_	Totenberg broke the story that Judge Douglas H. Ginsburg, who had been nominated to the Supreme Court by Ronald Reagan, had smoked marijuana "on a few occasions" during his student days in the 1960s and while an assistant professor at Harvard Law School in the 1970s, something that did not appear in Ginsburg's FBI background check.
_	...debate over the founding date of the University that began in 1896 when The Alumni Register promoted the story that the University’s origins lay in George Whitefield’s Charity School that was ostensibly founded in 1740.
_	"Stargate: The Ark of Truth" is the story that Cooper originally planned as a five- or six-episode arc to begin at the end of Season Ten and beginning of Season Eleven, but the series was canceled by the Sci-Fi Channel in August 2006.
_	These represent a modernisation of the story that might have been made in the 15th or 16th century.
_	In the 1949 movie "The Kid from Cleveland", Veeck tells the story that Gordon struck out on three swings in his immediate at-bat after Doby to save face for his new teammate.
_	When the steamer SS "Portland" arrived at Schwabacher's Wharf in Seattle July 17, 1897, the "Seattle Post-Intelligencer" scooped all other U.S. newspapers with the story that a "ton of gold" had arrived from Alaska.
_	The following year, the paper broke the story that two members of the campaign of PRD candidate Martín Torrijos had accepted bribes from Mobil for use of a former US military base.
_	Dalgetty is regarded as one of Scott's finest comic characters, however he dominates so much of the story that the main plot is not really developed in detail.
_	This series talked about the story that happened in the age of "Wenge" (the Great Proletarian Cultural Revolution), concerning the love experience of two couples.
_	For "Show Me Love" is more directed to the story that she expects her love in reply.
_	Peter another question about how come he says in the story that Seth Green is a douche.
_	Hugh the Chantor relates the story that Thomas one time when ill was told by his doctors that he would only be cured by sexual intercourse with a young girl.
_	Boccaccio introduces a number of features of the story that were to be taken up by Chaucer.
_	It is also revealed during the story that Dr. L is Pietro's brother Luciano after Cass discovers a birthmark of a crescent moon on the back of his neck that is mentioned earlier in the book.
_	From being celebrated for his other astronomical discoveries to the controversial Copernican theory, Peter Sis documents these events with intricate illustrations that vividly resemble Galileo's own, adding depth to the story that critics have praised him for.
_	In 1964, the "Sunday People" newspaper broke the story that Kay, along with fellow Sheffield Wednesday players David Layne and Peter Swan, through the instigation of former Everton player Jimmy Gauld, had bet on their side to lose a match in December 1962 against Ipswich Town.
_	Early on, the band fabricated the story that they formed because of the pseudophilosophy "lachrymology".
_	It enables them to download the part of the story that they want to play very quickly."
_	Chum Shun-kin said the story that was pulled contained details about the history of the massacre, including eyewitness accounts of the killing of civilians and information from diplomatic cables from Canada.
_	It was then that Pizarro planned an intelligent strategy to draw the viceroy out of Popayán, a position that he was finding difficult to attack: leaving a small garrison in Quito, under the command of Pedro de Puelles, Pizarro appeared to march south with his entire army, instructing their indigenous allies to spread the story that he was marching to aid Carvajal against Centeno.
_	She tells him that she will walk again, but she will need Nathan's support to do so; she asks him if the story that Peter told is true, and he hastily assures her it is.
_	As he watches over his daughter, Rob reads the story that Katy had been writing about Flicka, eventually typing the story and sending it to the school so that Katy can pass for the year.
_	She notes that the story that Edmund had an armour-bearer implies that he would have been a warrior king who was prepared to fight the Vikings on the battlefield, but she acknowledges the possibility that later accounts belong to "the realm of hagiographical fantasy".
_	Man vs. Temptation there was few time in the story that Stark was tempted to give up his quest to find his lost friend for wealth, power, and lust.
_	The opening creates a sense of intimacy and, perhaps, trust that the governess should be trusted, but the use of darkness surrounding her suggests that it is possible that the story that follows could be nothing more than in her own mind – isolated and creating its own supernatural world, according to Frayling.
_	Wadley had met Brambilla but never remembered to ask the truth of the story that he was so upset by his defeat that he buried his bike in his garden.
_	He claims such distortions supported the story that McGreevey allegedly created and the press eagerly covered.
_	However, according to Samuel Schoenbaum, since Aubrey's comment was unpublished, the existence of some other sources saying the same thing suggests that the story that "Sir William was more than Shakespeare's mere poetical offspring was common in Davenant's lifetime."
_	That Mr Ford's old Jack Russell, Squeak, refused to leave his body added a poignancy to the story that saw the case make international headlines.
_	Michael J. Critelli discovered the story that is the basis for the film in 2004, and spent over five years and "several hundred thousand dollars" acquiring the rights to film it and getting a screenplay, which was co-written by his son Michael A. Critelli.
_	Baur recounts the story that Günther did something impulsive in that he impatiently dumped the ropes they were fixing and sprinted into and then soloed the difficult Merkl Couloir.
_	Tom McCarthy identified several instances in the story that he argued linked to wider themes within the "Adventures of Tintin".
_	Lovecraft, however, stated years later that the story that inspired "Cool Air" was Arthur Machen's "The Novel of the White Powder", another tale of bodily disintegration.
_	Chaz Jankel often re-tells the story that after recording it he phoned his mother and told her, "I've just recorded my first number one".
_	The fictional Professor Sutherland remarks in a note to the story that it "suffers from all the usual defects of second-rate early-19th-century writing".
_	Todd Douglass Jr. of "DVDTalk" enjoyed Lavi's first mission with Allen, due to the misunderstanding in which they believe Krory to be a vampire but learn over the course of the story that he is another exorcist.
_	Rumours about its origin include the story that it was meant for the imperial palace in Beijing, but was salvaged after the boat sank off Shanghai.
_	But the average moviegoer is a pretty 'hep' customer and the chances are he will be so far ahead of the story that its climactic scene will explode with all the thunder of a cap pistol."
_	Later that month, at a press conference in the garden of the British embassy in Washington, DC in response to a question as to why he appeared so cheerful, Lamont commented that it was a beautiful morning, adding, "My wife said she heard me singing in the bath this morning," a response which led to the story that he was singing in the bath with happiness at leaving the ERM.
_	J broke the story that "The New York Times" had negotiated a deal with Columbia University administrators to exclude student response in an article on academic bias in exchange for exclusive access to a report.
_	Plutarch is the source also for the story that the victorious Spartan generals, having planned the demolition of Athens and the enslavement of its people, grew merciful after being entertained at a banquet by lyrics from Euripides' play "Electra": "they felt that it would be a barbarous act to annihilate a city which produced such men" ("Life of Lysander").
_	According to Michael Caines, writing in the "Times Literary Supplement", the story that Brautigan left a suicide note that simply read: "Messy, isn't it?" is apocryphal.
_	So at the age of 45, Tolkien began writing the story that would become "The Lord of the Rings."
_	GNP Crescendo president Neil Norman explained that the decision to include the tracks was controversial, but said that "Frakes did the most amazing job of integrating those songs into the story that we had to use them".
_	It is obvious through Mogie’s anger during the story that the injustice of the Wounded Knee Massacre still haunts him.
_	This has led some to criticize swan song beliefs since antiquity, one of the earliest being Pliny the Elder: in AD 77, "Natural History" (book 10, chapter xxxii: "olorum morte narratur flebilis cantus, falso, ut arbitror, aliquot experimentis"), states: "observation shows that the story that the dying swan sings is false."
_	The campaign continues the story that started in the tutorial.
_	In the same "Meet the Press" interviews, Cheney implied a connection between Iraq and Mohamed Atta; "The Czech interior minister said today that an Iraqi intelligence officer met with Mohammed Atta, one of the ringleaders of the September 11 terrorists attacks on the United States, just five months before the synchronized hijackings and mass killings were carried out." and "With respect to 9/11, of course, we've had the story that's been public out there.
_	However, one article by Mendoza titled "A junior doctor has killed herself, leaving a message to Jeremy Hunt in her suicide note" – which refers to a line in the BBC News reporting of the story that "a note found in Dr Polge's car related mainly to personal issues, but included a passing reference to Health Secretary Jeremy Hunt" – was criticised by "Private Eye" for its alleged insensitivity.
_	Under the first quarter moon (7th day) of the seventh lunar month (around August), the lighting condition in the sky causes the Milky Way to appear dimmer, hence the story that the two lovers are no longer separated on that one particular day each year.
_	Nul takes a train to Borderville and intends to defect to Optima when he's intercepted by Jacob Proudsmear III, an art dealer who considers turning him in before Nul makes up the story that he's the leader of a Nilean terrorist group, "The Bowel Movement", and that he can get Proudsmear "The Gum of Egoh Dadah" after Nil is overthrown.
_	Some episodes, such as "Iris", broke away from this formula and had Templar address the audience for the entire precredits sequence and referring to himself by name, setting up the story that followed.
_	It is revealed early in the story that Luna has been granted the Goddesses' Blessing.
_	"After the Press" is a news blog that follows the press to stories of national interest across America and shows the side of the story that mainstream media does not air.
_	However, while many "Taxi" staffers have corroborated the story that Clifton was a disruptive presence during his brief time on set, Simon himself had no association with "Taxi" during its first season when Clifton made his appearance, and was not a witness to this specific event.
_	The hilarious consequences of these actions and the story that ensues form the crux of the movie.
_	But it was not the scientific aspects of the story that Taubenberger responded to most strongly, it was the naval scenes set in the Pacific.
_	Similarly, the story that the K.G.B. considered schemes for breaking the legs of the ballet dancer Rudolf Nureyev for defecting to the West was first reported in a book written six years ago."
_	Gorham tells the story that when Vice-Admiral Sir Charles Carpendale interviewed Pepper for a job, he asked him "How old are you?" and got the reply "Forty-four, how old are you?"
_	Philip Munz, in his "A Revision of the Genus Fuchsia"(1943), repeats the story that the fuchsia was first introduced into England by a sailor who grew it in a window where it was observed by a nurseryman from Hammersmith, a Mr. Lee, who succeeded in buying it and propagating it for the trade.
_	Chandi ayya told the story that he went to commit suicide and rescued by Lathara's daughter Wasana (Vasana).
_	Meanwhile, the twist arises in the story that the ghost is actually behind Naresh who is none other than his cousin Swapna who gets killed in this farmhouse.
_	This is the point of the story that many scholars of Islam report as being central (contrasting to other religious traditions) to Joseph's story.
_	An unfilmed scene at the end of the story that was scripted and storyboarded was to have shown Herbie playing with children at a nearby playground prior to taking the newly married Jim and Carole off on their honeymoon.
_	Harriet Beecher Stowe's visit to Rankin provided some of the story that became "Uncle Tom's Cabin".
_	It rose to prominence in 2007 when it broke the story that peace activist Brian Haw believed that the American government was behind the events of 9/11.
_	On January 26, 2012, the "Chicago Sun-Times" broke the story that the Kennedy family was planning a three-tower development at Wolf Point.
_	If you read the story that's what she is.
_	Media accounts have corroborated the substance of the story that CNN retracted, concerning a Russian investment fund and onetime Trump advisor Anthony Scaramucci,as true.
_	The attempts by the "Daily Mail" attempts to fact check the story that it had run, including posing as parents looking for playgroups and as supermarket managers wanting to run racialism awareness courses, had failed to elicit a single playgroup worker who would confirm the alleged council ban.
_	In another version, a historian named Fray Felix Huerta claimed that the name came from the story that the original sitio of the town is in the shape of the “BOA”, young embryo of the coconut which was surrounded by five rancherias named Lupa, Antacodos, Sabang, Caobnan and Binoyoan.
_	This may have occurred via the story that Sigurd has to avenge his father's death at the hands of the sons of Hunding.
_	Cockade did have one success: the Germans believed the story that the Allies had 51 divisions in the British Isles, when there were only 17 divisions.
_	In his "Reminiscences", Michael Kelly tells the story that in 1807 he was appearing in "The Duenna" at Drury Lane, as Ferdinand.
_	Misconceptions about the countertenor voice were common at the time Deller was first gaining significant notice as a singer, which was only a matter of decades after the last castrati had died; Michael Chance tells the story that once, a French woman, upon hearing Deller sing, exclaimed "Monsieur, vous êtes eunuque"—to which Deller replied, "I think you mean 'unique,' madam."
_	According to a legend, the village’s name comes from "Fett" – German for “fat” – from the story that holds that the village once had to supply the lordly kitchen with fat.
_	Hunt relied on the story from Ovid's "Heroides" to base his poem, but Hunt describes an end result to the story that Ovid leaves untold.
_	The letters are introduced and annotated by Townend, who had provided Wodehouse with the story that inspired his character Ukridge.
_	However, the story that the audience learns from Santos is that he wasn't even invited to its unveiling and how it was wrongly assembled.
_	For many years, the story that Chonghou was solely responsible for the debacle was perpetuated by the Chinese government, and this was the view put forth by historians as well.
_	The viewer now must question whether the story that took place at the country house was a fictional plot dreamed up by Sarah.
_	He reluctantly tells her the version of the story that he has heard, about a man called Williams living there some thirty years ago with his young son.
_	War had not then been declared, but hostilities had been going on for several months, as Shuldham very well knew, and the story that he mistook the enemy's ships of war for merchantmen would be but little to his credit if there was any reason to suppose it true.
_	She is so consumed with writing the story that she hardly notices as Bruce realizes his cause is hopeless and leaves to return to Albany.
_	Su's loyalty to the Han Dynasty is emphasised by the story that during his detainment he married a wife, that he had children by her, but that he chose to return to his homeland, even though it meant abandoning his wife and children.
_	There is even a moment during the story that it shows the gates to Realm of the Dead in classic VGA form.
_	In addition, there are aspects of the story that seem to reflect aspects of Egyptian life, such as the three judgments which mirror the three levels of Egyptian government.
_	By the time they got married in 1961, they were too old to have their own children, although Homi and Mary eventually formally adopted Bobby Jones, who was either Mary's much younger brother (the story that was always pushed forward) or perhaps her real son from a prior relationship.
_	After the Capitol and District 13 agreed to cease hostilities towards one another under the doctrine of mutually assured destruction, the Capitol spread the story that District 13 had been destroyed; District 13 had control of the primary nuclear weapons stockpile and the Capitol did not want a nuclear war.
_	Before each level players will be given a dialogue of the story that is given in the game.
_	The 17th-century "Martyrology of Donegal" recounts the story that when Columba was preparing to take possession of the town of Doire from Aedh, son of Ainmire, he initially refused to do so because he did not have his Mobhí's permission.
_	Thirty-eight witnesses — that was the story that came from the police.
_	Piotr Michalowski makes the connection in the story that "E-hursag" is a structure ""named as the residence of the king"" and "E-namtilla" ""as the residence of Enlil"", suspecting the two words refer to the same place and that ""E-namtilla is simply another name for E-hursag"" and that it was a royal palace.
_	He is also known for his connection with Strata Florida, thanks to the story that he was buried there, and to the copying of his poetry into Strata Florida manuscripts.
_	His sense of timing, the clarity of his production, and the variety of effects he employs draw you into the story that each instrumental tells.
_	Murless told the story that he saw Busted's effort in the Irish Derby and considered him suitable to be Royal Palace's lead horse.
_	Alcohol had so little to do with the story that Whitman had to change the title twice.
_	The story now turns to the fate of the other child, the one who was taken by the ape, and it is this branch of the story that occupies the greater part of the romance.
_	Solinus cites Cato the Elder's lost "Origines" for the story that the city was founded by Catillus the Arcadian, a son of Amphiaraus, who came there having escaped the slaughter at Thebes, Greece.
_	He emphasized the point by stating in the opening sentence of the story that "The most merciful thing in the world, I think, is the inability of the human mind to correlate all its contents."
_	He was shot in the shoulder during the Battle of Okinawa, and spent the rest of his life telling the story that he knew he was destined to become an actor when he realized he was responding to the injury like a character in a John Wayne film.
_	Even by issue 7, the editorial page announced a system of voting for the story that was liked best, to allow the writers to provide more of the type of story the readers wanted.
_	The railroad received its name due to the story that a person could jump off the train, pick wild huckleberries, and re-board the train without difficulty, as it traveled so slowly.
_	The media transcript given to the press at the time still had the earlier RS-71 designation in places, creating the story that the president had misread the aircraft's designation.
_	In that classic Duck story by Carl Barks, Scrooge eventually loses all his money in a cave below his money bin, and the only access he has to it is by means of a little toy train (any other means would make the cave collapse and have Scrooge's money irretrievably fall into a reservoir of quicksand just below), bringing him a mere handful of coins and bills back on every trip in and out of the cave, which makes it clear for the characters at the end of the story that it will take Scrooge several hundreds years to regain his entire "three cubic acres of money".
_	News items are broken into segments with a DVR-like functionality that allows viewers to check back the story that they’ve missed earlier.
_	A preponderance of historians favour the story that though the "Victorious" had sailed through the Lombok Strait rather than the Sunda, Britain had come off easily the best through a show of force during the Sunda Straits Crisis.
_	"Mission: Impossible" went into pre-production without a shooting script: De Palma devised several action sequences, but Koepp and Towne were dissatisfied with the story that led up to those events.
_	In "The Mask as Theme and Structure: Charles W. Chesnutt's 'The Sheriff's Children' and 'The Passing of Grandison, P. Jay Delmar lists four events in the story that highlight Grandison's successful masking: his dialogue with Colonel Owens, who interviews Grandison to see whether he was "abolitionist-proof" and suitable to accompany Dick on his journey.
_	Harrison's concept was to present the original stories as "plays-within-plays", using as his characters the naïve but pious craftsmen and guild members, to some extent modernised to represent the trades of today—God, for example, created the world with the help of a real fork-lift truck—acting out the parts of the story that their mediaeval counterparts would have done.
_	Holmes discovers at the end of the story that the true killer of a professor who died shortly after going swimming (shouting "the lion's mane" before he succumbed) was actually this jellyfish.
_	By 2013, they began working on the story that would lead to the film.
_	Damon Knight's first story, "Resilience", appeared in the February 1941 issue of "Stirring" with an unfortunate printer's error in the first sentence of the story that rendered the plot incomprehensible.
_	O'Flanagan tells the story that the King asked Fitzsimon what he thought of a recent sermon preached by one of the Royal chaplains: the Archbishop said frankly that it was unduly flattering of the King.
_	It is sometimes credited to the Tang dynasty's Yuan Tiangang, with the story that the dishes were supposed to mimic the life of Wu Zetian, who seized power to rule as the empress of the restored Zhou dynasty.
_	Saade broke the story that Ben Ali did not intend to abdicate, after the Independent's foreign correspondent Robert Fisk revealed it in an exclusive interview:
_	He tells the story that at Sicyon the ruler Cleisthenes (600–560 BC) expelled the rhapsodes on account of the poems of Homer, because they promoted Argos and the Argives.
_	In November 2017, Bleeding Cool broke the story that writer/editor C.B. Cebulski, who had recently been promoted to Editor in Chief of Marvel Comics, had written a number of Japanese-themed stories for Marvel in 2003 and 2004 under the pseudonym Akira Yoshida, which led to accusations of cultural appropriation, yellowfacing, and "Orientalist profiteering".
_	Several secondary sources cite the story that Queen Elizabeth I spent the night at Sanderstead Court while Nicholas Wood was the owner.
_	In writing about the town, Steinbeck briefly recounts the story that he would later rewrite as "The Pearl".
_	When on the pause menu, the player can rewind time, either to a specific point, or to a specific destination on the express' route (i.e. Paris), but can fast forward to a later time, up until the current point in the story that they have reached.
_	But the story that remains nevertheless shares much of what ‘A Fine Dessert’’s critics found so objectionable: it’s an incomplete, even dishonest treatment of slavery.
_	Another example is the story that Amaro shot and killed a groom whom disobeyed his order to walk his polo pony and instead rode it to the stables, which the U.S. Ambassador to Mexico and his military attache passed to the Department of State.
_	The writer, J. Thaddeus Skubis, stated in his director's notes that "[he] told the story that Id (Software) wouldn't".
_	This novel is a continuation of the story that ends in a cliffhanger in "The Vampire Lestat" and explores the rich history and mythology of the origin of the vampires, which dates back to Ancient Egypt.
_	De Palma designed the action sequences but neither Koepp nor Towne were satisfied with the story that would make these sequences take place.
_	A committed leftist and opponent of racism, Endore spent many months in Haiti researching the story that would become "Babouk", and much of his findings make their way into the text, either in the form of epigraphs or explicitly noted in the text itself.
_	Therefore, children in the Quechua community are encouraged to listen to the story that is being told in order to learn about their identity and culture.
_	Part live action, part puppet show and part animation, the show removes or summarizes parts of the story that would slow it down.
_	Lord Acton, on commenting on the story that Burke stopped his history because David Hume published his, said "it is ever to be regretted that the reverse did not occur".
_	Claude Crawford told the newspaper reporting the story that the company intended to continue trading under the Bianca Mosca name and was still taking orders.
_	As he spent a good deal of his journey lost, it becomes evident at the end of the story that being lost is a metaphor for how much America has changed in Steinbeck's eyes.
_	The story beings with Jesse, the main character of the story that the player plays as, searching for the family she had never known and is brought to Flux mansion.
_	Vinita Ramani of "Exclaim!" said, ""We Are Three"'s strength is the story that fuels the album's conception, a story whose mood infuse the entirety of this album."
_	So fascinated was Bartlett by the story that he declared, "I was born to make this movie."
_	He enjoyed telling the story that there he was able to read the diaries of Sarah Churchill, Duchess of Marlborough, wife of the founder of the dynasty John Churchill, 1st Duke of Marlborough.
_	This is going to be the story that is going to cement his status as a seminal figure in ape history, and sort of leads to an almost biblical status.
_	Machiavelli concludes from the story that "Here it is to be considered with this true example how much more a humane act full of charity is sometimes able to do in the spirits of men than a ferocious and violent act..."
_	That novel was set in Montgomery, Alabama, and offered the first tourism guide with embedded web links inside the story that led to real websites.
_	His class mates tell the story that he was known amongst the students as "Kabi" (meaning poet) and it was widely expected that he would top the class.
_	By the time Piller wrote the first draft of the story that eventually became the "Voyager" pilot "", the character was known as "Chakotay" and been made a Sioux.
_	Moreover, Lindgren does not cite a single case of a Vietnam veteran spit upon as he returned home, and that was the story that would ultimately be repeated and believed."
_	There are clues in the story that indicate who he is, though...""
_	Gretta May Ferris, a nurse from Saint John, New Brunswick, who was posted at nearby Forteau's Grenfell Medical Station, travelled by dogsled some to attend to the crew's medical needs; she was the first to write the story that was picked up by the international media saying that the "Bremen" had landed and that the crew were safe.
_	The Vita tripartita Sancti Patricii preserves the story that he received Patrick with humility and granted him Domnach Combair (Muckamore, County Antrim) for a church.
_	The gospel, however, appears to rely on several underlying sources, which vary in form and in theology, and which tell against the story that the gospel was based on Peter's preaching.
_	Archibald quickly concocts the story that Yvonne is seeking his assistance to land a part for producer Charles B. Cochran.
_	In 2002, she published "Days of sand", the story that won her the Prix Anne-Hébert, then in 2003, "Under the arch of timea", a work which brings together essays on writing, literature, and the role of art in society.
_	Although no precise date can be given, historians accept as true the story that McClelland saw O'Connell sitting in Court in a case he was not briefed in, in the apparent hope that a younger barrister would ask him to assist.
_	One of their number, Nebogipfel (the name of a character from Wells's "The Chronic Argonauts"), explains after hearing the Time Traveller's own story that the conflict between Eloi and Morlocks never occurred due to the Writer's publication of the story that became "The Time Machine".
_	Although the aviator assures the girl that he firmly believes the Little Prince succeeded, she is so upset by the dark twist to the story that she wishes she had never met the aviator or heard the story.
_	The alternate ending from the 1992 and later versions drops most of the story that follows
_	When asked what does he think is credible evidence for the existence of UFOs, he stated that he believes that a UFO crashed in Roswell, and that possibly there may be truth to the story that a UFO crashed in Shag Harbour in 1967.
_	For three years, he worked on the story that would become "Dilwale Dulhania Le Jayenge" before approaching his father to direct it.
_	However, during a 1990 interview with his wife on the Oprah Winfrey Show, they presented the story that the song "was" indeed about her.
_	One of the most major secrets revealed in the story is that Pseudonymous Bosch may possibly be Max-Ernest, as the later described in the story that he saw his future self writing about him and Cass.
_	There was some overlap: both teams wanted to set the game in Europe and, recalled Schofield, achieve a “payoff on the story that had been told over the last four years.
_	It was during this August that he began working on the story that would become "The Shadow Kingdom", one of the most important works of his career.
_	Film Roman, the Starz Entertainment unit behind "", released an animated direct-to-DVD version of the story that was released simultaneously with the video game.
_	The next day, she told what happened to Bradford, with the story that Claire had hire 3 thugs to beat her up.
_	She also repeats the story that they escaped punishment "by some clever monetary arrangement with the authorities".
_	Another influence came from Fanny Vlaminck, who was interested in extrasensory perception and the mysticism of Tibetan Buddhism, prominent themes in the story that also fascinated Hergé.
_	The British knew that these were being intercepted and, although they were encrypted, the Germans had broken the code; the messages played out the story that it was imperative that Haselden retrieve the briefcase because it was important.
_	On 6 November of that year the Justice of the Peace, Jurors and Public Ombudsman took oral statements that corroborated the story that during the days when the citizens of Alcoy were searching for the objects the image of Baby Jesus, which usually had his right arm raised, with two fingers pointing upwards and his body erect, had bent at the waist and its arm and fingers pointed at the place where the objects were hidden.
_	Typically performed in a minor key, it generally is played in an upbeat style reminiscent of the party atmosphere in which the story that the lyrics portray unfolds.
_	Local television news broke the story that the Metrolink engineer was exchanging brief text messages with a teenage train enthusiast while operating the train, a violation of Metrolink rules according to the agency.
_	Bendel links this with the story that the senate appointed a Dictator "clavi figendi causa" in 363 BC because that had worked to stop a pestilence a century earlier and concludes that Mamercus was this Dictator.
_	It is important to the story that some individuals, like Alex Benedict and most Ashiyyur, react physically badly to the transitions into and out of Armstrong space.
_	Jan Freeman, the story that duct tape was originally called duck tape is "quack etymology" that has spread "due to the reach of the Internet and the appeal of a good story" but "remains a statement of faith, not fact."
_	Pocket Books editor Marco Palmieri recalled, "One of the great things about David's involvement in the project was that "Abyss" was the story that followed up on "Avatar".
_	Inspired by the story that the band on the RMS "Titanic" continued to perform as the ship sank in 1912, it recreates how the music performed by the band would reverberate through the water some time after they ceased performing.
_	This was the story that was used in the first Kelly film, "The Story of the Kelly Gang" in 1906, and in the 2003 Ned Kelly movie.
_	On Bridget and the Parker's exit, Bower said "It's the story that keeps on giving for another three or four weeks.
_	As the villagers come on the scene to greet the new day, Levko invents the story that the commissar will be coming for dinner, and the Mayor, puffed up with his own importance, gives in to the marriage.
_	In 1986, Totenberg broke the story that William H. Rehnquist, who was nominated for Chief Justice of the United States by Ronald Reagan, had written a memo in 1970 opposing the Equal Rights Amendment, in which he said that the amendment would "hasten the dissolution of the family" and that would "virtually abolish all legal distinctions between men and women."
_	It is at this point in the story that the reader realizes that the Captain is Carla's brother.
_	"We took the story that far.
_	Some credit a Franciscan friar traveling with the Gaspar de Portolá Expedition in 1769 with the story that a blunderbuss was lost in the canyon, after which the area was named.
_	Pate and Phillip collaborated on the story that became the screenplay of "Escape from Fort Bravo" (1953), Phillip's first screenwriting credit.
_	The name is derived from the story that a "drop of milk" of the Virgin Mary fell on the floor of the cave and changed its colour to white.
_	Wanderone almost immediately dropped his "New York Fats" nickname, adopted the name "Minnesota Fats" and began spreading the story that the character was based on him.
_	However, the story that Martin tells the boys turns out to be a lie, which he reveals to Daphne after the boys make up and leave.
_	At this point in the story a dust particle is brought in to narrate parts of the story that need explaining.
_	It is also implied in the story that Eva and Caliban both had Jewish parents, and that Caliban's parents died in the Holocaust.
_	John Kass broke the story that Calabrese was talking to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and noted that Calabrese had disappeared from the federal prison in Milan, Michigan, and that Calabrese's federal prison records had disappeared altogether, leading Kass to believe that Calabrese had entered the United States Federal Witness Protection Program.
_	But he took the chance to damage Colenso's reputation by spreading the story that the missionary had warned him that the road would be used by the military to destroy the Maori.
_	Hamilton offered a bonus of £2 or £5 to the story that turned out to be the readers' favourite in each issue, which helped attract writers; and he later increased the rates, paying as much as 2d (0.8p, or 2.3 cents) per word for well-known authors.
_	The rededication to Saint Maurus, in which abbey was renamed Saint-Maur-des-Fossés ("Saint Maurus of the Moats"), was justified by the story that during a drought in 1137, prayers to the Virgin and Saints Peter and Paul having been ineffective, prayer to Saint Maur brought the needed rainfall.
_	Caspe then confirmed the story that Pally and Wilson had told weeks earlier - that a writer or writers assistant with access to the Twitter account had come up with the idea without his knowledge.
_	"I never called Edith "Luthien" – but she was the source of the story that in time became the chief part of the Silmarillion.
_	Faruk recalls finding the story that follows in a storage room while looking through an archive in the governor’s office in Gebze, among old bureaucratic papers.
_	It is implied within the story that Susan took the surname "Foreman" from this junkyard sign as an alias for use at the school, for when her chemistry teacher made the assumption that her grandfather was "Doctor Foreman" the Doctor replied, "Doctor who?
_	In 1983, he wrote the story that became the Paramount box-office hit "Uncommon Valor".
_	His body was discovered lying face down, which gave rise to the story that Gogol had been buried alive.
_	Editor Robert Greenberger wrote in his introduction to the story that "These first five pages are a modern-day equivalent to Shakespeare as Parker's soliloquy sets the stage for his next action.
_	"I really don’t know what exactly happened, but I do know there is bound to be a lot more to the story that hasn't been told," she said.
_	"A loving relationship and a proper distance between a director and his characters makes possible a sensitive and accurate social portrait of souls adrift without ever placing us as a voyeur, however profoundly intimate the story that unfolds before us.
_	Noël Corbu (27 April 1912 – 20 May 1968) is best known as a former restaurateur in the Southern French village of Rennes-le-Château who, between 1955-1962 circulated the story that the 19th-century French priest Bérenger Saunière discovered the treasure of Blanche of Castile.
_	Love also generated attention from his Twitter account when he broke the story that Kevin McHale would not return to coach the Timberwolves for the 2009–2010 season.
_	Then, about a year into the development, Jeffrey Katzenberg decided that the story that we'd come up with was the right way for Shrek's journey to end."
_	Tradition from the late 17th century onward regarded Afonso as the founder of the church, and also attributes the story that he buried his own mother alive "for the sake of the Savior King" when she refused to take off a small idol she wore around her neck.
_	Along with this, Amin asks if there is any other evidence contained deeper in the story that can show the nationalist leanings of the peasantry (meaning dress codes, foods, and language, for example).
_	"Two Deer Listening to Sutras" is a symbol of the construction of Tibetan Buddhist temples, which comes from the story that two deer were attracted to listen to sutras dedicatedly when Sakyamuni made his first teaching in Migadaye.
_	However, the story that appeared went to print based on gossip.
_	We could tell the story that was not told, and hint at something much broader than the text itself".
_	He tells the story that Kubrick called him after viewing the film and asked "How did you make this movie?
_	In 2018, Hersh said he was skeptical that Bin Laden was behind the 9/11 attacks, saying "I don’t necessarily buy the story that Bin Laden was responsible for 9/11.
_	From the story that the masseur tells about Iran, a ridiculing and exaggerated story, the narrator then realizes that his own understanding of Iran has been clouded by ill memory and habit.
_	She further recorded the story that after draining blood from a victim, the shtriga would generally go off into the woods and regurgitate it.
_	The band's debut album "Iron Savior" introduced the story that would be told over the course of multiple albums, featuring a self-aware space vessel called the Iron Savior and its relationship to the mythical lost civilization of Atlantis.
_	"One Son" concluded not only the story that had begun in the preceding episode, "Two Fathers", but also a large portion of the series' mythology, much of which had been centered around the Syndicate.
_	The name Juyeop is derived from the story that when the village was viewed from the top of the nearby mountain, the topography of the entire village was shaped like a leaf(엽;葉 meaning leaf), and the word Ju(주;注 meaning pour/flow) came from the story of a large leaf flowing down the creek in the middle of village during Autumn.
_	Slightly later in the letter, he recounts the story that would become the basis of "Pigeons from Hell":
_	The effect was intensified by offsetting the footage to create tracers, and then reversing the image - "it was supposed to tell the story that she sees the action before it actually happens," explains Peristere.
_	These references tell the story that William lived in Paris and was warned by a Colonel in the King's army about the impending St. Bartholomew's Day massacre.
_	The family at Collinwood soon met Julia, who, using the last name Collins, was able to set up the story that she and her brother Barnabas were the children of the "original" Barnabas Collins.
_	The origin of Superman is the story that relates Superman's arrival on Earth and the beginnings of his career as a superhero.
_	Hallows opined that Pickard is "probably the person I've cried at the most, some of the more difficult stories he's done, even though you know the story that's coming up, you can't help but have a lump in your throat".
_	There seem to be no Japanese sources confirming the story, and Richard Gordon Smith himself points out in the preface of the story that he did not verify it and does not vouch for its authenticity.
_	He told Jo that Ami made up the story that he broke into the flat in order to hide the fact they had just slept together from her boyfriend Josh Hunt.
_	With "Gloria", Trevi wanted to have another kind of relation with her audience and follow the story that began with her "painful" songs, such as "El Recuento de los Daños" ("The Recount of the Damages"), evolving in "En Medio de la Tempestad" ("The Midst of The Storm"), watching her in "Todos Me Miran" ("Everybody Looks at Me"), having "Cinco Minutos" ("Five Minutes"), and reaching the "glory".
_	Readers see throughout the course of the story that the members of the community begrudgingly stay civil with Emily.
_	It is the first concept album made by the band, and the story that commences on this album is continued in the album "Room V".
_	The band are releasing a video for every track on the EP to create a visual representation of the story that 'This Life' tells.
_	Every episode opens with Shelley Duvall introducing herself and welcoming the viewer to the show, after which she would provide a brief synopsis of the story that would follow.
_	It is evident through the story that the ability to pass as a white person is correlated with success.
_	They soon realise that if Durga Devi ever finds out that they are having a girl then she will once again treat Priya poorly so they decide to play along with the story that she is having a boy.
_	They only have to read the story that Uncle Painter has laid down there."
_	Bisher conducted several interviews for the story that were ultimately not used in the final published version of the article.
_	On 20 March the "Belfast Telegraph" carried the story that one of the MPs was from Northern Ireland, widely assumed to be James Kilfedder.
_	Virgil ends his legend of Dido with the story that, when Aeneas tells Dido, her heart broken, she orders a pyre to be built where she falls upon Aeneas' sword.
_	Also unsubstantiated is the story that a timber was donated by the then Princess Anne for the roof of the synagogue.
_	Ahe blamed Diddlebock for the story that had gotten out.
_	Terry Morrow of the "Dayton Daily News" criticized the premiere, writing that "the opener, like most pilots, is so bogged down with introducing faces and setting up the story that it turns into a long and tedious journey."
_	In 1978 Richard Attenborough directed a feature film adaptation of the story that starred Anthony Hopkins and Ann-Margret.
_	The only element of the story that may be accepted as authentic is that of the unknown soldier described by Bonfini and Konstantin.
_	This is the story that started it all."
_	Most accounts tell the story that Shackleton saw Joyce on a bus that was passing his expedition offices, sent someone out to fetch him, and recruited him on the spot.
_	His obituary included a retelling of the story that upon his death bed, Wayne C. Booth, one of his former students and another leader in the Chicago School, came to visit and suggested that Crane was looking better, upon which Crane retorted, “What is your evidence?”
_	He was buried at South Head Cemetery, Vaucluse, Sydney (the story that he was buried in a tomb with his wife and pet pony is a popular myth).
_	Akunin uses typography to enhance the story that is being told.
_	The origin of the expression is from the story that the kings of Siam gave white elephants as a gift to courtiers they disliked, in order to ruin the recipient by the great expense incurred in maintaining the animal.
_	Some of the Homeridae tell the story that Helen appeared to Homer in a dream and told him to make a poem about the Trojan expedition.
_	Published after "Celia novelista" (1934), the book picks up the story that was left off in "Celia en el colegio" (1932).
_	Giovanni Boccaccio cites a lost Latin writer for the story that Orion and Candiope were son and daughter of Oenopion, king of Sicily.
_	There seems to be good authority for the story that the system of 1807 was hit upon by the chance occurrence of a mason's sieve near the map of the ground to be laid out.
_	According to the story that came with Binaltech Swindle, the body Swindle inhabits was intended to be the new body for Trailbreaker.
_	Nanci Griffith told the story that in 1986, a songwriter Julie Gold had sent her the song asking Griffith what was wrong with it, as Gold had sent it to so many artists and record companies but none wanted to record it.
_	It is mentioned toward the end of the story that Mr. Evans was the third man who had threatened to cross Mrs. Merrowdene and separate her from the man she loved; this means that Mr. Merrowdene is the man she loved when she was 18 and that the three men were: her stepfather, Mr. Anthony (whom she presumably did not want to marry), and Mr. Evans.
_	Horbury Hunt Hall is integral to the curtilage of the Christ Church Cathedral and the Newcastle Grammar School and the story that the two site and buildings tell.
_	Alternatively, a Midrash tells the story that between King Agag's capture by Saul and his killing by Samuel, Agag fathered a child, from whom Haman in turn descended.
_	But it seems perfectly natural in the story that he and his cohorts be drowned in the Dniper by the Cossack lords.
_	Froissart tells the story that Mauléon had a lady love in Anse, however, Another Bandit leader named Limousin also obtained the favors of this beautiful woman.
_	Even though I recognized how ludicrous the game often was, I was still invested in the story that was slowly unfolding."
_	"The Independent" places emphasis on the comparisons between the story that evolves in "Quicksilver" and Stephenson's earlier novel "Cryptonomicon", with the former "shaping up to be a far more impressive literary endeavour than most so-called 'serious' fiction.
_	In the story that followed, The Times noted that "the United States Government is supplying its Navy with a new engine of destruction which will be a deadly step in the evolution of modern warfare...
_	In the village of Erandio practiced football, so the story that brought the English, who came as technicians to develop the mining industry of Biscay.
_	On February 10, Brendan F. Quinn of MLive.com broke the story that LeVert had been cleared to play.
_	However, just like last week, there is a part of the story that falls a little flat.
_	It is another element of the story that always takes place.
_	Expedition in 1769 for the story that a blunderbuss was lost in the upper canyon by the creek, and so the naming of the area.
_	She also executive produced Elián, which focuses on Elián Gonzales as a grown adult and the story that followed his removal from the US to Cuba.
_	Therefore, the various additional media, such as the illustrated short stories and manga, contain some of the story that was unable to make it into the anime because of time constraints.
_	It is revealed at the conclusion of the story that Falcone was unaware of the larger plot against Batman, and was simply informed that he would have a chance to strike by an anonymous letter sent to him by the true mastermind.
_	It is revealed later in the story that when Ian was about 12 years old Charlie's twin brother Alec had drowned in the town river.
_	This allowed you to suspend your doubt of the supernatural until you were so thoroughly into the story that you could accept it almost without noticing...
_	They decided that the sensational aspects of the case that so titillated newspaper readers in 1954 were far removed from the story that Jackson and Walsh wished to tell.
_	"The Death of Superman" was written to be much more faithful to the original story; according to DC's Tim Beedle, the film is "much less condensed and will include many of the fan-favorite moments from the story that were left out of "Doomsday"."
_	Tom Clark, Biddle's successor, told the story that Biddle, who wore spats, was the first government official whose resignation Truman sought, and that it was quite a difficult task.
_	However, the film’s future associate producer, Melissa Painter, convinced Maggenti to shop the story around as an independent film - two producers wanted a pivotal element which would make two very different girls cross paths, and Maggenti then improvised the story that formed the beginning of their relationship.
_	His another novel Karodaun Kasturi is recently published and it is based on the story that what Nepali comedian Hari Bansha Acharya had become if he hadn't recognized his hidden talent to become a comedian.
_	The media were not so circumspect however and when she received first prize at the ESAT exhibition, newspapers around the world reported the story that a young girl genius had revolutionised cryptography.
_	Hopefully that’s the story that we’re telling."
_	Former Mossad head Isser Harel confirmed the story that former Nazis were recruited to provide intelligence on Arab countries.
_	Howard started circulating the story that his corps' failure had actually been triggered by the collapse of Maj.
_	The Copenhagen University funded research to examine the rituals of Bellona Island which indicated that many men recalled the story that the island began as a Nerita shell and rose up from the ocean (p24).
_	The comic magazine ended with the final arc of 'Three', the story that depicted the death of Johnny Storm, and a story entitled 'Uncles', originally printed in issue #588 of the US publication of "Fantastic Four".
_	The fable's opening lines begin, in the manner of La Fontaine, with a proposition that is to be demonstrated by the story that follows, .
_	Gunny related the story that while he was convincing his colleagues that Gregorio Weber was an exceptional scientist, someone commented that Weber didn’t have as many publications as one might expect from a senior professor.
_	Nava tells the story that, at one point, Mexican police kidnapped their accountant and held him for ransom, while, at the same time, his parents had to pose as tourists in order to smuggle exposed film out of the country in their suitcases.
_	A letter of George Douglas is the earliest source of the story that James V made Oliver Sinclair of Pitcairn commander of his army before the battle of Solway Moss.
_	It is suggested that Robert's father was his Kentucky master, James Harlan, contradicting the story that his father died during Robert's trip with his mother to Cincinnati.
_	When he retired in December 2004, the AP News Service quoted Moyers as saying, "I'm going out telling the story that I think is the biggest story of our time: how the right-wing media has become a partisan propaganda arm of the Republican National Committee.
_	It is an ending to the story that we started so long ago, but it's a very fast-paced ending to the story."
_	B. S. Ramiah wrote the screenplay and dialogues to the story that was based on a French opera, Thaïs.
_	Dicks later reused some of the material for his 1977 script "The Vampire Mutation", the story that eventually became "State of Decay".
_	O'Brien reiterates that the real truth does not have to be the same as the story truth, and that it is the emotions evoked by the story that matter.
_	On May 16th, 2017, Schmidt broke the story that James B. Comey, former FBI Director under the Trump Administration, had written an FBI memo detailing President Donald J. Trump's alleged ordering of Comey to end the FBI's investigation of former Trump Admin National Security Adviser Michael Flynn prior to the conclusion of the investigation's findings.
_	Fred Gibson told the story that the normally placid Marsden went into a rage and threatened to fire the entire team on the spot when he found the Bluebird was fitted with a 2.0 litre turbo engine and not the 1.8 litre unit it raced with.
_	The winner will decide if the story that will be told on the way to school that day will be one about a Shah Rukh Khan film or a Salman Khan film.
_	He also featured on BBC East Midlands Today after breaking the story that Loughborough University was withholding student feedback.
_	In 1999 he broke the story that Exxon was merging with Mobil, then the biggest industrial merger.
_	There's a part in the story that I will question my sexuality.
_	Visits to the Cooper factory for parts led to a friendship with Charlie and John Cooper, who told the story that after many requests for a drive with the factory team, Brabham was given the keys to the transporter taking the cars to a race.
_	This event later became known as the Parsley Massacre because of the story that Dominican soldiers identified Haitians by their inability to pronounce the Spanish word "perejil".
_	A punishment she does not want her son taking and so creates the story that it was an act of self-defense, when the foreigner became violent after he forced himself upon her he left her no choice but to stab him in order to protect herself.
_	The hospital is empty, so it feels like a very ghostly place and that really feeds into the story that we're telling.
_	Pepys, on reflection, may have thought it possible that Elizabeth in her anger had invented the story to upset him, (as she undoubtedly invented the story that she was attending Roman Catholic services).
_	However, the story that they salted the earth is apocryphal.
_	Dodd and other Catholics have disproved the story that the Sorbonne admitted the validity of his Anglican orders.
_	On March 5, 2017, Schmidt broke the story that the F.B.I. director James B. Comey had asked the Justice Department to publicly refute Trump's claims that President Obama had him wired tapped during the 2016 campaign.
_	On June 19, 2013, Giant Bomb broke the story that Microsoft would reverse these policies and not feature them in the console.
_	I had to focus myself on the passion for the vision for the story that we’re doing.
_	Following the release of "Red Star Over Cuba", Weyl and John Martino, an activist against Castro, also actively promoted the story that Lee Harvey Oswald had been in Cuba prior to his attempt on the life of John F. Kennedy, where he enjoyed contact with Cuban intelligence and Castro.
_	""There is also some basis to the story that Karam Ramrakha and Irene Jai Narayan had informed Ratu George secretly that Koya did not enjoy the support of all NFP parliamentarians.
_	If the story that (almost) all Long Ears were killed in a civil war is true, as the islanders story goes, it would be expected that the statue-building South American bloodline would have been nearly utterly destroyed, leaving for the most part the invading Polynesian bloodline.
_	Breweries has promoted Crown Lager (known colloquially as a "crownie") with the story that it was originally brewed in 1919 as "Foster's Crown Lager" and was initially only available to visiting dignitaries that visited Australia.
_	""I won’t make a dime,"" McMillan announced, ""but it’s the story that matters."
_	The 10th century scholar Photius, citing Ptolemy Chennus, mentions the story that Aphrodite lent her magical embroidered band ("kestos himas") to Helen, to ensure that Paris would fall in love with her, and that Astyanassa stole it.
_	Bloxam is the sole source of the story that the game of Rugby football had its origins in the moment when William Webb Ellis picked up the ball during a game of football at Rugby School.
_	In those engagements, they specialized in "ballroom fairy tales", in which the dances told stories and each step of each dance was a component of the story that the dance told.
_	In a typical Mathews conceit, the title of the novel is apparently meaningless until the reader reaches the final pages, at which point it reveals an important twist in the story that is nowhere revealed in the text of the book itself.
_	Sitchin argues that there are Sumerian texts which tell the story that 50 Anunnaki, inhabitants of a planet named Nibiru, came to Earth approximately 400,000 years ago with the intent of mining raw materials, especially gold, for transport back to Nibiru.
_	This would appear to support the story that slaves were landed, or trans-shipped, via the steps at the headland.
_	A lot human imagination was put into the story that made history on Broadcasting Caracas in the 1930s.
_	Children's literature scholar Ruth Bottigheimer discounts as myth the story that Perrault recounted stories he heard from a household nurse.
_	Jamieson records the story that tramps were lured to their deaths at the inns along this road by 'body snatchers' and as evidence it is recorded that when the Cleikum Inn at Auchentiber was demolished a large collection of walking sticks were found.
_	Within the next day, he began to envision the story that could result from this beginning, and invented the characters, the plot, and the tone that the story would eventually take.
_	Nikhil proved throughout the story that he was undeniably devoted to his wife.
_	Southern Gothic literature includes events in the story that are macabre, grotesque, or fantastic.
_	A variation of the "Coppélia" story is contained in Jacques Offenbach's opera, "The Tales of Hoffmann", a fictional work about the same Hoffmann who wrote the story that inspired "Coppélia".
_	Schneyer has stated that "Selected" is about ghosts, and that the narrator is intended to be a "curator who (...) entirely misunderstand(s) the story that was being told by the paintings."
_	However it was a fake and the story that accompanied it was adapted from an urban legend attached to recipes for cookies from Neiman Marcus and Waldorf-Astoria for red velvet cake.
_	Jenny takes this to mean that she has chosen poorly, and Mrs Teachum assures her that it is not the content of the story that matters, but how it is read and viewed that decides whether or not it is appropriate.
_	It has been hinted throughout the story that the Eight Enigmas think differently from the conventional military advisor.
_	There was also more to the story that was about the social issue, and there was no magical zenite gas that was causing the problem.
_	His sense of timing, the clarity of his production, and the variety of effects he employs draw you into the story that each instrumental tells.
_	But that is the story that emerged from his painstaking, courageous reporting, and readers will be thankful for his work.
_	Among the three, this is the story that plays most on the language barrier thing, with some absolutely hilarious scenes resulting.
_	With his colleague Selena Roberts, Epstein broke the story that the Yankees' Alex Rodriguez tested positive for steroids in 2003.
_	"The Times of India" in its review rated the film three out of five and wrote, "With a neat script and narration, the director has done a good job of the story that keeps you gripped to the seat.
_	In 2009, Davenport was the first reporter to break the story that then-Governor Mark Sanford had been out of state for several days, uncovering a sex scandal.
_	The attribution reads 'Tushmalov/Rimsky-Korsakov' for reasons that go unexplained in this specific case, though perhaps it is due to the story that Rimsky-Korsakov made edits to the Tushmalov orchestration in preparing it for the premiere.
_	This was replaced by the story that the Land of Ond was ruled by the descendants of Anárion until their "failing", while Isildur's son remained at Rivendell and after the death of his father established another realm in the north.
_	That is one of the few parts of the story that is essential to her current unhappiness, and is therefore the only concrete fact.
_	Jack Colwell broke the story that the Studebaker Corp. auto company would shut down its factory in South Bend that month.
_	These factors enabled Hindenburg and other senior German leaders to spread the story that their armies had not really been defeated.
_	The magazine asked if "she did not sometimes wonder how much truth there is in the story that he once said he would renounce his rights upon the death of George V – which would make her nickname come true".
_	In this study there were two important variables that were under the control of the researcher: the articulatory suppression variable (no articulatory suppression, articulatory suppression or complex articulatory suppression) and whether the story that was read to the students was coherent or not.
_	An earlier improvisation on the story that involves art and its value was written by the Silesian artist Janosch under the title "Die Fiedelgrille und der Maulwurf" (The fiddling cricket and the mole), originally published in 1982 and in English translation in 1983.
_	The novel is an alternative version of the story that was told in the once controversial novel "Lady Chatterley's Lover", published in 1928.
_	"An elephant walks into a bar…"; a native English speaker automatically understands that this is the start of a joke, and the story that follows is not meant to be taken at face value (i.e. it is non-bona-fide communication).
_	Ibn Ziyad then called in Ma'qil and had him corroborate the story that Ibn Ziyad was trying to paint.
_	Fox News broke the story that Alexander Yakovlev, a Russian official in the UN Procurement Department, was involved; he later resigned and pleaded guilty to corruption charges.
_	It is revealed during the course of the story that Roberts is not one man, but a series of individuals who pass the name and reputation to a chosen successor once they are wealthy enough to retire.
_	In March 2012, Lynam broke the story that the UK Government was in serious talks with Abu Dhabi with the view to selling it a substantial stake in RBS.
_	Women were not allowed to be part of the story that was being played out on stage, but they were allowed to have a dance in-between the action.
_	At the start of the work, the narrator mentions frequently that his time on Earth is limited, and reveals later in the story that his intention is to commit suicide.
_	"Rocky Mountain Express" highlights the aspects of the story that directly relate to the landscape the train is travelling through.
_	It is the story that introduces Lovecraft's fictional Pnakotic Manuscripts, the first of his arcane tomes.
_	Pukirev appears at the far right of the canvas (possibly as best man), giving rise to the story that it represented an episode of lost love in his own life.
_	The historian, Herodotus, relates the story that when the Pelasgians were driven from Attika (Attica) they kidnapped a number of Athenian women and took them to Lemnos; the women were defiant and taught their children to act and speak like Athenians; the Pelasgians would not accept such rebellious attitudes and killed the captive mothers and children and thus the term Lemnian Deeds became an enduring insult to the honor and manhood of the inhabitants.
_	In a week, the team reported on the dead and missing children, and they broke the story that the Atlanta Police Task Force was not writing down or following up every lead they received through the police hotline that had been set up.
_	The Netherlands was shocked on 4 January 2013 when the NOS evening news led with the story that Jansen Steur had found another job as a neurologist in the "Klinik am Gesundbrunnen" hospital in Heilbronn.
_	Malathi Rangarajan of The Hindu gave the film a mixed review, noting that "Certain scenes are too contrived - the aim is humour but they only tend to irritate", while adding "the screenplay is fast-paced, the dialogue is crisp, it is the story that lags behind".
_	That year, Xuxa announced that she would make her return to theaters, including in a "Xuxa Hits", the blonde even told a bit about the story that would be a kind of continuation of "Sonho de Verão".
_	Beth is wrapped up in the story that Harry initially believes to be a hoax, and Beth admits she would do the same as Coral if she was the victim.
_	In each of his works on the Indian Puranas, he chose a point in the story that was filled with drama and emotion.
_	According to Joseph Pearce, "The press made much of the story that the son of the former Archbishop of Canterbury had become a Catholic, and the revelation rocked the Anglican establishment in a way reminiscent of the days of the Oxford Movement and the conversion of Newman."
_	He was given the guitar by a friend who had it nailed to his wall as a decoration, but at his gigs, he often tells the story that he bought it for US$75 in this condition from a man who later told him he only paid US$25 for it the day before, and claims to have vowed never to add another string, and that he would tour the world telling his story of how the seller ripped him off.
_	He relates the story that, while working as a solicitor, he talked so much about making a career change and becoming a comedian that his wife Leandra gave him an ultimatum: she marked a date on a calendar and told him to quit his job and become a comedian by that date or never talk about it again.
_	"The Death of Superman" was written to be much more faithful to the original story; according to DC's Tim Beedle, the film is "much less condensed and will include many of the fan-favorite moments from the story that were left out of "Doomsday"."
_	Since the medical community has guidelines for what types of individuals qualify for sex reassignment surgery, transsexual persons sometimes adopt and tell the story that they believe will best help them qualify – the "feminine essence narrative" – and representing themselves as "essentially female", which may explain at least part of the prevalence of the feminine essence narrative.
_	On April 14, 2012, Kessler broke the story that the Secret Service had removed and sent home agents assigned to protect President Obama during his trip to Cartagena, Colombia, because they had been involved in hiring prostitutes there.
_	It is evident throughout the story that both Ben and Cillian are torn by guilt of essentially letting Todd's mother be murdered.
_	Credited as "Frank S. Nugent" or "Frank Nugent" for screenplay or the story that provides the basis for the screenplay.
_	Despite "frankfurter" sausage makers being the target of violence in World War I, the story that saveloys were once frankfurters, renamed due to anti-German sentiment, is purely apocryphal, as far as Australia is concerned.
_	By the middle of November the British Royal Family were so interested in the story that they sent St. André and Samuel Molyneux, secretary to the Prince of Wales, to investigate.
_	The now elderly witnesses did not agree in every detail, but they generally corroborated the story that a declaration of independence had been read in public in Charlotte, although they were not all certain about the date.
_	She inventively pieces together an impressionistic, revealing, and ultimately moving version of the story that so many of us know already."
_	Some accounts claim that the raid was made without cause by a renegade band from the north, or that it was the start of a general Indian war, but the story that the white men held two Indian women captive in a root cellar is generally considered the most reasonable explanation.
_	During the aftermath of Hurricane Katrina and criticism of FEMA's response to the hurricane, HorsesAss.org became nationally known for breaking the story that then-FEMA Director Michael Brown's previous work experience was overseeing judges and stewards for 11 years at the International Arabian Horse Association.
_	However, the story that it tells is consistent with everything one knows about Eddy's final years."
_	The sword was sold at auction by Sotheby's in late 2003 for GBP 36,000, described as "believed to be that carried by Captain (later Admiral Lord) Horatio Nelson" and with extensive notes relating to the provenance and origins of the story that it was with Nelson at the time of his death.
_	In Japanese mythology, the , is the story that describes the legendary birth of the celestial and earthly world, the birth of the first gods and the birth of the Japanese archipelago.
_	Bede relates the story that Laurence had been prepared to give up when he was visited by St Peter in a dream or vision.
_	It is revealed through the course of the story that George Wickham's true nature is that of a manipulative unprincipled layabout, a ne'er-do-well wastrel, compulsive liar (talking out of both sides of mouth, and using the truth to make his falsehoods very believable) and a degenerate, compulsive gambler, a seducer and a libertine, living the lifestyle of a rake.
_	Harper told the story that he once missed the open box-car door, picked up the package from beside the tracks and followed the train to Whiteville.
_	There is no evidence for the story that he later talked his fellow Berliner Helmut Newton into giving his photographic collection to the city.
_	It was backed up by the story that the school selected the year as to commemorate Sun Yat-sen.
_	The earliest known mention of the story that crocodiles weep for their victims was in the 9th century; it was later spread by Sir John Mandeville in 1400 and then by William Shakespeare in the late 16th century and early 17th century.
_	From 24 June the Allies began to wind down Vendetta with the story that due to German forces remaining in the south of France (rather than moving to Normandy) that the invasion had been delayed.
_	The image of decadence was epitomised by the story that he had a special harem slide of marble constructed.
_	To this, Emma Smith replied that she had never seen such a document, and concerning the story that she had destroyed the original:
_	James Johnston of "Multiversity Comics" stated that while the story is probably not the story that’s going to put Fury Jr. on the map, it is still a nice one shot that helps flesh out the modern character while st the same time tying the older one into some relevant political discussion.
_	Gowariker has also said that it was while writing the story that he realised the self-satisfaction that people get after climbing Mount Everest.
_	He tells them about the parts of the story that are true and shares his opinion on his job with the students.
_	The reader believes at the beginning of the story that their love for each other is unbreakable , but as the plot advances, more and more troubles arise, alienating the couple.
_	Bede mentions the story that Oswald prayed for the souls of his soldiers when he saw that he was about to die.
_	He suggested the story that eventually became "The Lost Boy" (Issues #4-#7).
_	Rumors include the story that Ayatollah Khomeini initially did not want to execute Ghotbzadeh; but, he was persuaded to do so after hearing a tape of Ghotbzadeh in prison agreeing to pay money and provide the contact information of his allies in France in exchange for his freedom.
_	In June 2013 Higson wrote a television adaptation of "A Caribbean Mystery", the story that inspired Ian Fleming to give the protagonist of his novel "Casino Royale" a name.
_	He also worked with Moore on "Miracleman", illustrating the story that graphically depicted the birth of Miracleman's child published by Eclipse Comics in "Miracleman" #9 (July 1986).
_	""Boxing Helena was"... not perfect, but I think for the story that we were trying to tell, it turned out pretty good.
_	A month later, Buck disclosed during a visit to Australia that the directors already have an idea for the sequel's ending, but they are still working on the story that will eventually culminate in that ending.
_	Alternatively, a Midrash tells the story that between King Agag's capture by Saul and his killing by Samuel, Agag fathered a child, from whom Haman in turn descended.
_	"The New York Times" reported he was considering all options but quoted him as saying he was dedicated to covering the economy, "the story that is affecting every American in every setting."
_	However, most historians downplay the likelihood of this account, in favor of the story that Imru' al-Qais actually died from a chronic skin disease, a disease which he mentioned in one of his poems.
_	However, the story that he ate Xu Shiji’s flesh was a real one which impressed people for thousand years.
_	However, the horse was above the top layer of logs, not below, and the story that a worker died from the smell was probably inspired by the reports about the excavation of Tutankhamun's tomb.
_	The article also ran a number of images from Pavement's "impressive archives" and a Q&A section featuring founders McDonald and Hunt, with the latter joking at the conclusion of the story that the magazine closed because he "was sick of getting the dictionary thrown at me!"
_	Soon enough, the story that an elderly man going to school becomes national headlines.
_	It was during this time that Corbu began circulating the story that Bérenger Saunière discovered the treasure of Blanche of Castile.
_	But the archetypal conflict of Cavalier and Puritan is surely operative, too; and it is this archetypal aspect of the story that has persuaded some critics to treat it as a full-blown myth—one strong and attractive enough in any case to have cued innumerable retellings."
_	He faced opposition from the able and ambitious Prime Serjeant, Sir Audley Mervyn, who, apparently by spreading the story that Domville was sympathetic to Roman Catholics, gained the support of the majority of MPs (in fact Domville was a strong Protestant).
_	2004's "" was the story that solidified what the series was, and would set the direction for future books to come, so much so that the first major story cycle is collected in omnibus editions titled "B.P.R.D.: Plague of Frogs".
_	While Stein has been credited with inventing the term "Lost Generation" for those whose defining moment in time and coming of age had been World War I and its aftermath, there are at least three versions of the story that led to the phrase, two by Hemingway and one by Stein.
_	His daring is illustrated by the story that he came by night to the temple of Athene "of the Brazen House" at Sparta, and there set up his shield with the inscription "Dedicated to the goddess by Aristomenes from the Spartans."
_	Crane completed the story that would become "The Open Boat" a few weeks later, in mid-February.
_	In later years Asser, a scholar at Alfred the Great's court, recorded the story that Beorhtric had died from being accidentally poisoned by his wife, Eadburh.
_	Most famously, "NEXT scooped" the story that the president, President Yar'Adua was secretly brain dead and not "returning soon from a Saudi hospital" as promised.
_	Petria was abandoned at a young age by her parents, and has survived by doing odd jobs around town; it is suggested in the story that Robyn Hart has taken care of her in the past.
_	Thus, Nelepp’s Gherman closely resembled Pushkin’s portrayal of the character in the story that is the basis of the opera.
_	Certain difficulties, however, present themselves with regard to the story that the animal was wild bred.
_	Aimee begs Rob to introduce them, leading to him pleading with Jamelia to go along with the story that they're friends.
_	Paramvir, Gajodhar and Dharam make up the story that she is their neighbour in Canada and that her husband is also named Paramvir who went missing last year.
_	A version of the story that was edited and altered by L. Sprague de Camp appeared in the collection "Conan the Barbarian" (Gnome Press, 1954).
_	Williams dismissed the story that Sequoyah's father was an itinerant German peddler by the name of Guess.
_	Chekhov's original manuscript has been lost and there is only the "Novoye Vremya" version of the story that is extant.
_	Steve McQueen told the story that in 1973 he flew to the UK to discuss a film project with Reed and suggested the two men visit a London nightclub.
_	Greenland was so impressed with the story that, without Clarke's knowledge, he sent an excerpt to his friend, the fantasy writer Neil Gaiman.
_	Then, about a year into the development, Jeffrey Katzenberg decided that the story that we'd come up with was the right way for Shrek's journey to end."
_	The name was chosen based on the story that had been laid out in the ritual and it was thought to be suitably mysterious and grandiose for the time period.
_	Saint Augustine of Hippo concluded from the story that Christians have no duties towards animals, writing:
_	Carlsson remarked that they "really wanted to tell the story that described that moment when everybody's checking out on Vegas after they've had their fun.
_	A later Scottish chronicle writer, Robert Lindsay of Pitscottie, tells the story that James wasted valuable time at Ford enjoying the company of Elizabeth, Lady Heron and her daughter.
_	"West Lake Dream Searching" , written by Zhang Dai, relates the story that Qin Shi Huang visited the area and moored his boat to a stone later developed into the Big Stone Buddhist Temple.
_	Paramvir, Gajodhar and Dharam make up the story that she is their neighbour in Canada and that her husband is also named Paramvir who went missing last year.
_	The spirit is summoned and begins to tell the story that she had a secret relationship with the bungalow keeper, Darshan, and another man.
_	The plot was set around the story that Prince Charles (played by Sinden) was kidnapped by activists wanting to save the theatre building from demolition.
_	The later versions of the story that identify two elders playing "Go" may also be influenced by the motif of immortals playing "Go" in other stories, such as the tale that appeared in Gan Bao's 4th-century compilation of supernatural stories "In Search of the Supernatural", in which the gods Bei Dou (the Big Dipper) and Nan Dou (the corresponding stars in Sagittarius) were playing "Go", when the youth Yan Chao approached them to ask for a longer life.
_	The Spalding–Rigdon theory of Book of Mormon authorship is the story that the Book of Mormon was plagiarized in part from an unpublished manuscript written by Solomon Spalding.
_	Haley told the story that when he made a simulated guitar out of cardboard, his parents bought him a real one.
_	Events and details of the story that are only found in later authors may have been passed on through oral tradition and could be as old as the Homeric poems.
_	Walsh related the story that in 1994 he woke up after blacking out on an airplane to Paris.
_	His town mansion of Myrtle Grove is assumed to be the setting for the story that his servant doused him with a bucket of water after seeing clouds of smoke coming from Raleigh's pipe, in the belief that he had been set alight.
_	Also, in "Don Quixote" by Cervantes, there are many stories within the story that influence the hero's actions (there are others that even the author himself admits are purely digressive).
_	Alexander replied "Our job is foreign intelligence" and that "Those who would want to weave the story that we have millions or hundreds of millions of dossiers on people, is absolutely false ...
_	At the heart of the Crown's appeal was that Lane's lies – those concerning Andrew Morris, Andrew Norris, and the story that she gave Tegan to a "Perth couple" – were indicative of Lane's guilt.
_	A number of legends later grew up around Nesimi's execution, such as the story that he mocked his executioners with improvised verse and, after the execution, draped his flayed skin around his shoulders and departed.
_	Some urban legends have cropped up along the way also, including the story that upon passing the figure on their way to a concert date in Syracuse the ironically labeled Heavy Metal band Black Sabbath conjured up the song “Iron Man”.
_	Initial reports claimed that XPW valet Kristi Myst had somehow touched ECW valet Francine Fournier and that this is what prompted the incident, but Fournier herself has since gone on record as saying that she was never grabbed or in any other way touched by any of the XPW crew, and other eyewitnesses support the story that Fournier never had a hand laid on her.
_	Some of the characters, and a lot of the story works quite well, but there are a couple of characters and bits of the story that either fall flat or just don’t work at all."
_	Some have credited Malamud for inventing aspects of the story that he took from Beilis’ memoir while others have confused Beilis’ character with that of Malamud’s character Yakov Bok.
_	It was in 1941 that they wrote "Miss Pilgrim's Progress", the story that would become" The Shocking Miss Pilgrim".
_	Previously, in 1986, she broke the story that Supreme Court nominee Douglas H. Ginsburg had smoked marijuana, leading Ginsburg to withdraw his name.
_	The "Christian Science Monitor" ran a story in 1985, suggesting that the Czech Disinformation Department may have been responsible for the story that Palmer was a CIA agent.
_	The gateway to the Mediterranean Sea from the Atlantic Ocean, where the southernmost tip of Spain and the northernmost of Morocco face each other is, classically speaking, referred to as the Pillars of Hercules/Heracles, owing to the story that he set up two massive spires of stone to stabilise the area and ensure the safety of ships sailing between the two landmasses.
_	He added that they were there to continue the story that Guttmann started and stated that they had the "ability to win medals and change the world".
_	Ms. Brady also followed this practice, which may have led to the story that the Academy was presenting her with a replacement trophy.
_	Andy was so fascinated about the story that he had a dream about lions that same night.
_	Vikram was never satisfied with the story that his brother died in a plane crash.
_	After his resignation, he took the habit of an Augustinian canon at Stafford, although the story that he founded the house he retired has since been proven to be not the case.
_	During her trial, Juliette keeps to the story that the burnt letterbox contained love letters.
_	Explaining the reasons for his decision, he says: "That is because I enjoyed the story that Sethu narrated to me.
_	This depends on the story that is built around the trick as part of the performance.
_	The other portion of the story that is not written by Amelia Earhart herself was from people who knew her, met her on her trips, or wrote about her.
_	On November 28, Bleeding Cool broke the story that Marvel determined that Yoshida was a pseudonym of Cebulski's in 2006 after Johnston reported on Gregg Schigiel's podcast.
_	However, it is revealed at the end of the story that everything in the city is normal colored, but the glasses everyone wears are emerald tinted.
_	He also identified elements within the story that he believed reflected recurring themes within "The Adventures of Tintin".
_	There are four or five different elements to the story that are ordered differently according to version.
_	The feud continued after WrestleMania based on the story that Wyatt was capturing Cena's fanbase, which was exemplified by Wyatt leading a children's choir to the ring on the April 28 episode of "Raw", with the children later putting on sheep masks.
_	Dramatic Irony is when the reader knows something important about the story that one or more characters in the story do not know.
_	On January 26, 2012, the "Chicago Sun-Times" broke the story that the Kennedy family was planning a three-tower development at Wolf Point.
_	He said that Theseus' grandfather Pittheus invented the story that Theseus was the child of Neptune to conceal Theseus' lineage as the son of Pittheus' daughter Aethra and Aegeus ("Lives", Vol. 1, p. 2; pp. 3 ff.).
_	Albert Wilmarth remarks in the story that Upton "has had a distinguished career ever since he was given a clean bill of mental health and discharged with a verdict of 'justified homicide'".
_	Steven Hopper, writing for IGN, listed her as his second favorite "Mass Effect" teammate after Garrus Vakarian, praising her "endearing geekiness" and the story that follows her.
_	The exorcism of Roland Doe, the story that was the basis for the 1971 novel and 1973 film "The Exorcist", has its roots in Cottage City.
_	By the time he had completed the script, Zwick had become so interested in the story that he agreed to direct the film as well.
_	Titus Livius (Livy) and Plutarch refer to the story that Numa was instructed in philosophy by Pythagoras but discredit it as chronologically and geographically implausible.
_	Many versions of the legend of the Hero Twins Hunahpú and Xbalanqué circulated through the Mayan peoples, but the story that survives was preserved by the Dominican priest Francisco Ximénez who translated the document between 1700 and 1715.
_	During the filming of the climactic scene with Pembleton and Lange which ends with Lange's death, several members of the crew reacted emotionally, something Yoshimura said is extremely rare because the crew members typically look at their work as a job and do not become emotionally invested in the story that they are filming.
_	I came up with the characters who went to the country, Charley and a boyfriend, and we mingled that with the story that had always been there about Mrs Bilson.
_	The "bones" of the title refer to the time traveling team players described in the story that study throughout Earth's history and pre-history.
_	It doesn't become clear until later in the story that the three women are the poisoned deposed queen, Park Myeong-yi (Seo's eventual wife) and Jang-geum (Seo's daughter).
_	Lee then turned to Steve Ditko to draw the story that would appear in "Amazing Fantasy" #15, for which Kirby nonetheless penciled the cover.
_	Like if we do a comic, comics are better for telling certain types of stories," adding, "we really decide what kind of story we want to tell, what's the story that we're going to tell, and then it's all about, lets figure out the best way to do this."
_	Isherwood apparently began writing the story that would become "Sally Bowles" in 1933, writing to friend Olive Mangeot in July of that year that he had written it.
_	So as to introduce outdoor effects a number of scenes have been added [from the play], illustrating episodes of the story that were not included in the stage version.
_	Poe scholar Scott Peeples summarizes the importance of "MS. Found in a Bottle" as "the story that launched Poe's career".
_	Anna also tells the story that Tatikios and Alexius were playing polo when the general was thrown from his horse and landed on the emperor.
_	The front page newspaper report in "The Express" was published two weeks after Bobby first met the Jesus Christians with the story that Bobby had "disappeared" after he met the group: "Within hours Bobby had forsaken his possessions and moved in with the group.
_	Constance's complete absence of judgement of her sister and her crime is treated as absolutely normal and unremarkable, and it is clear throughout the story that Merricat loves and cares deeply for her sister, despite her otherwise apparently sociopathic tendencies.
_	There may be some foundation of truth in the story that Amr travelled in Syria and had brought back from there the cults of the goddesses ʻUzzāʼ and Manāt, and had combined it with that of Hubal, the idol of the Khuza'a.
_	"TIME" reviewe the film and said after summarizing the story that "Uptown New York was written by Vina Delmar with dangerous recklessness as to motivation but with a good eye for local color.
_	"The Frost–Giant's Daughter" is the original version of the story that first appeared, edited by L. Sprague de Camp, in the magazine "Fantasy Fiction".
_	Baldwin tells the story that happened to The Melodeers, a group of jazz singers employed by the Progressive Party to sing in Southern Churches.
_	It was only when planning out the story that he realised that there would not be a great deal of personal differences across realities with Picard.
_	Tolkien began writing the story that would become "The Fall of Gondolin" in 1917 in an army barracks on the back of a sheet of military marching music.
_	Jay Seaver from "efilmcritic.com" called it a "thoroughly funky French-Canadian sci-fi!", and wrote: "All of this put together is a small, colorful delight – the funny bits come and go quickly enough to get their chuckles and not wear out their welcome, the whole thing is pretty, and the story that eventually gets told has some heft to it without ever losing sight of the film's goal of being entertaining."
_	In order to hide this attraction from the King's mother and wife, Henriette and Louis invented the story that he was constantly in Henriette's company in order to be close to one of her ladies-in-waiting, Louise de La Vallière.
_	It may relate to Saxo Grammaticus and contain a version of the story that inspired the lost "Ur-Hamlet" and ultimately William Shakespeare's "Hamlet".
_	She seems to have pre-deceased her husband, after bearing him a son, David ap Gwion, and therefore there can be no truth in the story that she later married into the Corbet family of Caus Castle (near Westbury, Shropshire) and later, Moreton Corbet Castle.
_	So you interpret history to tell the story that is relevant to us now'.
_	But the above personal information does not match the story that he was orphaned at nine and later apprenticed to a printer, Andrew Kennedy, editor of the Northumberland "Gazette" before entering the field of journalism.
_	The "Bibliotheca", a Roman-era mythological compendium, adds the story that Lycaon attempted to test Zeus’ omniscience by tricking him into eating a sacrifice mixed with human flesh.
_	But it seems perfectly natural in the story that he and his cohorts be drowned in the Dnieper by the Cossack lords.
_	A peculiar development of the Killir legend is seen in the story that Saadia found in the tomb of Killir a recipe for making ""kame'ot"" in the form of cakes (Goldziher, in ""Festschrift zum 70ten Geburtstag Berliners"," p. 150).
_	Rev. W. Awdry said that such a race was not likely due to "reprisals from authority", and he is careful to note in the story that "although, between you and me, they would like to have another race, I don't think they ever will".
_	Jim tells the story that sometime in the late 1920s Harold McCarty, the man who was most responsible for the creation of what has become Wisconsin Public Radio, was in the studio waiting for a guest who didn't show up.
_	On February 10, 2016, "The Washington Post" and radio station WTOP-FM first broke the story that Monumental Sports & Entertainment (Ted Leonsis, chairman) were "close to a deal" to bring a new expansion franchise to the Verizon Center.
_	Meanwhile, her former boyfriend Albeiro and her mother Hilda, apparently the only characters in the story that keep their integrity up to the end, start a relationship behind her back.
_	In February 2014, "Onward State" broke the story that then Florida State University President Eric J. Barron had accepted an offer to become Penn State's president.
_	Morrison has expressed surprise at the various retcons and explanations for the events of the story that emerged after his departure from Marvel.
_	Kevin is shown as being a purely innocent character with no idea why anyone would want to hurt him, and the story that follows involves an FBI agent and an old friend named Samantha Sheer.
_	They serve as a sign that the children who make them and those who visit the statue desire a world without nuclear war, having been tied to the statue by the story that Sadako died from radiation-induced leukemia after folding just under a thousand cranes, wishing for world peace.
_	I think there's a way that Robert did some of the story that we're reaching that had a real past to it, where people are referring to some things in the past in the comic.
_	This account, however, is contradicted by the story that Onias III was murdered at Antioch in 171 BCE.
_	There’s also a lull in the middle of the story that’s hard to ignore, and cliffhangers that are barely worthy of the name.
_	The kids and Astro see the Dog Catcher, and they make up the story that they traded him.
_	Shigeru Miyamoto and Yoshiaki Koizumi came up with the story that served as the basis for the script written by Mitsuhiro Takano.
_	According to Roland Barthes the coded iconic message is the story that the image portrays.
_	Glorette and FX's families are connected by the story that was the catalyst for "A Million Nightingales".
_	On February 10, 2016, "The Washington Post" and radio station WTOP-FM first broke the story that Monumental Sports and Entertainment (Ted Leonsis, chairman), which also owns the NBA's Washington Wizards, WNBA's Washington Mystics, and NHL's Washington Capitals were "close to a deal" in bring a new Arena Football League expansion franchise to the Capital One Arena.
_	In the same transmission the chief Toba, Esteban Moreno, told the story that had been passed down the generations.
_	As the legend of the outlaw Robin Hood spread in the coming centuries, it was said that Robin was a contemporary and supporter of king Richard the Lionheart, driven to outlawry during the misrule of Richard's brother John while Richard was away at the Third Crusade, but this is not the story that spreads during Alan's and Robin's own time.
_	Several historians responded to the vandalism, with "The Times of India" reporting, "Sufi poet Jayasi made up the story that later got legend status, so Bhansali can't be threatened for taking creative licence with the tale, say historians".
_	To provide an explanation for her battered face, she concocted the story that she was raped by a black man.
_	According to biographer Linda Porter, the story that as a child, Catherine could not tolerate sewing and often said to her mother "my hands are ordained to touch crowns and sceptres, not spindles and needles" is almost certainly apocryphal.
_	I thought I should tell the story that will bring this bridge, this gap to the west.
_	It is claimed in the story that the ghost of Helen now weeps at his grave.
_	Walter of Guisborough tells the story that the earl was served a writ of "quo warranto" ("by what warrant?") as a result of these proceedings.
_	Not convinced by the story that Higginson was an idiot seeking work, on searching his valise they were unable to find further evidence as its contents were smothered by chocolate which had melted in the summer heat.
_	One prevailing conspiracy theory is that he was killed in his power rivalry with Kimathi, who then made up the story that Mathenge had gone to Ethiopia to seek assistance from Haile Selassie.
_	That fall he broke the story that UN peacekeepers were the likely cause of a post-quake cholera epidemic that has since become the deadliest in recent history, killing more than 8,500 people.
_	The historian Henry S. Randall, in an 1868 letter to James Parton, also a historian, wrote that "The 'Dusky Sally Story'--the story that Mr. Jefferson kept one of his slaves, (Sally Hemings) as his mistress and had children by her, was once extensively believed by respectable men..."
_	Matt Leone of 1UP said that the strongest aspect "is how it excels as both a story and an action game," and it is the story that "allows the game to feel like a true sequel."
_	During the fall of the Iron Curtain, Makem often proudly told the story that his song "The Winds Are Singing Freedom" had become a sort of folk anthem among Eastern Europeans seeing a new future opening before them.
_	Appling was well known for his ability to foul off pitches, leading to the story that he once fouled off 10 pitches in a row on purpose when ownership refused to give some baseballs to autograph because they were too expensive; he was supposedly never refused a ball again.
_	However, there's a place for the story that needs to be told from our perspective."
_	In April 2012, Buttimer came out as gay, the first Fine Gael TD to do so, saying: "I am a TD who just happens to be gay – it is just one little composition of the story that is me and I will continue to be the politician I was yesterday."
_	The plan is that Hawkmoon shall journey to Kamarg dressed as Meliadus, with the story that he drugged him and thus secured passage undetected.
_	He confirmed that the sessions included stunts such as urinating in a guitar and filling drums with water to see how it affected their sound, but that the story that the band had filled the studio with helium balloons was an exaggeration, stating that they had fooled around with a helium balloon that had been brought in one day, but no more than that.
_	About the future of the comic book McCann stated, "I can tell you that David Lopez and I are not done working together, and the story that I've plotted, planned out and wanted to tell after 'Widowmaker' is still going to be told.
_	This accounts for the story that Elizabeth I called him “cousin Hildersham”.
_	Pagliarulo took charge of writing the incipit of "Fallout 3", then played by Ron Perlman, and he tried to be inspired by first "Fallout"s incipit, in 1997, which he considered vitally important to describe the story that "Fallout 3" would have to tell.
_	Phaedrus comments on the story that "When there is a change in government, nothing changes for the poor folk except their master's name."
_	A version of the story that was edited by L. Sprague de Camp was first published in the collection "Conan the Barbarian" (Gnome Press, 1954).
_	Pindar also reports as uncertain the story that the predecessor of Dodona oracle was located in Thessaly:
_	The Renaissance music theorist Vincenzo Galilei refers to the story that Timotheus aroused Alexander's passions with his music.
_	The story he tells his father is the story that is written above.
_	ABC's Jackson had relayed the story that had been told to him by a Chicago Cub official Buck Peden and alerted the boy to his own medical condition.
_	Much of the story that follows consists of scenes of the Angels partying or being provoked to violence by "squares."
_	The video was called "too arty" at the time and the story that it was trying to tell, was never fully understood by the public.
_	He also worked briefly with Relic Entertainment on one of the early drafts of the story that would eventually, years later, become "Homeworld 2".
_	Magical Girl Site has characters present in the story that are referred to as "site admins".
_	The feud continued after WrestleMania XXX based on the story that Wyatt was capturing Cena's fanbase, which was exemplified by Wyatt leading a children's choir to the ring on the April 28 episode of "Raw", with the children later putting on sheep masks.
_	Stockwell mentions in a footnote to the story that at the time he did not know that the CIA is documented as having repeatedly tried to arrange for Lumumba's assassination.
_	"Judgment" expands on lore introduced in the earliest films, with Paul Taylor called it a "jumping-off point" for a sequel which " ... could continue the story that it tells because it's a true "Hellraiser" script with a beginning, a middle, and a sort of ambiguous end.
_	While writing for the "Post", she broke the story that many of the works of Martha Graham were in the public domain.
_	The fact that Bell's filing fee was recorded earlier than Gray's fee led to the story that Bell had arrived at the patent office earlier.
_	The shorts end with Mater leaving the scene, often followed by characters or references to the story that was being told, suggesting the story might be real.
_	It's not merely that the numbers are forgettable—they are—it's that they're shoe-horned so obviously into the story that they don't amplify it, they stop it cold."
_	Janine Hawkins of Polygon commented on the flow of the story that despite the use of multiple endings, the game did change aspects of narrative and gameplay even when revisiting parts of the game from a previous playthrough, in what she felt was the game being "highly invested in maintaining player momentum, in giving them every reason to keep moving forward, and that made the pursuit of those "true" endings all the more satisfying for me".
_	After a meeting with friends at which it was agreed that each should produce a novel, the young Moravia began writing the story that would become "Gli Indifferenti".
_	It is far from certain that the track actually reached France, discounting the story that the ship carrying the track was sunk in the channel – a story that seems to be attached to many of the singled stretches of track; the government guaranteed the railway companies that they would be compensated for the track taken after the war but in the case of this particular stretch they seem to have had reservations about paying up.
_	The name of Kongwang came from the story that the Confucius once climbed the mountain to watch the sea (although nowadays the sea is no longer visible from the mountain).
_	A court of inquiry's conclusion was that no-one could be attributed the blame for the incident, and that it would be reasonable to support the story that the squall was to blame.
_	Terry Heller writes in his analysis of the story that the town, “[chose] to deal with an idea of Emily, rather than with Emily herself; they are different in that they have different ideas of her and, therefore, approach her… differently.”
_	One of McDonough's biggest scoops came during the week before Super Bowl XXXI when he broke the story that Patriots' head coach Bill Parcells, one of McDonough's best friends, was planning to leave the Patriots after the Super Bowl and become head coach of the New York Jets.
_	There are various accounts of what happened subsequently, including the story that Clarence hid her in a London cookshop, disguised as a servant, so that his brother would not know where she was.
_	Burton Mail said: "Fans of the series might suggest that this isn’t as ‘Horrible’ as we might expect - the grisly details of historical times are perhaps kept in check by the needs of a Christmas show - and the story that links the period sketches is a little tedious, if you are aged over eight.
_	During its extensive coverage of the United Kingdom parliamentary expenses scandal, The Daily Telegraph published the story that Simpson had claimed £185 for light bulbs over a period of four years.
_	"The God in the Bowl" is the original version of the story that first appeared, edited by L. Sprague de Camp, in the magazine "Space Science Fiction".
_	Jim panics, believing Angela is still under the table, but Angela enters from the kitchen, and reveals that she left to buy a real cake—the story that Jim had told to cover her apparent absence.
_	Yu led him to conclude that "no evidence can be found in available historical records to support the story that Li Hung Chang ate chop suey in the United States."
_	The first is the story that a lamb uttered the prophecy that Egypt would be conquered by the Assyrians, a story later repeated by such classical authors as Claudius Aelianus ("De Natura Animalis" 12.3).
_	According to this interpretation, Montour was born in an Indian village near modern Sorel, Quebec, around 1685, a year consistent with the story that she told Marshe.
_	In addition to the story that eventually became "The Seven Heroes and Five Gallants", at least 2 other stories have been associated with him:
_	But Wilhelmina (who wanted Betty to write the story that she gave her) and everyone else in the meeting room was not cool to her idea, and gets her keys taken away.
_	Fox News provided extensive coverage of the 2012 Benghazi attack, which host Sean Hannity described in December 2012 as "the story that the mainstream media ignores" and "obviously, a cover-up.
_	These include the story that has been acclaimed by fans as the best single episode story in the history of the strip, "Bury My Knee At Wounded Heart"; the classic origins story "Judge Death: Boyhood of a Superfiend"; and the swansong story of long-running support cast member Chief Judge McGruder, "Death of a Legend."
_	The plaque reads: "Here lived, in a box of cookies, Ratoncito Pérez, according to the story that the father Coloma wrote for the young King Alfonso XIII."
_	One day, Venu reads the story that publishes in the magazine and understands that it is Renu is his childhood friend Anu.
_	No one seemed to know much about the history of the home, though Henry David Thoreau told the story that one of its previous owners believed he would never die and his ghost was rumored to haunt it.
_	Medieval chroniclers told the story that the legate was much taken with Ranulf's niece, and after sleeping with the girl, took no action on the charges against Ranulf.
_	Studd denied the story that was put about that he was the victim of nerves, saying that he was cold due to the freezing weather.
_	"The Hindu"'s reviewer Malathi Rangarajan wrote, "Karthi tries to infuse spirit and energy into the film with an ample dose of humour, but the story that's run of the mill and comedy that tires you after a point offer little help".
_	In 1969 Lyn and Berg got to the quarter-finale in the European Cup Winners' Cup losing 2–3 and 2–2 to the Spanish giant F.C. Barcelona, it sticks to the story that Lyn had to play both matches in Spain due to the harsh weather conditions in Norway at winter.
_	Kishiro eventually decided to take the story that he had developed for "Gunnm: Martian Memory" and expand it further, using it as the basis for the manga "", which is a continuation of "Battle Angel Alita".
_	Editor Robert Greenberger wrote in his introduction to the story that "As the fourth year of the "Fantastic Four" came to a close, Stan Lee and Jack Kirby seemed to be only warming up.
_	Rosa intervenes the descriptions of the landscapes found by the German man's expedition with the successive versions of the story that the madmen, the child and finally the poet retell.
_	In November 2010, it was reported that Pandian and Vishal would make another film under the Vishal's home banner, GK Films Corporation, in a venture titled "Pattathu Yaanai" and that it would feature the story that Pandian had planned for Vikram in his project "Vedi".
_	The style of the point of view is known as journalistic because of the details that are included throughout the story that are subtle, but included as if a journalist was reporting about it- hence the name (Smelstor What’s).
_	The series of disjunctive shots of the threads of the story that follow the opening utopian shot disrupt any notions of linearity, making the audience feel the conflict of the forces that destroys the village.
_	In 1996, Danish researcher Rolf Jensen of the Copenhagen Institute for Futures Studies writes in his article "The Dream Society" for The Futurist that American society is yielding to a society focused on dreams, adventure, spirituality, and feelings where the story that shapes feelings about a product will become a large part of what people buy when they buy the product.
_	Here is the story that gives
_	A race to find the killer has Banner trying to get the story that the police cannot.
_	Another reviewer described that "the messy screenplay in the second half ruins the story that admittedly has enough potential for romance, laughs, sentiments and action".
_	Russell's son is currently a student there, and Russell stated, "I was so familiar with the issues in the story that I knew how emotional and funny and original it could be.
_	It is also proven that he can be quite jealous, as when the new cute student Azuma asked Sachie to dance, he whisked her away before the dance began, on the story that she had sprained her leg.
_	In the PSP version, additions were made to the story that further develop the Dept. Heaven universe and story, deeply tying the game into mythological elements first developed by Riviera, with the more direct appearance of Diviners, and Grim Angels, and passing mention of Malice, Hector and The Seven Magi.
_	It is a traditional view among believers in the story that Abraham tried to keep his other sons apart from Isaac to avoid conflict.
_	This drawing is often used to disprove the story that Napoleon I of France destroyed the nose of the sphinx.
_	Special arrangements were made with the German radio operators to be listening to GARBO through the night of 5/6 June 1944, using the story that a sub-agent was about to arrive with important information.
_	For the rest of her life, Elizabeth's enemies spread the story that she had incited the murder.
_	It is revealed in the story that she had an incest relationship with her father as a teen which resulted in her giving birth to her brother and son the first born, as it was part of the family custom to bear a purebred son.
_	To overcome the color line, Graham backed away from the story that Oana was a full-blooded Hawaiian prince and noted that Oana's mother was Portuguese.
_	Herodotus recounts the story that Cynaegirus, brother of the playwright Aeschylus, who was also among the fighters, charged into the sea, grabbed one Persian trireme, and started pulling it towards shore.
_	In writing the screen play and editing the book events into proper, and interesting, movie dialogue, Miller learns a little more about the elements of story and through those things learns more about the story that he is living as well as the story he wants to be living.
_	Berhtwald inherited the dispute and presided at the Council of Austerfield in 702, at which Wilfrid's biographer relates the story that King Aldfrith of Northumbria, Berhtwald, and the other enemies of Wilfrid conspired to deprive Wilfrid of all his offices and possessions.
_	In fall 2007, "Lost"<nowiki>'</nowiki>s writers presented ABC executives with the story that a salvage vessel called the "Christiane I" looking for the "Black Rock", among other things, in the Sunda Trench would come across what would appear to be the wreckage of 815.
_	"Kirkus Reviews" stated, "Much of the story that emerges is familiar, though told in greater depth."
_	This is seen, for example, in the story that the old lady with the baby on her back tells to Guanya, explaining that she is unhappy with her betrothal to a man she does not love and that she feels she has wasted her life serving a husband she did not desire to marry.
_	At the time, the story that circulated was that terHorst had resigned because he had been blindsided by Ford's decision and because he had consistently denied to reporters in his daily press briefings that Ford had any intent of pardoning Nixon.
_	In order to keep with the design of the original house, portions of the story that took place in "New Moon" were moved to different sections of the house that were not seen before.
_	In the book, Misty Bernall reaffirmed the story that her daughter was asked if she believed in God before she died, despite being told by investigators that the question had not been asked.
_	Quilliam also writes that "a deep strand of escapism, perfectionism and idealisation runs through the genre" and "if readers start to believe the story that romantic fiction offers, then they store up trouble for themselves–and then they bring that trouble into our consulting rooms."
_	Oropesa also told the other young casts who take on the story that they should not only view it as "just a job" but also a "mission" to spread the word about implications and dangers of teenage pregnancy.
_	This is a personal look on the story that "Plague of Butterflies" tells.
_	Pugachev told the story that he and his principal adherents had escaped from the clutches of Catherine.
_	"Land of Black Gold", the story that Hergé had been serialising there, had to be abandoned.
_	In April 1916 several Queensland newspapers carried the story that the Queensland Government intended to take over the management of the Isisford District Hospital.
_	Payne disliked the final product, stating that Adam Sandler rewrote so much of the story that almost all of what Payne and Taylor wrote was gone.
_	"The film started to build according to the story that I was telling, but also according to my knowledge of her as a woman with her vulnerability, with her sensitivity, with what I knew about her soul, about her relationship with her children."
_	After unmasking he gave his birth name as "Fernando Vázquez Cisneros", using a combination of his and his partners' paternal last names to maintain the story that the "Espantos" were brothers.
_	According to stories that were not confirmed, there was surname Dražeta in western Bosnia near Prijedor, and this Dražeta family was of Muslim faith, which could confirm the story that Dražeta family from Ivoševci originating from this area.
_	In September 2010, Myrie broke the story that ETA had declared a unilateral ceasefire after he met an ETA operative in Paris, who handed over a tape of the organisation's leaders making the declaration.
_	Founder Tommy Globbot tells the story that his grandfather Viral created the music label in 1972, but it officially began operating in 2014 and is affiliated with freelance music journalist Serene Dominic.
_	In 1998, Malcolm Viviers, a navy diver came forward with the story that the government had been successful in finding the wreck soon after the crash.
_	North of India, in the formerly Persian territory of Sogdiana, it was the Greek version of the story that was known.
_	Esther Gim of "BuddyTV" also gave the episode a mixed review, but was more negative in her analysis, saying "Despite it being fitting for the holiday season, the story that this episode had been locked away for the past year is weak.
_	Del Rio became friends with Kugelman, who wrote the film specifically based on him, stating "Tall, slender and glamorous, but with the mouth of a truck driver, I immediately thought that Bianca was a total movie character, and that this would be the story that I develop for my first feature."
_	Early version of the story that eventually became "Fahrenheit 451".
_	Therapists provide a safe and nurturing environment to create an atmosphere that allows people to open up, and they listen to the story that the bodies of people are telling by identifying patterns of posture, breathing, and expression.
_	LSE law professor Conor Gearty argues that "Endtimes" is "a disturbing read, the anger driving the narrative, the passion evident in every paragraph," but that ultimately "the book does not give a full picture of human rights, hinting only now and again at a different side to the story that – not fitting the bill – is invariably set aside".
_	So they break in, kill him, and then Dr. Watson writes up a version of the story that puts the murder [on someone else].
_	This was essential to solidify the story that Lucas was trying to tell: Anakin Skywalker's fall from grace and transformation into Darth Vader.
_	Less romantic is the story that a carter named Christoph Fessel originally built a small refreshment hut un the Bode Gorge that was soon replaced by the one-story "Kleiner Waldkater".
_	It is the job of the viewer to create the story that goes along with the crown.
_	The controversy arose, above all, from the jealousy of other composers, who started circulating the story that the opera had not been written by a 12-year old, but by his father, Leopold.
_	Likhachev explains this part as an earlier type of the story that traditionally interpreted every event as foreshadowing upcoming catastrophes, Ryazan’s destruction being the divine retribution "казнию божиею".
_	To make the bullet wounds appear consistent with the story that the Bolivian government planned to release to the public, Félix Rodríguez ordered Terán not to shoot Guevara in the head, but to aim carefully to make it appear that Guevara had been killed in action during a clash with the Bolivian army.
_	The raka wondered why their god, Kyprioth, did not come and save them, and so priests spread the story that Kyprioth had been defeated in the Divine Realms by his brother and sister, Mithros and the Great Mother Goddess.
_	His first (with one minor exception) published science fiction story, the novella "The Lovers", earned him the Hugo Award for "most promising new writer" in 1953, and is critically recognized as the story that broke the taboo on sex in science fiction.
_	In addition, Athenaeus mentions works called "Symposium" and "Arcesilaus", and Diogenes Laërtius mentions a "Sale of Diogenes" () written by Menippus which seems to be the main source of the story that Diogenes of Sinope was captured by pirates and sold into slavery.
_	Dr. Nessel states specifically about the story that "With each rereading, the lion's predicament and his reaction to it become more familiar.
_	Coppins began his career at "Newsweek" and broke the story that Jon Huntsman Jr. would resign his ambassadorship and run for President.
_	Though everyone knew the story that his father was a knight and his mother a princess, it happens to be that his father was a blacksmith and his mother, Mortola or the Magpie, was just the head maidservant.
_	On January 9, 2015, the "Hollywood Reporter" broke the story that Oscar-nominated actress Hailee Steinfeld would play the lead character.
_	Their relationship is repaired by the end of the story arc when Chase expresses jealousy over Molly's growing attachment to the Young Avenger Speed, who tells him at the end of the story that no matter what, Molly looks up to him.
